title,selftext,subreddit
Join the Gaybros Worldwide Facebook Group,"Hi everyone, 

Since there are localized Gaybros Facebook groups, we decided to make a central anyone\-can\-join group for people to share memes, vent about getting catfished, or promote their local GB chapter/meet up group. 

[You can join it here.](https://www.facebook.com/groups/179189789404887/)",gaybros
"Me Monday September 10, 2018","It's that time of week again! Introduce yourself!

**Name:**

**Age:**

**Location:**

**One interesting thing that happened this week:**

**Photos:**

**Social Links:**
",gaybros
Your Dentist Might Be Able to Tell That You Recently Sucked a Dick,,gaybros
"I should watch more tennis. That's some damn nice looking, uh, sportsmanship",,gaybros
i feel very attacked,,gaybros
"Excuse me, but you're not my type...",,gaybros
"""yeah man just send me your address""",,gaybros
Is it just me or is this really unfunny?,,gaybros
I always have trouble coming out to my college roommates,"Freshman year, I had one roommate and we lived in a double. He was quiet and kind of nerdy so I didn’t really give a shit about his opinions. When I was drunk I told him I was bisexual (at the time I was still hooking up with girls although it seemed like a total chore to me). He said “cool but if you bring guys around I’ll probably be creeped out.” That didn’t phase me at all and I ended up hooking up with a guy while he was asleep one night ;)

Sophomore year, I had 5 roommates. 2 of which were good buddies of mine, already knew, and didn’t care. I told the other 2 while I was drunk and they didn’t care. We kept this giant secret as a group from my direct roommate who was a total douchebag/homophobe. Needless to say I refused to live with him again. 

Now it’s junior year and I’m living with 3 new people. They’re all extremely nice &amp; down to earth. We’re all getting along but I find myself unable to come out to them. They were talking about their body counts (well they had about 2 each, and I’m at 16 so I’m sure I’d have some explaining to do) so I kept my mouth shut so they probably think I’m a virgin. Not that that matters. The majority of my friends are girls so usually I’m pregaming with 10 girls and they think it’s “savage” and really haven’t caught on as far as I can see",gaybros
Question for out men,"So I have told my few closest friends and they haven't let it change anything.. I told my family (against my will) and all they do is belittle me when they get the chance, but mostly pretend I am straight and it doesn't exist..

Well, over the weekend my mom and me got into another argument about it. She told my dad and brothers when she promised she wouldn't because ""families don't keep secrets that are can ruin your life forever."" 

So my question is, how has living out and proud changed your life? Obviously I know people will look at you differently in some ways, but I am looking for major changes.",gaybros
"Hey gaybros! Just booked a trip to japan for the end of feb and start of march, looking for recommendations","Any recommendations on places to visit/things to do over there? If any gaybros wanna meet up that'd be fun too. Going skiing for the first week in Hokkaido and then the rest of the trip I haven't planned anything yet. Will probably check out Kyoto, and Nichome in Tokyo but no solid plans. Any advice would be much appreciated! :)",gaybros
"Four months ago, I designed and printed this flyer in order to spread some awareness for the LGBT community in Japan. It was a lot harder than I expected and it did not take off at all, which is embarrassing. But I do want to show to you guys what I made and tried to do.",,gaybros
"Hey guys, I’m a bit confused with my sexuality and was looking for some of your guys opinions or advice. I am sexually attracted to guys but not romantically. I’m romantically attracted to girls. Do gay guys find girls beautiful. Any opinions would help me out. Thanks guys",And what does it feel like to feel romantically attracted to a guy. I’m just not sure if maybe movies have conditioned me to be romantically inclined towards women,gaybros
"someone i've met on a dating site blocked my number out of the blue, and now he wants to start conversations with me again","this dude expressed interest in me, and i was equally as interested in him as he was in me. we exchanged whatsapp numbers and we talked for a couple of weeks. two days later, he blocked my number out of the blue. i was disappointed but i took it as a sign that he is not into me. weeks later/today, he sends me a message again on the dating site and tries to act like nothing happened- so i asked what was the reason behind him blocking me. he said that i stopped initiating conversations with him (which is not true) he then proceeds to say that he actually likes me and all of a sudden now he has an instagram (after he said he doesn't have one) and he even forgot he told me his name was X when his actual name was Y.  
i do like his physical appearance, he is a solid 10 if not 11, but he is self centric, boring, and lies a lot.",gaybros
Sometimes I swipe right purely because of witty bios like this,,gaybros
Help finding a video clip,"Ok so on Netflix’s Comedy Lineup, Matteo Lane is on it (check him out, he’s great) and as soon as I saw his face I remembered him doing a bit on what I think was aired on MTV. He was saying how straight men can have the biggest donks/butts and dont deserve them saying things like “idk its just there” with like the goofiest straight guy face. 

I know his might be kinda obscure but I NEED to show my bf this clip and I’m seriously losing hair over the fact that google can’t help me. Does anyone know what I’m talking about and know where this is from?!? Im losing my mind. ",gaybros
Things to do in Provincetown?,"Taking a trip up the Cape with my boyfriend next week. Any suggestions for things to see/do in Provincetown or along the rest of the Cape? Food/drink, sightseeing, shopping, etc?",gaybros
A sailor showing a positive side of the LGBTQ 🏳️‍🌈 community! ❤️🧡💛💚💙,,gaybros
Denver Gaybros Art Walk Meetup!,,gaybros
A card from a bottom,,gaybros
Queer eye,,gaybros
Fun/romantic things to do for my boyfriend that don’t take a lot of money?,"I’m a college student who is very broke, and my boyfriend is a few years older than me with a great job. Because of that, I don’t really ever pay for things for him, but he pays for a lot of stuff for me, or things for the both of us.

Maybe it’s just in my head, but it’s starting to feel pretty one-sided. Does anyone have any ideas about how I could give back more to him without spending much? I really appreciate it.",gaybros
Guy hid the fact that he has a boyfriend,"I met this guy on Tinder, and we hit it off really well. We had a lot of things in common, joked around, etc..

&amp;#x200B;

But I noticed that he was having issues putting in any real direction into what we were having. So I brought it up. Asked whether he wanted to date, or just be friends, or whatever. But he was really shady about putting any real definition to anything and that was the first red flag. I was catching feelings at this point, and so to me, this conversation was important. I felt kinda hurt that he was just brushing it off.

&amp;#x200B;

Fast forward a week later. He went overseas. I found it weird that he didn't want to share much about it. Like I'd ask him about which city he's visiting etc.., and he'd just leave me on read and not reply. Which was understandable, since I figured he was enjoying his holiday. When he came back, we chatted a bit. And he decided to post some pics of him with another guy. So I asked him who the guy was and he said that it was his ""girlfriend"" (he keeps doing this thing where he tries to use vague messages). I mean comeon, anyone can deduce that it was obviously his boyfriend, but he didn't want to explicitly say that it was the case.

&amp;#x200B;

So I told him straight up that I needed some time and space. Mainly to get away from him and process this freaking explosion. A huge part of me wants to never speak to him ever again. I felt hurt and betrayed, and to me, I need to respect myself and walk away. He isn't good for me, and now with the understanding that he had a boyfriend all along... everything made sense. His shadiness, his unwillingness to have a proper, mature, conversation about where things were headed.

&amp;#x200B;

I think the worst part is that I feel like he's playing some game. Like he did this on purpose to fuck with me, and part of me hopes that he's just bluffing. But I know the truth. He's talking to other guys behind his boyfriend's back, flat out lied to me (and maybe even his boyfriend) and doesn't give a crap about how anyone else but him feels in this situation.

&amp;#x200B;

Idk, I feel like a god damn dumbass.

&amp;#x200B;",gaybros
Thoughts on LGBTQ+ Meetup?,"Hey guys, I was wondering if anyone's had good experiences with any of Meetup's LGBTQ+ groups, specifically the one's based in NYC. I feel like I'm having a hard time connecting with other gay guys at my college (and I'm really bad at Tinder) and I was thinking of going to one of the groups on this website, but I'm not sure which to pick. Any suggestions are super appreciated!

Also, if anyone has any recommendations for Spanish/Hebrew language Meetup groups in NYC, I would also appreciate those!",gaybros
Do you always douche with your significant other?,"I feel like it's such a mood kill being like wait i have to douche when you're getting into it. 
Do you guys always douche beforehand? Especially with a partner?  If not how is that and how does it go? ",gaybros
India right now...,,gaybros
What are the loop holes when dating someone who recently lost their ex to suicide?,"## As the title states - I've been talking to a guy who is ""on the outs"" with his boyfriend. I put it in quotes because that's what he told me. Over the past few months, I would stop by his job to talk and see how things were going. We've built a unique friendship based on getting to know about each other and the obvious underlying attraction/flirtation. A week ago we hung out at a park to talk more intimately before cutting it short due to his BF calling.

I found out that his boyfriend committed suicide this morning and I am extremely at a loss. I'm lost on how to move forward with this new found ""friendlationship"". I have feelings for him but I know this suicide is going to really scar him - they were together for 4 years.

I've been crying most of the evening thinking about what my friend is going through, as well as his BF and what he felt to tragically take his own life. Do any gaybros have suggestions on what to do or how I should move forward?

On a side note, after hearing about my friend's loss, I have began researching suicide. It is the leading cause of death amongst gay and bi-sexual men. Hearing that alone makes my heart weep for those of us that feel secluded and alone. I'm grateful we have a place like this on reddit to vent and seek advice.

Cheers!",gaybros
I don’t really like it when...,"other guys talk to me about what they want in other men. I don’t really talk about what I want in a guy unless I’m asked but is rather talk about like video games or like food and stuff honestly anything else. Just makes me feel insecure and weird at times.

Example;
me: so what’s going on with you today?

guy: oh just thinking about doing *explicit things* with a guy

me: wow I love the new Spider-Man game how about you? ",gaybros
Stolen from /r/askreddit NSFW what's the most awkward boner you've ever had?,,gaybros
Unpopular Opinion: I don’t mind the gay best friend stereotype,"So what if loads of girls want me to be their friend? I like making friends! 

I get on with girls so much better than (straight) guys usually so it’s great that my sexuality makes them feel more comfortable in knowing we are actual friends and I’m not just being nice to sleep with them. (Not saying straight guys do this but there is a perception/worry that they do) 

I honestly feel like people like me way more once they find out I’m gay. I don’t totally know why but I won’t complain. ",gaybros
"For anyone who watched DBZ, did you get aroused by all those muscles?",,gaybros
What can I wear,What’s the best accessorized a suit can be without being ridiculous so it can be on par with a woman’s gown? I want the glitz and glam that women get but still a kickass suit that’s not blending in with the other men,gaybros
"Is it a big deal if you or your boyfriend have dreams about having sex with other people (co-workers, etc.)? What does it mean?",,gaybros
Penis,"I am very sure I am gay but the thing about me is I'm not that attracted to dicks. Weird coz sure I get excited and horny whenever I see bulges and guys on their underwear but when I actually see the penis, I'm like meh. Okay, penis, next.",gaybros
"Just your average gaybro, celebrating Labour Day Weekend. - D&amp;A’s Cottage",,gaybros
First Date Update: Not What I Expected,"(Original post [here.](https://www.reddit.com/r/gaybros/comments/9e4gfv/im_having_my_first_date_today/))

&amp;#x200B;

Not in a bad way.  I'd say it went pretty well, actually. It kind of just felt like hanging out with a friend. As I said, not what I expected.

&amp;#x200B;

He had to reschedule for dinner because he was busy during the afternoon. We went for pizza and he then suggested we go get some Starbucks, so we did. We talked the entire time, no awkward silences. It's weird, because I was expecting to fuck it up in some way, but I didn't. And it didn't go exactly as I pictured, but I'm somehow not freaking out about it, so of course I'm low-key freaking out about not freaking out. 

&amp;#x200B;

Yeah, that's pretty much it. Sorry this post is not as exciting as the previous one haha. Plus, the pizza was pretty good and I enjoyed myself.",gaybros
"Am I ready for a relationship? Honestly, am I insane?","Last week Sunday, I was constantly talking to this really cute guy, and literally from the morning until 1 am, we were just texting about ourselves and enjoying each other company. He asked to hang out this weekend (which was today) and I was pretty hyped. It went like for one more day, then as each day passed by, the messages got more and more scarce, it was just me answering questions, and him answering it. And all I could feel was a sense of insecurity. Anything that didn’t involve answering a question he just didn’t reply. By the end of week he was the polar opposite of when I had started texting him. And what really felt like huge blow to my chest was when he told me he had to go and hang out with a friend, I told him to have fun and stay safe, then he replied “oh it’s this guy I’m talking to, I’mma just sleep over his dorm”. At this point, I felt like I, THE UNIVERSE, and FATE just played me. I don’t think I was ever any interest to this guy, yet my idiot-self felt so infatuated over him, insecure about whether or not if he even wants to talk to me. HE LITERALLY COULD BE TALKING ABOUT AN ACTUAL GUY HES JUST TALKING TO, but I still feel so hurt by it.  We were supposed to meet today but we had to reschedule to next weekend. And honestly, I just have this vibe that he’s just going to play it off until I wear out. I honestly feel so mentally exhausted from thinking about this guy way too much and it’s causing me to think I shouldn’t never, ever, be in a relationship. I fell for this guy so quick yet, he’s so unresponsive to me. And I really want to this guy. All I can get from this situation is whether I’m actually a psycho or not. This situation feels so lightweight, yet I feel mentally worn out just by thinking about this guy, and I just have this strong feeling that a relationship is not ideal for me. I don’t know what I want out of this post, maybe a reality check, or reassurance, but I just needed to put these thoughts into writing. 

Quick edit: This guy literally did nothing wrong.  All he did was just talk to me and wanted to make plans. He didn’t hint or explicitly say anything about dating. I just feel like I set myself up for this and I don’t know how to feel about it. I need someone to tell me I’m being an idiot if I am being, in fact, AN IDIOT. ",gaybros
Am I actually Asexual and not gay!?,"I used to be pretty average in the fact that I was a horny teenager, same as everyone else up until about 18 months or so ago (23 now). i've come to realise that i'm struggling to 'get it up' and no longer feel massively attracted to guys like I was. Its been a real issue with the past few guys i've dated. Im sure there is no issue in my ability to actually get it up and keep it up. I'll still watch porn or sleep with guys (often very hit and miss if it'll actually be enjoyable for me.) But I never really look at guys anymore in a 'I want you now' kind of way. Thinking it could just be low testosterone levels giving me a super low sex drive? Or could it actually be me somehow turning asexual? ",gaybros
Any Chicago bros? Traveling to Chicago for the first time,I’m visiting a friend from college for five days the last weekend of October. Any advice for cool stuff to see? Good nightlife spots?,gaybros
Gift ideas??,"What up fellow gays, I'm trying to figure out what to get my boyfriend as a gift. I really wanna surprise him, we're both 18, I was talking to him once about getting us some matching couple jewelry. Any suggestions on jewelry?",gaybros
"Hey fellas, I need some help with Halloween costume ideas for my fiancee and I.","So the title pretty much says it all.  I'm looking to do a couples costume for Halloween this year and would like some ideas.   My fiancee is quite a reserved and shy person so slutty costumes are a pass haha.

We are both pretty nerdy, I'm finishing a computer programming at college and he is a software engineer. Any ideas for a goofy or straight forward costumes that we could pull off?",gaybros
Getting PrEP in the UK,"Hey bros, apologies if this has been asked before but I couldn’t find anything by searching. I’m moving to the UK in a few months and did some initial research and it doesn’t look like PrEP is widely available there (NHS trial or something). Is there a way to ensure I can continue taking it once I move? I’ll be in the London area if that matters. Appreciate anyone’s help and advice. ",gaybros
I'm having my first date today,"TL;DR: I have my first date today and I can't be more fucking excited!!!!

So I moved to college three weeks ago. Back home there's not many guys out (me included) and when I got here I promised myself I'd be more comfortable with exploring my sexuality.

I met this guy. He was being a flirt and things just clicked with him, so I said, ""fuck it, I'll ask him out."" It was weird because I have never actually flirted with another guy, just girls (still figuring out whether I'm bi or gay). Never asked anyone out before. I asked a couple of friends how I should do it and they both said ""don't actually ask him out. Go out and ask him to come along, but make it clear you're going wether he's there or not."" But I just thought that was shitty advice.

I was really nervous and was debating if I should do it in person or via text message. Text was a bit safer, but too indifferent. Opted for a combination of the two: we were hanging out with friends and I messaged him through snapchat something like this (yes I know it's cheesy but I thought it was funny):

Me: what is 05/07/2018?

Him: I don't know, what happened then?

Me: No, you're looking too much into it. What's 08/09/2017?

Him:  A date?

Me:  Yeah

Him:  ...and?

Me: You know...

I look at him. He smiles at me. Fuck it.

Me: You're meant to say ""yes, I'll go on a date with you""

He's grinning while reading the message.

Me: You're bad at this

Me:  Like really bad

And then he just turns to me irl and he says, still smiling, ""well MAYBE I'm just fucking with you."" I laughed. Our friends looked at us like we were crazy. It was nice. It was our little secret. So I get back to messaging him:

Me: Well, since you won't work with me, I guess I'll have to take matters into my own hands. 09/08/2018. Lunch?

Him: Sure!

I've been giddy since. We're gonna go get some pizza, nothing fancy.

I'm so fucking happy.

",gaybros
How would you feel about a partner who works part time?,"This is a hypothetical. I would like to get full time *eventually* because I work retail but also make quite a bit over current minimum wage and would kinda be in a great place to make as much as I do for the work I do. 

But, I find that a 40 hour week is...a lot. It's overwhelming. I love shorter 6 hour days. 7 hour days are okay too, my breaks and lunch break that up nicely. But 5 days in a row, 8 hours each, it's just a lot to me. I wouldn't mind being part time forever. I make enough part time to live on my own, so it's enough to contribute in a relationship I think. I've never been very ambitious or wanted more than a simple apartment. yards are for suckers.

But are other guys cool with that sort of mindset? I'm a good cleaner, and I think I could take care of a home well enough. I'm not an amazing chef but I do know how to cook and can read a recipe. Part time with some homemaking thrown in sounds really nice. 

I think women are a little lucky in this regard because even this far removed from the 1950s and housewife stereotypes, I think a woman saying ""I want to stay at home and my husband goes to work"" wouldn't be met with much of a response at all, lol. I'm compromising here :P ",gaybros
Do you ever hear a pretty song and think about how nice it'd be to dance to at your wedding,"and get all teary and upset because maybe you'll never have one

or am I weird

[unrelated but I want this played at my fucking reception](https://youtu.be/1Aon3CJZyGk)",gaybros
Next Book Group Read is Boy Erased - Join Us,,gaybros
There is something innately sexy about guys playing basketball in the park,I don't why but I can't help but feel that way,gaybros
"Highlight of my day, probably nothing compared to you guy’s highlights, but a highlight for me, the lonely dude, nonetheless.","I went to Walmart today to pick up some veggies for a Denver “omelette” (just scrambled eggs version) and some ingredients for these low carb cookies I was going to make, (turned out disgusting and bland)...

Anyway, this cute guy, looked kind of hound but almost around my age, 21, toted a huge cart to stock stuff with, almost looked like he was done. I glanced at him but he quickly shifted his glance away. 

Oh well, I said, grabbing my low fat milk, probably should’ve gotten whole since I need more calories from fat but it’s saturated fat :/

ANYWAY, dude comes back from the front and stops and ask if I found everything okay, I kinda flirted and smiled saying “yeah, totally”.

Honestly felt like I should’ve said more but he was working, I was holding stuff. Would’ve been awkward :( even though no one was around. UGH...

If you’re on this subreddit stocker boy, please message me ;P...",gaybros
Where do you turn when you feel down?,"There are *so* many posts on this sub asking for advice, feeling lonely, and bros struggling with depression, anxiety, coming out, and any number of things.

Having a lonely night myself, bros, what do you do when you're feeling down or lacking in connection?",gaybros
Military Gay Bros: Do you have any hot or romantic stories while in the service?,"I personally have never been in the service. From what I can tell, it seems like a very “straight” atmosphere. I’m just curious to know of any stories from gay bros who found hot sex or romance while serving in the military. ",gaybros
Gay Indian,"Hey Bros this is my very first post and I'm very glad to be here.

I was born in India (Gujarat) and have grew up in Texas my entire life. My parents are both hard working and amazing individuals who do so much for me. I was raised a Hindu and keep my faith very close to me. Indian culture and values were instilled in me since birth and I am proud to say it. However, in my teenage years, I came to the realization that I am gay. This is a very taboo topic in Indian culture and I can totally understand why. At age 19, I am still exploring my sexuality but I also feel that it is wrong and I am wrong. Hinduism does not reject homosexuality as a few of our male gods have gotten together to create children of their own. I feel that I am accepted by Shiva as long as my values and my morals are in the right direction. But I feel that my parents will not accept me and I don't want to risk loosing them. 

&amp;#x200B;

I am telling you all of this because I can not seem to find any gay Indian guys at my university, and I go to one of the top universities in Texas. I have been binge watching many romantic Bollywood films where the hero overcomes some sort of family related battle to ultimately be with the girl that he loves. Maybe I have been watching too many rom-coms but I feel that a life with a Hindu woman would be better than a life with a man. Maybe I am thinking of the short way out - pleasing my parents. But would it be all bad, I would have a wife that is my best friend, loving children, and a comfortable life. Because I do want kids who can be raised with Indian values, I do want to be close to my parents because I love them and I feel that this will bring me happiness. Am I wrong for considering this? ",gaybros
A date with my Tinder data: Nothing will make you cringe as much as your chat history.,,gaybros
Ways to Fight Boredom on Long Metro Rides,,gaybros
Should it be legal for men to be able to buy skinny jeans?,"I get it, your thin/lean/skinny but for the love of all gay men do not wear skinny jeans. They are terrible (imo). Am I alone in this hateful/bigoted point of view? Or will the silent majority rise up and tell all our skinny jean wearing bros to stop this madness! I hope there is someone that agrees with me. 😇",gaybros
"What do you do when your boyfriend doesn’t want to have sex , but your horny as hell ?","I’d like to hear how some of you guys manage this dilemma.  

So there are times now when my boyfriend is not up for having sex (understandable, it happens to me on rare occasions) but I’m very horny.  When this happens I’d ideally like to just go to the bathroom and jerk off and be done with it ...however in our 7 years together we have never watched porn together.  We both watch porn when we’re not together (we live apart) and are comfortable enough talking about what porn we watch when we’re not with each other , but like I said, we have never wanted or needed to watch porn while we’re together. 

I would like to tell him next time that I’m gonna go to the bathroom and jerk off to some porn , but I feel guilty about doing this.  This happened once before when I told him that I was gonna just jerk off to porn , he said “fine” but he seemed a little disappointed that I couldn’t just wait till tomorrow.   

His labido is not as intense as mine , so I understand how he has more self control. But since I usually jerk off at LEAST twice a day, going a day without nutting is torture for me. 

So yea , my question is, how do you guys handle this situation with your partner?",gaybros
Curious to find out how guys feel about the age at which they came out...,"I came out at 23 (early 30s now) and always wondered how things may have been different if I came out earlier. I've never really been fully comfortable with my sexuality (hard to explain what I mean by that).

Anyone felt the same or wondered the same? Curious especially to hear from other guys in their 30s on this as you may have come out around the same time as me in a similar culture.",gaybros
Hello gay bros,"Hi bros, my therapist said I should make efforts to interact with gay people and see you as human beings.

So therefore, I’ve browsed your subreddit (first baby steps) and I can say that you seem like normal people and also, sort of decent ones at that. 

A few things; I’m impressed at the subreddit supporting young gay people, making genuinely funny jokes, just holding hands and not being what I imagined.

I’ve probably judged you quite harshly in the past, I’ve been an ignorant and petty person I can’t excuse that.

But almost every interaction that I’ve started when I wasn’t being a douchbag has actually been kind of pleasant. 

So I guess, sorry? And thank you for being yourselves.

Edit, fixed word.",gaybros
Advice,"*Not sure exactly how to write this correctly, it may be kind of all over the place, so I apologize.* And sorry, after reading it, it came off as kind of a poor-me post. But that was not my intention, I was just trying to explain myself. 

I came out when I was 21 and I'm almost 34 now. I had one short ""relationship"" (about a year), but I don't think the other person ever considered it a relationship and was just using me for money and a place to stay. I was only ever his boyfriend in private, if we went out anywhere (even to a gay bar or party) I was just a friend and he spent the whole night flirting with other guys and ignored me. It ended as soon as I went to college and my income stopped. That was 11 years ago.

Recently this year I found out I have Autism (Aspergers). It's very mild, I come across as somewhat normal, just socially awkward and shy. But my main problem is trying to connect with people, I either have no connection at all or I become obsessed. And I'm not talking romantically, I'm taking about just trying to make friends. I can connect normally and make friends, it just takes a lot longer than normal and usually by that time people have gotten bored or I've scared them off.

I'm also overweight and have been my entire life, and I've tried many different diets and exercise plans trying to get into shape. I figure if I'm in better shape it may help people to be more accepting of my social oddities. Plus the guys I'm generally attracted to are not into my type. I've started to go to the gym and changed my diet to try to get into shape. But with no friends to go with me it's hard to keep the motivation sometimes. 

Where I live now, is a very religious and conservative area. And it's a very small town, so I'm having to hide being gay at work and elsewhere. And the amount of gay guys around here is very limited. And there is really nowhere to go to meet them.

My question is, how is the best way to go about meeting people and bettering myself? I feel lonely all the time not having any friends/boyfriend to hang out with and talk to. And I'm not sure how to better myself socially when talking to people and trying to just make a friend is extremely challenging.",gaybros
Grey's Anatomy finally getting a Openly Gay Male Surgeon!,,gaybros
Thank you.,A big thank you to everyone which helped me some days ago. ,gaybros
"Saturday Songs September 08, 2018","What are you listening to? Share your music recommendations here. 

Spotify, Apple Music, Google Play links are encouraged!
",gaybros
Wear your Pride on your sleeve.,,gaybros
The shoe that started the feud between Nicki Minaj and Cardi B,,gaybros
I really like a guy and I'm unsure what to do.,"I've already posted about this before, so I'll give a ""short"" TL;DR.

&amp;#x200B;

I met a cute guy on Grindr and saw that he put his Pokemon Go friend code in his bio and said he was new to my city (he moved from across the world). I invite him to play PoGo with me while also showing him the city, he says he'd like that but needs to get a plan first. We add each other on PoGo and after he tells me his IRL name, I for some reason decide to google his PoGo username + IRL name. The first result gives me him promoting his snapchat (same username as PoGo) on his semi-personal tumblr. I kinda snoop through it, and find out we have the exact same interests; we like the same movies, bands and even some obscure things. He seems perfect to me. While this was happening we didn't really talk a lot, and I had to do all the question asking because he wouldn't. Then after the conversation died off, he randomly asked me a question, which made me think he wanted to meet up some time. 

&amp;#x200B;

That was 4 days ago, and he hasn't been online on Grindr since he asked me that question. It probably sounds quite weird, but I feel like I've already started to get feelings for him. Whenever I think about him it, my heart starts to pound like crazy.

&amp;#x200B;

In the next couple of days I kinda looked at his tumblr from time to time, when he suddenly posts a thing among the lines of ""Welcome to my new stalker from \[our city\]! Please hit me up, don't be shy!!"". I freak out because I didn't know people could see who viewed their tumblr, and I'm 99% sure it's about me because apparently the ""stalker"" is new and we live in quite a small city. Since he hasn't been online on Grindr in a few days at that point, I was really tempted to hit him up, because he seemed sincere. Though my friend said it'd be really dumb because she thinks he's being sarcastic. I didn't end up sending him a message telling it's me, since it'll most likely really freak him out and don't want anything to do with me. Or if he still wants to meet up, it'd just be really awkward.

&amp;#x200B;

Since I quite like him and would just want to talk to him, it really frustrates me that he hasn't been online and I'm not sure what to do. As hot as I find him, I'd love to just be friends with him and nothing more per se, because I don't have any irl gay friends (that I know of) and especially not people who like the same obscure things as me. Seeing that he posted his Snapchat online and asked people to follow him, I am really tempted to just add him. It would be kinda weird, but since it's the same as his PoGo username, I think I might be able to justify it. Or I could just hit him up on tumblr and come clean and hope he doesn't find it extremely weird. But I'd rather not risk it. So what would be smart? Just hit him up and hope he doesn't care I ""stalked"" him, wait until he comes online again or just cut my losses.",gaybros
Gay Bars,"Hey guys, quick question: I turn 21 in October and I'm really excited to go to my first bar. I've got plenty of friends that want to go with me, but I know my boyfriend wants to go as well. I'm just curious as to how I should act and other gay men should act. I don't have much experience with ""the scene"" (for lack of a better word). Like, would my boyfriend get hit on? Are they going to try to woo him over? What about dancing? Thank You.",gaybros
I've made fun of otaku guys &amp; their waifu pillows but now nightcrawler has a beard.,,gaybros
"This is my favourite lube of all time. What are your preferred lubricants, and why?",,gaybros
Calling all aspiring LGBTQ+ techies! 🌈💻,"Out in Tech U, part of an international LGBTQ organization dedicated to promoting diversity and inclusion in tech for LGBTQ people, is now accepting applications for our fall mentorship programs for young adults interested in tech careers!

We have two programs:

U Mentorship provides one-on-one mentoring over several months, either remotely or in-person for those in the NYC metro area. Mentees will be paired with mentors with whom they can work to develop both technical and professional skills, and learn more about tech careers. Learn more here, and apply to become a mentor or mentee: https://outintech.com/u/mentorship/

Our Explorer program in NYC is for those who may not yet have technical skills, but want to learn more about technical careers. Participants meet for two hours, once a week for several months, visiting tech companies and getting an inside view of a wide variety of technical careers. Learn more here and apply to participate: https://outintech.com/u/explorer/ 

Questions? Comment below and I'll do my best to reply!",gaybros
Bliss,"Coming out of the closet was one of the most difficult choices I’ve ever made, but now that I have I feel a since of peace and almost bliss. I’ve known deep in side this is who I am, but it took 8 years of going back fourth with myself to admit it. Now that I’ve come out my depression has gotten significantly better and I feel like I’m no longer trapped. I’ve had issues with some people but at the end of the day those who cared about me stayed and those who didn’t left. I’m incredibly grateful for those who pushed to love myself, and not care what others think. Even if some of them are no longer a part of my life. I’m posting this in hopes that this will help others struggling with similar issues, it’s not easy but don’t deny yourself what you deserve. Because in the end we deserve nothing more than to be ourselves. Much love ❤️ ",gaybros
Trying to come out to my friend,"A little background; I have recently discovered this sub when I got to college a few weeks ago  to try and better accept myself and hear from fellow gay bros like all of you. I’m 18 and have finally come to terms that I’m bi. I’ve just started college and I feel like it’s time to finally start coming out to my close friends. (Waiting a little to tell the fam)

I have this one friend who has always been super supportive of the community and she’s the first person who I feel comfortable telling about my sexuality. So fast forward to today we went out to get lunch because I came home for the weekend for my brothers birthday. I was telling myself all day that I would just do it, but alas I chickened out and ended up not doing it. Do you bros have any advice on what I should do? I’m thinking about just texting and I already have a whole text written up but I’m just so fucking nervous even though I’m sure she’ll be fine with it. Ugh I’m stressin and overthinking but idk what to do. I’m just tired of keeping this a secret but I just freak out whenever I try and bring it up. Any advice would be greatly appreciated! ",gaybros
He makes me happy,"Just sort of venting here. I'm seeing this guy I met 2 months ago via Grindr. He's nice, funny and I enjoy our time together. He's bi, first time I've been with anyone who identifies as bisexual. It's temporary, or so I assume. I get the vibe he'll meet a girl and eventually phase me out, I've made peace with the idea at this point. For now I'm just enjoying him and what we have between us. 

The thing I don't like is how he calls me ""dude"" when we fuck.

Hope you're having a good day!:)",gaybros
Been 7 weeks since my husband died and I still cannot sleep past 4am. Bright side: I get to see this every morning.,,gaybros
Fuck yeah,"Was on the city bus with the guy I like and he was too stubborn to grab the pole (and I was too short lmao) so he ended up falling into me the moment the bus lurched forward. Then, once the bus got moving he started falling the other way and I grabbed his arm to stop him. Swear to God I could feel the butterflies in my chest stabbing my heart because they were so damn excited. I'm surprised nobody heard my heart pounding it was going so fast. Crushes do weird shit to your stomach and heart. ",gaybros
Out and frustrated - anyone else?,"Hey everyone - I've been reading [r/gaybros](http://www.hemingwayapp.com/r/gaybros) for years, but am new to posting.   

A bit about me: Been out for about 8 years, with my current partner for 5, and getting married next year. I'm fortunate to have a lot of love and acceptance, and have dealt with very little animosity due to my sexuality.

Lately I've felt more frustrated with navigating a ""straight"" world, and the day to day ""ignorances"" that we experience. Stuff that usually feels inconsequential, and not worth bothering with. It could be comments about if you like *Queer Eye or* your ""plans for kids"". It could be questions about why you don't give blood, or discomfort around starting in a new workplace. The amount of times I've been reminded how ""fabulous"" my wedding should be has been a bit of a harsh reminder of how I'm seen.

I know that any of these things on their own aren't a big deal, that it's the reality of being out and gay right now. I also recognize that things are *so much* easier than they used to be. But when you take these small things together, it starts to feel like a reminder that we are still seen as less legitimate. 

I guess my question is - **am I alone in this?** Is anyone else out, happy, but frustrated by these instances of perceived ignorance?  Part of me feels like so much of the ""gay narrative"" has to do with coming out, that we don't often hear or see what happens once we're actually out. 

I'd love to hear what you think - and if you have any of these experiences or frustrations.",gaybros
Why are all the other gay subs so trans-focused?,"I feel like every other gay community on the internet is trans this, trans that, I'm trans, here's my trans girlfriend, i'm a trans guy and here's my trans girlfriend and we're both trans, i'm a trans lesbian, here's my pre and post photos, over and over, it dominates discussion.

I understand entirely why trans stuff ""fits"" with gay stuff but considering LGB are sexualities and T isn't I can't help but feel the T is a bit misplaced in sexuality-focused forums of discussion in the first place. I know that's not a popular opinion. I'm not kicking anyone out, I just think it's goofy to walk into ""ok lets talk about being gay"" zone and see a bunch of ""I'm a straight guy, but I was born a girl"" conversations. That has nothing to do with being gay. 

I go to gay subs to read about gay people and their gay problems with gay things and gay stories and gay coming out and gay gay gay gay, and it just feels like a ton of content on other gay subs has nothing to do with being gay. Being trans is not the same as being gay (except obviously when it's both). I don't think things like pre-and-post transition photos are gay content and more than a photo of what you had for breakfast is gay content. Brunch is not synonymous with gay the same way being trans is not synonymous with gay.",gaybros
So there’s this guy....,"be me...
have small crush on Spanish guy in the office...
don’t talk to him much only “heys and hellos”...
manager picks me to work on office project...
he’s going on vacation...
I agree because why not...
I enter first meeting and sit down at table...
the Spanish guy comes in and sits next to me...
we’re partners for the next 6 weeks...
please kill me...",gaybros
Super paranoid about HPV,"I feel like such an idiot. I got my first HPV vaccine in February and was supposed to follow up in April but totally forgot. Around April is when my 40-year-old boyfriend and I (25) started dating and having sex. He’s the top and we used condoms at first but he had a lot of trouble staying hard, so when I began to trust him more and he got an STD screening (negative on everything) I let him bang me without condoms. But I totally forgot about HPV, and I know he’s had multiple partners in the past. It just sucks that’s there’s no tests for men, because I really need the ease of mind of this. It’s just terrifying knowing that there might be a virus in me that at anytime in the future will give me cancer and I feel so shitty about myself. How likely is it that this worst case scenario will happen?",gaybros
Birthday bitterness,"My birthday is in a couple months, and my boyfriend that I’ve been dating for 10 months just told me he scheduled an out-of-town *optional* work event the week of it. 

I told him it’s fine because I didn’t want to say how bummed I was at the moment, but I’m really bummed. And I can’t help it! 

I made his birthday such an event. 3 days of whatever he wanted + surprises. Not that I’d ever expect someone to do that for me but it’s like...really? You’re not going to be there for any of it. 

I want to suck it up since it’s work related and he’ll make good money, so it’s good for him. But I still can’t help this bitterness. 

Am I just being a child? Is there an appropriate way to bring up my feelings without seeming like I’m being a baby about it? ",gaybros
Do gaybros do stuff like this when hanging out with other gaybros? Or is this a straight guy thing?,,gaybros
Has anyone gone out again with someone who ghosted them?,"a former ghoster from 2 years back recently reconnected with me, and we are hanging out this weekend. Anyone have experience with this?

I’m having conflicted feelings re: self worth, also feeling like when he sees me he’ll be reminded that he’s not attracted to me, or that I’m annoying etc lol idk 

..but also he’s really hot so opportunity cost is worth it

Edit: he definitely knows it’s me, and he apologized for ghosting me last time",gaybros
when you’re bored at work so you draw a mural of random memes on your phone,,gaybros
Section 377: Supreme Court of India decriminalises gay sex,,gaybros
Sevilla and Gibraltar Recommendations,"Hey bros, I will be traveling to Sevilla for a conference and am looking for suggestions for fun things to do. 

If any of y'all have been, tell me what's good. I also plan on driving down to Gibraltar for a weekend, so please let your recommendations extend down to there. ",gaybros
"Politics Phriday September 07, 2018","**PLEASE NOTE:** This thread's comments will be largely unmoderated. Please participate with the knowledge that offensive and uneducated opinions may be expressed. Please report all comments that break Reddit-wide rules or Terms of Service using the report button. 

A weekly post to talk about anything political going on in the world. 

Please note that Trump-centric conversation IS allowed in this thread but will be removed on other days of the week. 
",gaybros
Shampooing other than hair,"I find myself shampooing my pubic region and anywhere else that might contain hair in an abundance, I like to think that if someone does go down on me they can smell freshness rather than some nasty BO that might’ve been built up, so I ask bro’s, do you too shampoo your dick and anywhere else that contains a lot of hair? ",gaybros
HIV will Never Kill Me but Stigma Changed my Life Forever,,gaybros
"I have become lazy, and selfish in this internet age. How hard is it to change?","I chat and flirt and bulls*** so much, that I find I never want to put in the real effort and work to actually go on a date, and really get to know someone. Somehow, I have gone from being the great relationship guy to the worst relationship guy as I have fallen down the internet rabbit hole.

Are there ways to climb back out, and learn to value people on an individual basis?",gaybros
Falling in love for the first time 😍 just got back from our first road trip!,,gaybros
Am I gay or not?,"I am sexually attracted to guys but I am attracted to few certain girls through only their personality. I don’t like penises but I have had a male foot fetish since I was 12. I don’t find any girls sexually attractive but some are pretty to look at. I find vaginas gross, I want to be with a guy that doesn’t want to just fuck but I want to cuddle with him and have long conversations. ",gaybros
Vegas show/bars suggestions,"Hey gaynros, headed to Vegas this weekend, do guys by any chance know good gay themed or lgbt themed shows or any show recommendations? Also what are some good gay bars around the strip (are there any?)?",gaybros
Going to gym with communal showers for the first time =0,"Maybe this isn't the right subreddit but I think my gaybros will understand. All the gyms I had gone before had private showers, but because I moved to another city, my university gym has communal showers. Yesterday I was too chicken shit to go in there, so I waited to get home; although I can say I succeeded in not staring at all those penises hUnging raw in there, haha. It wasn't that hard. I wasn't either haha. But I have to accomplish this mission of getting in the shower there. So, any tips? wish me luck!  

PS:. Sorry for my English. have a great day ppl!",gaybros
"Two weeks ago, my boyfriend popped the question with a beautiful wood faced watch.",,gaybros
What's your favorite after dinner dessert?,"Usually chocolate chip cookies for me. If not, ice cream never fails. ",gaybros
Should I tell “homophobic” friend about my sexuality?,"So one of my closest friends has a burning hatred for gays. I’ve never understood why, but it is what it  is. At one point he was my best friend but not really anymore. We stopped talking for a good 6 months before he reached out and wanted to try and reconnect. He cares about me, I can tell that for the most part. He’s not an emotional person at all but he cried when  we meet to discuss trying to fix things. We have 4 years of friendship together and I guess that’s the hardest part about completely letting go. I know that recently he was talking shit to one of our other friends about how he wouldn’t hangout with me if I was gay. He’s always assumed I was but I didn’t come out till very recently. I still haven’t told him or most of my friends. I’ve been avoiding him for the last couple weeks now, which has pissed him off. I’m just not sure if I should tell him and let him go or just drop out off his life without an explanation. ",gaybros
"I slept with a friend he's telling me today that he wants to ""slow it down"".","I have recently filed for divorce from my husband (2 week ago).  And an old friend of mine who is helping me with my divorce expressed feeling for me.  He is 45 and I'm 34 and went on a date last week.  I had a great time with him and he said the same thing.  

I went over to his house last night and he was watching TV in his bed.  He said for me to come over and join him.  He knows that I am attracted to him, so we ended up having sex.  But, now he doesn't want the 'drama' and he excused me of having 'clouded emotions'.  And, he hasn't taken Grindr off his phone because my ex is on there and my ex will be suspicious.

Am I being played?  I haven't been single for over 14 years.  I'm rusty.",gaybros
First time camping with my boyfriend in the 180,,gaybros
Bf possibly breaking up? I'm unsure of what to do here.,,gaybros
Is it time to give up or go long distance?,"TL;DR: My long-term boyfriend is thinking of taking a new job several states away in a small town with no job prospects for me. If he does, should we end the relationship or try to make it work?

My boyfriend of almost three years is thinking of taking a new job in a town with about 30,000 people. It's two hours from any major city, and it would take a day or two to drive there from where we currently live. It's a great opportunity for him, but it's a lousy opportunity for me. My current, well-paying job is not willing to allow me to telecommute, and, due to my specialized field of study, I'm not able to find any jobs in my field in this or most small towns (which I don't mind, because I don't really like towns that small). I would not move anywhere without finding a job, and, even if there were a job waiting there for me, I'm not even sure I would want to move to that small of a town. He's aware of both of these facts.

This situation is putting him and me in an awkward position. I'm not going to tell him he shouldn't take the job just so that I can be with him. If it's a job that will make him happy, then I'm happy for him. I also don't want to make it a ""job versus me"" situation, but I'm wondering if it's worth it to try to make the relationship work long-distance or if we should just end it. I think the drive is too long and that airline travel isn't practical/inexpensive enough to work, but can something work without seeing each other in person regularly? I tend to be more physically affectionate, so I may be answering my own question with that piece of information.

There is so much more to this story that would be difficult to sum up, but we had some issues in the past when he was gone for several months. I feel that I've made so many sacrifices already that I subconsciously and selfishly think he should ""take one for the team."" However, I would never say it or admit it to him, because I don't want to be controlling. I also know that sort of thing can lead to resentment, which isn't good for either of us. What would you do in this situation? Thanks for reading and (hopefully) answering!",gaybros
"Happy birthday, Mr.Fahrenheit! Any Queen fans here?",,gaybros
Gaymers (Xbox - Switch),"Hi Guys, anyone that plays Battlefield 1 on Xbox??? I need more gaymers friends and maybe create a platoon of LGBT players? If anyone is interested add me on Xbox live @DanBigHead. 

&amp;#x200B;

On Switch I'm currently playing Hollow Knight, but the Nintendo online service is coming and I need online friends to eventually play Smash Bros and Diablo III",gaybros
Update from last post 10d’s ago. Annoyed with my BF about my piercings and Tattoo.,"Well after the death of my lovely niece Cody MtF about a month ago. I was thinking of getting a nearly full side tattoo to cover some huge ugly scars and to add some designs that Cody drew for me and I got done over 2 1/2 Days.  Well my BF called me Trailer Trash and cheap. It has been an very emotional time. He liked the way I lost weight about 20kgs and toned up and know I took my nieces Death really hard as we where more than niece and uncle. Cody made me feel that her and I could talk about anything and we had that sense that we where twins. But their was 21 years difference. His mum is my twin and we have become really closer. But back to Adam BF until we really sat down and talked I didn’t realised that Cody’s death hit him worse than me. He said this tattoo looked great. But the image of Cody placed in it was just to much and he could not take it.

Well two days ago we split up which was hard on both of us. Adam’s mum said give him some space and he will come around again and be his usual happy go lucky self. Don’t get me wrong I love him with all my heart but I think it’s over. That was until about 15 mins ago when he texted and then called me to tell me he loves and miss’s me &amp; we promised each other that we will talk everyday/night. Adam admitted he is going to see a grief counselior to help him get through it. I said if needed I will come if he wants if needed.

I just want to Thank everyone for you love and advise. 

It has helped 

Cheers g

",gaybros
Any other gaybros excited for baking weather?,,gaybros
Change the logo back please,"The new logo sucks, not in a good way. You can see the edges. ",gaybros
"I'm taking it to you guys about me apparently being ""bigoted"" which I completely disagree with.","I got banned from a subreddit for being ""bigoted"" it was r/atheism because I didnt believe we should force people to make specialized cakes for gay weddings. I support and love gay people. I just feel like if there is a gay person who goes to a an anti gay baker they shouldn't give them their business. I want to fucking know which businesses I shouldn't support so they can fail and be irrelevant. But I got banned for this view. Please explain to me r/gaybros why I am wrong or why I should have been banned for being ""bigoted"" because I dont think my view is bigoted at all. I think it's just taking an economic stance against injustice instead of a governmental. Because I think enough people think being gay is cool. But if I'm wrong let me know.",gaybros
"Thirsty Thursday September 06, 2018","What are you drinking, bros? Share your latest finds or homebrew creations.
",gaybros
I was wrong about the gym.,"I’ve always been a slim guy, and had never stepped foot inside a gym because I had ZERO idea what to do. I thought there’d be all these hypermasc beasts there laughing at me. 

Well a few months ago I was inspired to start hitting the gym and I fucking love it. There’s no big buff wankstains there at all, it’s just normal everyday guys and gals. I have so much fun getting stronger and feeling myself improve. 

I’ll never be a mesomorph and I accept that, but I feel so much better, I walk taller, my posture has improved, I’m sleeping better and I’m starting to see little muscles form and catch myself in the mirror and think “fuck, is that really me?”

I’m 32 now and I just feel silly for waiting for so long. I want to be as healthy as I can be for me and my boyfriend so we can continue our adventures when we’re old and grey.
",gaybros
I want to be in love again ...,The sappiness of the above is not lost on me. Something about being in a relationship that I miss though.,gaybros
That moment when....,"Someone who made fun of me for being gay in high school before I found out I was actually gay slides into my DMs 10 years later

Oh how the tables have turned.....but also not today Satan. ",gaybros
More GayBROS on Snapchat!,"Looking for some awesome, chill people to snap and chat with! I'm 27 [almost 28] and I'm a hairdresser &amp; muscle-manipulation specialist for massage therapy. Currently live in D-town but moving to Orlando next year. Super fan of Disney, WWE, and horror movies! 

Add me or drop your snap name below : TJxSinger ",gaybros
I just got my heart broken!,"Hello fellas!

I don't know how to get over an illusion I created and allowed other to contribute.
I met a guy a few weeks ago and we started to get along,we were trying to know each other and all that stuff,he told me he was very interested in me,unfortunately we recently had a couple of bad moments but we talked about it and ""fixed them"" so we were ok again, suddenly,he started dating another guy and they're all the time in front of me,he doesn't even care I'm right there,he doesn't care about me at all. He just forgot about me completely. 

How can I deal with this? As stupid as it may sound,I started to have some feelings for him and seeing him with that other guy is torturing me.
",gaybros
What are your favorite movies with homosexuality themes?,"Recently watched Brokeback Mountain and I was so moved and impressed by it that made me think what other movies with the same theme I can watch. I've already watched Call Me By Your Name, Moonlight, Mulholland Drive, Blue is the Warmest Color, and Dallas Buyers Club. 

But I'd love to get more suggestions and I hope you guys would help me out with this. 

(Btw, I've written about Brokeback Mountain, feel free to check it out: [https://thefilmera.com/2018/09/04/brokeback-mountain/](https://thefilmera.com/2018/09/04/brokeback-mountain/) )",gaybros
Fortnite anyone? Wanna build a gay squad?,,gaybros
I'm I strange for wanting gay friends?,"Happily married Gay male here.
Coming out for me was difficult but definitely not the worst. Family was disappointed and gave off a feeling of disowning/mourning to the situation.

I never had gay friends that knew I was gay. I have always wanted a group of gay friends. My husband says it's strange that I want gay friends especially when I say that I would rather bearish gay guys. ""why do they have to be gay/bears ""?

I ask myself the same thing, I don't have to have gay friends or for them to be bears. I guess when you have friends in real life and online that you can only assume they are straight, over the period of knowing them, make remarks ever so subtly that leave an impression that will never go away. That you can never come out to these people. 

I have ""come out"" in general conversation to online friends before but they always just dissappear. 

I guess I want gay friends and in the vein of bears so I don't have to deal with that sort of rejection over and over again and can relate to on a closer level - interests. 

Friends I have made from steam groups always are looking for dating situations. Then when I tell them I'm married they drop it like it's hot?
I have never led anyone on if that's a question coming.

Am I weird for wanting such a typecast friend?

Beers gaming and pizza are a +. ",gaybros
I came out to my mom today," After months of mental fights with myself I decided to came out to my mom. 

It was going so well until she said that if she knew sooner, I could've gotten male hormone injections to be normal.

I'm having a mix emotion between disappointment and sadness.

Edit: I just got a message from my dad saying that he always knew and that even though he is sad he still loves me. I feel uplifted right now.",gaybros
Wanna go to a day club/bar,"I'm moving to a bigger city in a couple weeks and I learned that they have a couple popular place there. But I'm not much of a club person. I dont danfe, much less drink so it's odd to wanna go really. If I can be honest. I wanna go so I can find a friend.. with benefits. Or more. I dont know where to meet gay people. And I'm getting tired with grindr. Plus I'm not photogenic. I get more compliments in person and I like face to face communication more. 

But at the same time I hear stories about men being very forward and hands on when meeting you and I feel like I'd be very weirded out by it if it happened. ",gaybros
"Anyone have any experince with ""NURX"" at getting PreP?","Just signed up and trying it out since I never have time for traditional doctor hours. Just wanting to make sure no hidden fees, etc",gaybros
Gay Football Player’s Touchdown Highlights the Importance of LGBT Athletes,,gaybros
Some of my friends think it’s okay to use the F word... (rant),"Some of my straight friends have been talking about the new Eminem album, and when they asked why I haven’t listened to it yet, I basically told them that I don’t support hate speech such as using the word ‘faggot’. 

They continued to say that Elton John endorses Eminem, so I should be okay with it. They also continued to say that the word ‘faggot’ in Eminem’s context means ‘stupid’ so I shouldn’t be taking it so seriously.

I tried to explain to them that Elton John doesn’t speak for everyone, and it was offensive to use a gay slur as another meaning for the word ‘dumb’ and how devaluing it is. I even explained that this same logic wouldn’t work if the person was black and the N word was being used.

Basically, they now say that I’m creating something out of nothing and I’m just offended for not understanding rap culture. So as of today, I’m no longer talking to these friends and I’m finding new ones. ",gaybros
"So, about Southern Decadence...","Yeah, so, I'm not sure this is the place to put this but I just need to talk to someone about this. I didn't know Southern Decadence was a thing. I ended up in New Orleans over the weekend for a completely unrelated thing. Got lost walking through town trying to find my hotel sometime after midnight and wound up in a crowd of barely dressed guys. It was amazing, I have never seen so many gorgeous, sexy guys wearing so little in the same place. I'm back home now and I can't stop thinking about it. Thanks New Orleans, I'll be back next year. ",gaybros
2 year old relationship ending.,"Hey bros, just looking for some advice or someone to talk to about this or perspective, I'm not sure. Been dealing with lots of emotions and whatnot so if I leave something out or you have questions, don't hesitate to ask for clarification. 

So basically, my boyfriend and I recently decided to call it quits. We've been through a lot these past two years. We really came out to the world while dating. We moved across the country together. Since we broke up, I'm going to be moving back home because I cannot afford to really live here on my own. I could find a roommate, but honestly, I think moving back home for a while might do me some good. We've had our ups and downs, lately a lot of downs. I went through something at the beginning of the year, legal issues, and things really weren't the same since. 

I recently went through a bit of depression due to stress from the legal issues and work in general. I admit my sex drive went way down and I really felt myself spiraling into a state of mind where I was just trying to work and make money and not much else. I am on probation so I quit drinking and quit smoking weed (Colorado) but I still tried to engage with friends that were doing that still. As time went on, he continued to go out with friends and do these things and slowly I stopped getting invited. I would stay at home while he did these things and I did lots of house duties, taking care of the dog, working, stuff like that. A little over a week ago is when we decided to end it. He said how he isn't 100% happy anymore and he wants to travel and do things, where as I am more of a homebody. He also said that he agrees that he is selfish and I am selfless. I have really been trying to focus on my mental health lately and trying to educate myself on real life issues and trying to be better in the world. 

Sorry I know this is a lot of random information and all over the place. We mutually decided to end it because I do agree with him, we have different goals right now. He's always been financially stable and I've always had to work really hard to achieve my goals. We are still living together currently. I plan on moving back home in a few months once my class that I'm taking is over. I really do love him and always want what's best for him. For the first couple of days I was in a state of sheer disbelief and confusion. I am now thinking more clearly but still sad. I'm not really sure exactly what I'm looking for in this, maybe someone who has had a similar experience, maybe advice on how to handle everything. If anybody wants to PM me I will gladly expand on everything since I know my thoughts are kind of all over the place. Just looking for someone to talk to I guess. Sorry if this is too long or too incoherent or not the right place to ask. But if anyone has anything to offer up, please let me know.",gaybros
anyone here a highschool teacher?,"I'm graduating highchool in very very soon, and highschool teaching is a career path that i'm super considering. My grades are definitely high enough to get into the uni course and everything, but literally the only thing i'm worried about is my sexuality...

I'm rather effeminate and am kinda worried about this/my sexuality being a problem should be a teacher... Does anyone have any experience in the field to tell me that (if...) I'm being irrational?",gaybros
New Zealand LGBTQ Police Car,,gaybros
"Workout Wednesday September 05, 2018","Share your fitness goals, regimen, and brag about your progress or latest accomplishments! 
",gaybros
Is Durex play feel good lube?,"Is Durex play feel good lube? What do you think? Did you ever try it, and did you like it? Or would you recommend other lube? If yes, what lube would you recommend for masturbation if you're circumsised? Or is it better without lube? ",gaybros
Going to a group jerk session tomorrow. Is this weird? Has anyone else done this?,I signed up for this via another site.  Looking forward to it but still kind of nervous and feeling strange.  It's strictly a jerk off event.  No sucking or penetration.,gaybros
HIV - risk debate.,"So having a debate with a mate.

Scenario:

Two guys barebacking, they are regular fuck buddies. They both say they are being exclusive but won't commit to a relationship. 

Neither of them are on prep and basing their choice on trust alone.

*My mates view is - This is fine, you eventually have to trust someone and take their word for it, so pending trust you go for it.
*My view - That's insane, get prep at least.

I'm trying to find an article that shows HIV statistics, I'm sure I've read that most cases are between people who know one another....

Anyone got any recommendations?

",gaybros
What’s the classification for thick guys 🤔,"I search “bear” and all I find is like ginormous guys which is fine but not always for me, I search “otter” and it’s just jocks with hair. How do you classify the guys that aren’t skinny? The boys with thick thighs 😛 ",gaybros
I don't know how to tell my friends that I'm gay.,"So, I've finally come to terms with being gay and I am very proud of the person I am, but I don't think my friends would be as proud for me.

I have straight male friends who are homophobic. One will complain about seeing gay things in social media and is ""tired of gay people trying to shove their lifestyle down other people's throats."" Another will complain about a gay-related commercial they see on T.V. and angrily say that ""America is trying to implement gayness on everyone."" That one actually made me laugh.

I have another friend who told me he heard about a distant friend of ours from high school had come out, and then proceeded to make fun of him for being gay. Another friend made it a point that making fun of gay people is a sort of cool thing to do, and anyone who doesn't play along with the insults isn't cool. Example: ""Fuck gay people, I don't like faggots hahaha, right guys?""

I'm having a hard time deciding if I should still remain friends with these people. They are generally good people despite the prejudices they feel towards gay people.

Are their judgments a deal breaker and I should find some new friends? Or should I give them a chance to come around once I come out to them?


I will admit that I am leaning more towards cutting them off because while they might not say insulting things about gay people around me after I come out, they might still be talking shit when I'm not in the room.",gaybros
What’s the most romantic gesture your partner has done?,I’m just a hopeless romantic who wants to hear some stories. :) ,gaybros
"On How We ""Come Out""","Whatever parents may say, I wonder how much of their upset over a son's ""coming out"" as gay is due to fear that they'll never see grandchildren or posterity of some sort. If that's a cause of their upset, then I wonder if a gentler and more sympathetic (if also still ambiguous) way to begin to come out in some cases might be to find a good occasion and the right words in which to say that one has more hope of being a good uncle than of being a father. In other cases, I wonder if it would help to say that one feels more hope, more ability, or more urgency about making some lasting contribution in the community, in academia, in the sciences, or the arts than about doing so by being a parent.

Does this outlook help at all? In general, however we come out, it just seems we would have better results if we took care not to *seem* to come out as nihilists.

Please be wary of any urge to try to ""crush"" my remarks by downvoting them. The urge to crush what we don't like and don't understand is part of what we're fighting here. I've posted my remarks in r/gaybros  because I think redditors here are more reasonable than those in some other subreddits.

*Edited to add:* I've read your comments, which were all useful to think about; thank you. I don't have anything to add right now.",gaybros
Gaybros Book Group - Vote for the Next Read,,gaybros
it's my birthday tomorrow and I want to share my first sexual experience :),,gaybros
Fraternity Brothers,Once a week my chapter has a meeting we’re we discuss events coming up and business that we have to take care of and it’s the one time a week we get (mostly) everyone there. At the end of said meeting we have what’s called “good and welfare” where we basically talk about anything big that happened to us or just little things about our lives that we want everyone to hear. When it got to my turn I told everyone that I now have a boyfriend and they all started clapping and cheering and honestly it just made me feel warm and fuzzy and smile like crazy. I love these guys so much and I’m so glad they’re supportive. ,gaybros
Fell for my best friend,"So I ended up falling for my best friend. I don’t know what to say other than that, but in some ways I thought he felt the same way. He didn’t know that I was gay and in a way he encouraged me to accept my self for who I was. If it wasn’t for his kindness and compassion I probably would have stayed in the closest much longer. He just said and did so many things that made me feel like he was into me.  He would tell me he loves me immensely, and that I’m the most important thing in his life,  and that he’d do anything for me. And on top of that he’d always make jokes about wanting to sleep with me. At his birthday he told his entire family and friends that he had stole my heart. He swears up and down that he’s not into to guy’s but it’s just hard not to feel like he was into me. He never really tried anything physical but he did do a couple things that were abnormal. We went to a concert once and he started dancing on me and “accidentally” rubbed himself against my hand. At my brothers birthday party he laid on my lap while we all watched a movie and when he got up he gentle put his hand against my face. He did a few other things but I’m not gonna list them all. So he ended up moving 16 hours away I drove with him and than flew back home because he didn’t want to drive alone and I’m the closest person to him. The last two days of the trip he was incredibly rude and snappy. He barely talked to me, and I just didn’t understand why. After he dropped me off at the airport he texted me and explained that he had just been stressed and was so upset about me leaving he didn’t know what to say. That week after he left I came out to my family who took it well for the most part, and that Friday I told him how I really felt about him. He said he loves me just not in that way, that he’s straight. He was kinda hesitant about it tho. He went on about how he wants me to come visit him and that I’m always gonna be his best friend. That nothing will ever change between us. But he was offended that he wasn’t the first person I told and he said he knew all along. After everything he did and the way he acted it was hard not to feel led on. He’s barely made an effort to stay touch now, over the last 12 days he’s text me once to say happy birthday. Which is weird when we talked everyday before. He doesn’t talk to me and I’ve gotten to the point where I’ve stopped trying to keep in touch myself. The thing is I still love him and think about him a lot. I’m having hard time letting, he was the first one I ever truly loved and more than anything he taught me how to love myself. Sorry for the long rant but I needed to get all this out, I’ve tried talking to family about but they don’t get it. Thanks for the support ",gaybros
Gay bars with straight friends,"Hey y'all, I'm looking for some advice. I somewhat recently broke up with my bf and have been looking to enjoy my new bachelor life and trying out some gay bars (I just moved to DC) in the area. The problem is: almost all of my friends are straight males. My best friend (good-looking guy, makes a great wingman) is typically open to the idea, but every time we go out, he gets relentlessly sexually harassed. He's (understandably) getting less and less willing to go with me. Is there anything we can do to make these nights better? Or DC folk, are there any particular bars I did try to go to or try to avoid? Thanks in advance for any advice!",gaybros
Going to a gay club alone? Advice please,"So I am newly single for a couple weeks now, and I really have maybe 1 friend who I hang with who is a heterosexual female, so she I don't always like dragging her around to gay events, that would be a bit selfish. But staying indoors recently, is causing me to think too much of my past relations with my ex, and I NEED AIR! I need to get out, dance, drink, and just have a good time. I am not going here to make friends or a relationship. Its the scenery I want, just to forget and hear the music. I am a little afraid I will look creepy if I am uncomfortable. Has anyone ever done this? Advice on overcoming taking myself out would be nice. I'm not sure a club is the right place to go alone, but right now, I'm not sure I have another choice without a gay buddy who's over 21 :( ... I don't really want to choose a bar, my ex goes to a lot of gay bars &amp; I don't want to bump into him, at least not alone. and that'd be the last thing I want, sitting at the bar looking lonely! Is there maybe somewhere else I could enjoy the music, and not feel so creepy without a large group?",gaybros
Where to meet people?,"I’m a 20 year old gay guy who recently came out. I’m not looking for a relationship or anything like that. I just want to meet and talk to people who I can relate too. I need friends who have similar issues that could help in this part of my life. I’m new to this so I don’t know where to start to meet people, and If anyone has any advice I’d really appreciate it. Thanks ",gaybros
Double Down Drag Race,,gaybros
I’ll get a lot of hate for this but I have a cheating fetish.,"Title says it all. Anytime I’m in a relationship I just wanna fuck everyone. When I se a guy in a relationship I always wanna fuck them too. Idk why it makes me so raging horny. 

Anyone else relate?

Update: my partner and I are semi open, meaning we do fuck around together but he typically is the dominant one and wants to be in charge of who we play with. Although, honestly if I came home with a load up my ass he probably wouldn’t be upset at all. However, I typically and more turned on when he wouldn’t know.",gaybros
Denver Gaybros Lake Day!,,gaybros
I guess I’m out,"I’m sick of the bullshit, so I just posted pics of my boyfriend and I on Instagram and Facebook. My parents are crazy Trump-addicts, and they cry every night because I came out 4 years ago. Both still don’t “believe it.” So I decided that I don’t give a shit, and I’m just going to do my thing. Sorry for the ramble. I’m a couple of gin drinks in, and I just dgaf. Love y’all. 

Edit: I say Trump-addicts to paint a picture. These people are Infowars believers, and they think Fox News is too liberal. Like...they wake up and take crazy pills every morning.",gaybros
"A wig snatch with a Twist (""Insatiable"" on Netflix)",,gaybros
Illinois gay bros,Any fellow Illinois gay bros here?,gaybros
"Table Tuesday September 04, 2018","Bros, what is on your table this week? 

Share your latest culinary creations and food porn! Stories of failed attempts are also welcome.
",gaybros
An unusual encounter,"TL;DR I had an unusual encounter with a straight man while at work and just wanted to share with someone. 

While I’m out to everyone at work I didn’t feel like this story was suitable office conversation and frankly I just wanted to tell someone and get some alternative perspectives.

So earlier on today I popped outside while at work for some ‘fresh air’. There’s a very attractive looking young man sitting on the wall drinking a beer in a patch of sunlight opposite where I’m standing. Obviously I have an admiring look at him, he sees me and we exchange glances a few times, he smiles, swings his legs, raises his eyebrows. I decide to go over to him and say, “You’ve got the right idea sitting in the sun.” This was going to be my excuse if I’ve horribly misinterpreted, I just wanted to enjoy that bit of sunlight too.

We chat for a bit which turns out to not be that easy. We’re both from the same place but he’s got a very regional accent and he doesn’t get what I’m saying sometimes too, we muddle along but sometimes it seems like we’re having different conversations. We talk about what we each do, I work in an office, he’s a painter that usually works on building sites. How much he’s had to drink, just half a beer. The fact that he lives with his mum still and his nonexistent love life. 

From the off I had a ‘straight guy’ vibe from him. From our conversation it seems increasingly clear that he is in fact (predominantly) straight. So there it would have ended, me attempting some mild flirting with another irresistible straight guy were it not for one thing. 

Our somewhat stilted conversation is punctuated with several periods of extended eye contact. It doesn’t sound like much but towards the end of our encounter we were gazing at each other straight in the eyes for a solid six seconds. He’s also repeatedly  and suggestively, or so I thought, doing a quick up-down ‘eyebrow flash’.

For some reason I can’t remember (the conversation was confused at points) he says that I can, “do what I like”. So I put my had on wall close to his leg, he looks at my hand and seems unfazed. I put my hand on his leg above the knee and ask if I can do that. He replies, “I don’t mind”. I move my hand up to his mid-thigh and ask, “But do you like it?”

“No”, is his clear reply. I remove my hand and say, “Well if you don’t like it I won’t do it. Sorry, I misread some signals there.” Throughout all this he continues to seem entirely unbothered and simply says not to worry about it.

We chat for a short time later but obviously the frisson is gone and I need to be getting back to work anyway.

Basically I’m wondering what the hell was going on there? My best guess would be that he liked being liked but when it came to something actually happening it wasn’t for him. This being the #MeToo era I do have a bit of a worry that I’ve sexualised what ought to have been an unusual but charming encounter with a stranger. That eye contact though.",gaybros
Fantasy football league,"Hi bros,

Looking for one more player for my gaybros fantasy football league. It’s a PPR league and the draft is tonight at 9:30 PM EST. Message me your email address if you’d like the spot and I will send you the league invite. ",gaybros
I find myself funny,,gaybros
I'm an idiot for getting my hopes up,"So basically I've been talking to this guy on Tinder for few days. We exchanged our phone numbers finally because I actually like him.

He asked for my dick pic and I sent them. After few dickpics he called me. We talked about a lot of things and I think he's fapping while talking to me because I heard him moan few times. He told me I'm his type(sexually).

After we ended our call he texted me asking for one last dickpic because his sister is cockblocking him. 

After I sent him the dickpic he didn't reply but he read it. I texted him at midnight because he told me to continue our business at midnight but he didn't read it. 


I don't even know what to feel tbh lol. I watch his Instagram stories on purpose to remind him of me haha. I'm crazily depressed

Note: I really want to talk to someone about this but my friends are busy with their school &amp; work so I don't wanna disturb them",gaybros
"Is ghosting bad? I ghost a lot of people and get ghosted by some as well. It makes me upset to get ghosted and I don’t think it’s ok at all, like I feel bad for ghosting people.","By ghosting I mean, talked to you on grindr, traded nudes, perhaps made plans and or added you on snap, but left you hanging in someway.

Thoughts?",gaybros
I can’t tell if I’m attracted to someone until I smell them. Anybody else have the same experience?,"So, for a few years now, I notice that my attraction to guys is made or broken based on how they smell. Someone can be my picture-perfect type...but if they smell wrong, it’s a total no go. Also, if a guy isn’t my usual type, but smells amazing...it’s on. And I’m not talking about cologne, or deodorant, or any synthetic scent. Guys either smell like my people, or don’t. Anyone else have a similar experience?",gaybros
Ok gaybros...this is my first time sharing my music. Tell me what you think!,,gaybros
I think I'm falling for a guy I barely know,"Hey M, if you read this, I am really sorry for being a weirdo.

&amp;#x200B;

So about me, I'm a 20 year old student, just moved into my own place in the city for college. Probably considered a 6 on a really good day (not looking for any compliments or whatever, just saying it since it's kinda relevant). I go on Grindr every now and then, mainly just for chats, I rarely meet guys. 

&amp;#x200B;

So the other day I was on Grindr and found this super handsome guy. He has a beard, nice dark eyes and a hairy chest, exactly my type. He's only two years older than me. He's also way out of my league. I saw that he put his Pokemon Go friend code in his bio, which I thought was great since I hadn't seen it before and it means he's into Pokemon, which I am as well. He's new in my city, and not even from this country so I hit him up asking if he's down to play Pokemon Go together while exploring the city. He's actually interested and says he'd like that, he just needs to get a phone plan before he can go out. 

&amp;#x200B;

We chatted a bit, but it was me who had to ask the questions every time, he didn't seem that interested. That was probably because he didn't know who he was actually talking to, since I didn't have a profile picture (I'm not out yet, though I send one if someone asks for it). For me it either goes two ways, they block/ignore me or just continue talking to me, it's probably a 60/40. I was dreading sending him my picture since I didn't want him to block me, but I sent him one anyways. I kinda didn't want to check grindr to see his reaction, but in the end he said I was cute, which pleasantly surprised me.

&amp;#x200B;

While all of this is happening I've been talking with a friend about this situation.

&amp;#x200B;

So we add each other on Pokemon Go and I noticed his username. I'm usually quite curious, so I google his username to see if I can find anything of his. I couldn't find anything, but his Spotify profile. I kinda snooped around and found out that he likes a lot of artists that I also like. Plus he also seems to be really into Eurovision, and seeing that he's not originally from Europe, that's quite a big deal. I'm also really into Eurovision, so obviously I start to like him even more. 

&amp;#x200B;

We chat a bit and I ask him for his actual irl name, and he gives it. For some reason I decide to google his username and his irl name (it is quite a common name), and to my surprise I find his ""personal"" tumblr. I was kinda busy at that moment, so I give my friend his tumblr because she also likes to snoop around and be creepy. After she snooped around a bit, she found a lot of stuff about him, basically only good stuff. He seems to be into the exact same tv shows, music, movies, even guys as me. At this point I'm kinda starting to feel butterflies, since he just seems so perfect to/for me.

&amp;#x200B;

While my friend and I have been creeping on him, our conversation ran dry. He didn't really ask me anything, he just answered my questions. It feels like he really isn't interested in me and that sucks.

&amp;#x200B;

My friend tells me to actually just give him a couple of times/dates I am free and just meet up with him and grab a drink or something. That's probably the best idea, I'm just afraid he'll reject me or it won't be like I expected. I just love the idea of him, I kinda don't want to ruin that.",gaybros
Bay Area Bro’s,"Hey Bay Area Bro’s! I was recently transferred to the area and super excited about it, but without many friends it’s getting a little boring a little fast. The husband is moving to join soon so I’m sure that will help some but then we will both be looking to make friends and find new things to do. Our plan right now is to live in the city since that is where the action is. My job is in east bay and I’m sure he will find something either in the city or close enough. Guess I’m just seeing where all the Bay Area bro’s are at and if y’all want to hang out some time. ",gaybros
Underwear recommendations,"Hey guys, I was wondering if any of you have recommendations for good quality, cute, not-too-expensive underwear? I am not someone who’s ever owned nice underwear, and I honestly don’t even know where to start. I’m not at all interested in the super flashy “gay” underwear from places like Andrew Christian, and my only other point of reference is Calvin Klein which is a bit out of my price range. Any suggestions?

Edit: I’m in Canada. ",gaybros
Had a very bad day today,"4 months ago I met a guy and we kept talking for almost a month, but he was so demanding and possessive I had to end it, and I didn't bother to talk to him about it so I just blocked him on everything.
Thing is.. because I'm such a good human being.. i decided I should apologize to him and so i did today. He replied and said it's find and we can be friends now if i wanted. We met today and had nice day until around 10 pm where we had a few drinks, and he kept trying to get so close to me by touching me and kissing my hand and i was so drunk I couldn't do anything other than shaking my head and saying No. he didn't understand and he kept trying and he even played a song for Sinatra that goes ""I can't take my eyes off of you.. you're so good to be true"" and he kept pointing at me while singing it. I fell asleep cause I was so tired and drunk and i woke up 30 minutes ago, did my best to wake my ass up and leave that shitty place and now I'm home. Don't know what to say but I just feel a bit betrayed.",gaybros
Performance issues,"Hey everyone. Been seeing this guy for about a month now, not official, but it's getting that way. 

When we do have sex (pretty frequently), I can only finish about a third of the time. I enjoy everything that we do, and am fine not finishing myself, but I can tell it may be getting to him. I can get myself off when I'm alone, so there's no physical medical reasoning behind it.

Wondering if anyone else has had this issue in the past and how you helped overcome it (no pun intended).",gaybros
Slightly over supportive mom,"I love my mom, but anytime I have a guy friend over after they leave my mom always asks if I'm into him. Any guy. Then when I say no she asks if they're gay as well and they usually aren't. It's embarrassing to even admit to friends that I'm into someone but it makes me feel silly when I admit to my mom I'm into someone. I'm not mad at her or anything, it's just embarrassing lol. Anyone else's mom or dad a little too supportive?  ",gaybros
"Houston, TX Gaybros","I keep seeing all these other cities having some fun with fellow Gaybros. Is there anything like that in Houston, TX?  Anyone that would be interested in getting together and make it happen?

",gaybros
What was the worst sexual experience you've ever had?,"Or even ""close calls"" where something bad could have happened but thankfully didn't. ",gaybros
Hair trimmer?,What hair trimmers do you guys recommend. I'm very hairy in the ~nether~ regions and while I don't wanna be baby smooth down there I want to be neat and groomed.,gaybros
Is this legit? Serious question,"EDIT: Scam averted. Thanks everyone for being helpful and advising against (not that I was going to anyway)!

A , rather attractive, guy on Grindr wants me to signup on this website before meeting, but it asks for credit card information...

Has anyone heard of this or used it?

https://www.safeonlineencounters.org/cpo/register25.html",gaybros
Gaybros Book Group,"So we used to have an active book group but it's been silent for a few months. I'm hoping to get it going again and if you want to join in, please head over to the post I just put on the sub and add a comment.

[Post in the book group sub](https://www.reddit.com/r/gaybrosbookclub/comments/9ckvke/restart_the_club/)",gaybros
"Me Monday September 03, 2018","It's that time of week again! Introduce yourself!

**Name:**

**Age:**

**Location:**

**One interesting thing that happened this week:**

**Photos:**

**Social Links:**
",gaybros
Commando bros?,Today I forgot to bring extra pair of undies to the gym so i just went commando in my shorts. It has never felt this good. ,gaybros
How do you guess someone's position in bed?,"A guy asked me whether I'm a top or bottom. I told him that I like both and I asked him what's his position. He told me to guess it.

I'm confused whether I should start douching my booty or not.....

Update: Turns out he's a bottom so I don't need to douche my bootyhole",gaybros
Always chuckle at this one.,,gaybros
Unwanted emotions?,"So I want to be single because I don’t think I’ve grown into who I want to be yet, but still, every day, I get stuck in this loop where I feel lonely and helpless no matter how much I tell myself I’m ok and that I don’t need anybody. It’s becoming a problem because when I’m feeling that way I think about how great my friends are and how I’d love to be with them, but that’s impossible cause they’re straight, and it’s not appropriate to think about your friends that way. Idk, have any of you gone through anything similar? Are you currently going through it? Any advice on this would be extremely helpful, I don’t really have anyone to talk this through with.",gaybros
Question: Dating Someone Without Hobbies.,"Hey bros,

&amp;#x200B;

I'm curious what your thoughts are about dating someone who doesn't really like anything.

&amp;#x200B;

At the moment I'm dating someone who's hobby is basically going out to bars and partying on the weekends, other than that he doesn't have any interests and or goals and it makes me feel like the ''goal''. It's also a bit of a turnoff that he doesn't have passion for anything tbh :/ At 38 I don't think partying should still be that big a part of your life. 

&amp;#x200B;

As a steward he only works 3 days out of the week so he has a lot of free time but doesn't do anything with it. 

&amp;#x200B;

Another thing that concerns me is he's been single for so long that I think his hobby is the pursuit of the ''perfect guy''. He came on super strong in the beginning about how he's been waiting for me for 38 years, talking about moving in after 2 weeks etc. But I can see him losing interest now that he ''has'' me because going to the bars and stuff is just going to drink instead of guy hunting. So I feel like for him without that ''hunting'' hobby he doesn't have direction or a purpose and is inevitably going to be bored. 

&amp;#x200B;

For me that whole dating process is a bit of a drag and I would give it up for a guy to do groceries with, watch a movie and just enjoy the company with any day. For him I think it's the opposite, I think he likes the thrill of meeting a good looking guy and seeing if he can land him or something. 

&amp;#x200B;

We have had an undeniable connection from the first time we talked but I'm 99% sure I want to break up (because there are also a number of behavioral red flags). I know I love him and he loves me very clearly but I don't think it's enough. 

He might even do it before me so the point would be moot but I still want to hear what guys with more dating experience think. Maybe it'll help me the next time around. 

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",gaybros
Greater age divides in relationships,"My BF and I have been together over 10years, and there is 18 years difference in our ages.  

Most of out relationship we have spent in different stages of our lives.  We met when I was still doing my undergrad degree, and he was midway through his career, climbing high on the corporate ladder.  Now, after making a career change, I have started in a new career and am at the building stage, whereas he is nearing retirement (still a few years yet, but he has made it clear that he is going for the freedom 55 and not a day longer), and in the stage where he is respected and can take more liberties.  

He gets over double the vacation time I get, works from home often, and when he goes into the office he is working anywhere from 6 to 8 hours compared to my 10 to 12 hour days.  

It’s starting to put some strain on the relationship, but I am sure we can make it through.  I bring this up because it is often not spoken about, particularly in gay relationships.

Anyone else experiencing the effects of having a large difference in age in your relationships?  What other effects is it having?",gaybros
Why do we exist?,Do you ever wonder why homosexuality exists and what process causes it? What logic is there in liking men from a biological stand point? Is it something genetical or does a child's upbringing has any effect in the final equation? Justs some questions I keep recurringly having,gaybros
I am 30 and only been in one 10 year relationship which broke up 3 years ago. I just had a panic attack because a guy flirted with me. Pathetic. Guess that means I am still not ready to date?,"Why did I panic? Tons of insecurities and lots of self-doubt, over thinking. Playing it safe is safer than being hurt again. ",gaybros
So... Oklahoma City(OKC) just installed a huge Cock-ring downtown... (r/pics),,gaybros
Woo go Canada,,gaybros
The usual gay guy loves his straight friend tribute,,gaybros
Finally out.,"Came out to my family and friends, and what a relief. I feel so lucky to have the support of my loved ones as well as you Bros. 

Just wanted to share - and to say I love you all! ♥️🏳️‍🌈",gaybros
"Here’s an hour of hot, shirtless Italian men playing an incomprehensible sport",,gaybros
Great news for all the gaybros in Alberta!,,gaybros
"I bet these guys are actually straight, but a bear can dream, right?",,gaybros
"I chased my own ""it gets better""","Hey r/gaybros.

It's been my 4th day in Canada. Despite living in a city that holds a lot of closeted guys, I finally made it. I'm originally from a country where if you were shot and you were gay, people would be thankful. But, I lived most of my teen life in another country where being gay can get you hanged.

I lapsed back and forth through depression and suicide, I spiraled in absolute pessimistic thoughts, but here I am now. I had to do well in school to make sure I save my ass and get out of my homophobia-filled environment. I almost died in school (hehe if you know the IB then you know what I went through but if you don't then forget about this comment) due to schoolwork just to make sure I can go to a school somewhere in the Western world.

Here I am. I made it -- even if my daily transit to school is an hour and a half away (and also unreliable during the winter due to snowstorms). Even if I'm still taking a wretched Chemistry course for the next two to three years, at least the law of this land has my back. At least someone would cry ""unfair"" if I fell victim to homophobic attacks. At least I can get married here. At least I can live like a normal human being here. At least I can go out with a minimal fear of being judged. At least I can feel human.

I am living with hyper religious people, but even they treat me normally. Like their own son. Better than my own parents probably can. My parents sent me here, using up thousands of dollars. Call me selfish, but my mental state would have completely deteriorated to the point that you all won't even read this rant post. They trust me anyway -- and at least now I can hoe around. I just have to make sure it's during school breaks and my grades doesn't take a hit or else I'll be on the first flight back home.

I can't let that happen.

It's my 4th day already, and honestly I just learned how terrible Grindr really can be (HAHAHAHAHAH oh well). Might as well sniff out the fellow gays™ on campus. Make some friends, get some dick, be the best person I can be.

Anyway this post is sappy as hell. Thank you for reading, I really just wanted to let that all out. I know the toxic gays would probably go off at me and tell me they (or some people) went through hell and back, and I'm not saying that I devalue that, but props to us all for making it this far.

And remember, it gets better. If you don't think it will, then you should put a bit more of an effort to achieve that. Just hold on, think clearly and think of a way out. You will hurt some people, you will feel as if you were selfish, but if you've imprisoned yourself for such a long time -- don't you think you deserve the rest of your life for yourself?",gaybros
*throws ticket away*,,gaybros
How do you meet good dates and which were the best ones?,"How do you meet guys to go for a date? Tinder, Grindr, Scruff, tinder, gay bars or just through friends of friends? And which one is the best way?

I know  this question has been asked dozens of time. For dates I was using tinder for some time. But I noticed there are a lot of time wasters. Matches don't text you, they even don't reply when I text them. What's the point of swiping right if the other person is not even interested? Of all the ways of dates I listed, Tinder is the best so far. But what are your opinions? Is it possible to find someone online and start a relationship or better way is to meet someone at gay bar?",gaybros
Who here is a classical and/or opera devotee?,"I've been a fan for as long as I can remember, but the older I get, the deeper my appreciation gets. I'm keen to see if there are many others around these parts of reddit! 

Are you just a listener or do you play any instruments as well?

Who are you favourite composers?",gaybros
I lost 20 pounds but regained 15. But I'm happy,"So freshman year of highschool I hated the way I looked. So I decided to lose weight. I was 190 pounds reaching 200 and by the end of the year I was at 170 pounds. During the summer I did not do much of anything except stay inside. I then fell off the wagon and started binge eating until I saw that I got back up to 185. One month later I'm in sophomore year and I don't feel as self conscious as I did last year. I started wearing things that I never would have worn because I gel good in them. I still have the occasional ""suck in the tummy and tug at the shirt"" habit but I don't feel like total trash about myself. Highschool made me feel like the only way I would be happy and get noticed is by being skinny. Dear God was I wrong. So in conclusion. Yes I technically only lost 5 pounds but I'm a happier person. ",gaybros
stuff of nightmares,,gaybros
Is it weird for a 25 year old to hook up with a 19 year old?,I’m not interested in dating him but definitely want to hook up. I feel sort of creepy or weird about it but part of me wants to go for it anyway. Thought? We met off Grindr and he is in fact 19.,gaybros
New Subreddit for LGBT in Philly!,"Check it out at r/PhillyLGBT

Always looking for admins, also!",gaybros
Any cool places to check out in seattle?,Visiting town for the weekend. Curious if anyone has any recommendations for bars and whatnot,gaybros
Same,,gaybros
My coworker's son came out to her,"She was watching TV in her bedroom and it went  like this:

Son: Mom I have something to tell you.

Coworker: What's up buddy?

Son: I hate math.....And I'm gay. 

Coworker: Ok. *flips channel*

Son: Don't you care?!

Coworker: Nope. Love ya just the same.

Son: Well that was easy...


He's 12. And his mom's amazing. ",gaybros
Just found out my fav first dates couple got married,,gaybros
"""Go up and ask her out, the worst that could happen is you get a no for an answer.""",But when you're gay you may even get punched in the face,gaybros
"Saturday Songs September 01, 2018","What are you listening to? Share your music recommendations here. 

Spotify, Apple Music, Google Play links are encouraged!
",gaybros
"My interesting day, worth the read.","First, a little background. My name is Justin and I hate everything about homophobes. Although I am not gay, my sibling is. This has not only taught me about the LGBTQ+ community, but it has opened my eyes to the slander and hatred toward the community. My sibling  has been bullied to the point where, this is a little personal so you can make an inference. So because of his and the countless others who go through  this every single day, I simply do not tolerate anything homophobe. 

So my story

I’m selling numerous things on offerup, I consider this my own little side business. And I got a message from a man named Joe. He messaged me saying “hey are you a fa**ot?” . I remained level headed and said “as you asking my sexuality?” And he says “well based on you selling xxx , it seems like you enjoy it in your a*$”. At his point I’m heated , but I try to shed some light on him. I reply saying “actually my sibling is gay and they have taught me so many things about the gay community that I think could be useful to you too. So making these homophobic remarks are not needed at all” , he then says “do you want me to fu** your sibling in the a*$ and make you record ? “. Now , I said forget all this talking, let’s take action. 

I go to his offerup account and find that he has a connected Facebook account. From here, all the information I have is his picture from his profile and his name, Joe. So I type in Joe Cleveland into Facebook, 2,432 results. But that wasn’t enough to give up. After a half hour I find Joe Smith from Cleveland Ohio. I then see his place of employment, so I thought I might give them a call. Unfortunately, they told me that he was just fired for being racist (big shocker). So , I explained the situation to the manager and she tells me that her nephew is gay, and that she will not tolerate this. So she told me that he was employed through minute men agency, so I then gave them a call. After talking to 3 different people, the owner of the company calls me. I explain my situation with evidence , and he said give me 10 minutes. I’m super confused. But then i receive an offerup notification. The guy writes “how did I just lose my job and why do I think you have something to do with it ?”  As I’m replying, minute men call. The owner has informed me that he was fired from the agency (big win), but then he threw me a bone. He said that he is constructing an email to send to every business that they are affiliated with, and that he will be reaching out to every staffing agency within the area to warn them about him (bigger win). 


So , that’s my interesting day. If I’m wrong for what I did, please let me know. Down vote the hell outta me if you have to. But I thought that this was a decent story to share because my sibling told me that this was the best thing I’ve ever done in my life. Thank you everyone for reading :)",gaybros
[NorCal] Good places to have sex in the woods?,From the Bay Area. Planning a camping trip. Prefer low mosquito population.,gaybros
Is lack of sex a red flag?,"I've been dating a boy for three months now. We've haven't had anal sex, but we would do everything else every time after our dates in the beginning. It's now dwindled to not ever doing anything. We've become more serious and he's affectionate with words but not in actions. School just started and he spent the night the whole week because my apartment is 2 minutes away from the school while his house is 30 mins away. 

He's talked about getting an apartment together and he's planning a trip for us on our break. However, we haven't done anything sexual in over three weeks. I try to initiate but he either gets mad or is not into it. I brought it up jokingly that it's been a while and he said ""why are you keeping tabs on that?"" Even with kissing, it's a hit or miss because sometimes he does and sometimes he doesn't. We probably kiss maybe two or three times a day, but it's pecks and not full blown making out.

I know he's not seeing someone else because we've been spending every second together the past few weeks. I'm very worried he might not be physically attracted me anymore. What should I do?",gaybros
Anyone else Exercise just so they can eat more snacks?,"I lost 40 pounds from october to april of this year and am the skinniest I've ever been. I am doing some leg lifts to try and tighten up/tone my torso/arms a little. But I also started running. I run 5 miles-ish at least 4 days a week. On these days, I have extra calories...and I use them on snacks. 😂

Yesterday I had chocolate truffle cookie ball things, and today I'm thinking smores ice cream. 

I know I could lower my body fat percentage, whatever that is, if I used these calories to eat...like...vegetables and plain chicken or whatever, but. Why the *hell* would I eat a vegetable when walmart sells *graham cracker flavored ice cream with marshmallow goo in it?*",gaybros
Am I the Only Bro Who Does this When at Home?,"Just wondering if any other gay bros unzips their fly when they pee or just completely takes off shorts/pants and undies and takes a leak, I find it to be a lot more comfortable when I just pull them down. Obviously not all the way down to the floor but under the desired length  ;)",gaybros
Flirting With Straight Friend,"3yrs ago while watching 007 and after a few drinks, worked up the courage to hold on to my guy friends inner thigh. He didnt really react, we just sat like that for a few minutes. 

Have never come out to him, never done anything more intimate. We were workout partners at one point years ago. 

Any telltale signs here? He's engaged now and i have a gf but I used to have such a huge crush. Unfortunately he's super repressed Christian:/.

Should I tell him I'm bi just to gauge reaction? Or move on since 

we now live in different cities?",gaybros
Dude in the back starting to question his sexuality,,gaybros
Name of an old TV Show? (80s/90s),"So years ago around the 1980s there was this TV show about a woman with blonde wavy/curly hair that would talk about LGBT stuff, she would mostly interview gay people and they had these skits of her speaking to a puppet of a black girl and would explain stuff to her. Also on the screen sometimes it would appear “Lifestyle update” so my question is: 

Does anyone know the name of this show? 

Thanks in advance. 

Edit: here’s a video 

https://youtu.be/f9OQ_mA1BwA ",gaybros
Is this subreddit accepting for trans men?,"More specifically I'm a bisexual trans man. The gay community where I live isn't exactly the most accepting and I have extreme social anxiety and fear due to other men making threats toward me, and I would definitely be scared to meet another man from a dating site.

Is this subreddit trans accepting?",gaybros
Looking for butts... the dance moves,"Hey all.  A couple of videos/gifs floated across this thread and I'm having troubles finding them.  Each was a dude making his butt *move*.  Like, awesome butt-movement.  Usually the title was something related to being a bottom.  The butts were fully covered, I believe the first guy (in the first video) was wearing red shorts while the second guy (second video) was wearing white shorts and a shirt.  
Anyway, I'm looking for those vids.  Everything I search for, butt-dancing wise, keeps landing me on twerking and booty-popping.  Not what I want.  
The first guy was able to make his butt do basically circles, but real slowly, real smoothly.  It was a sight to behold.  The music he was working it to was vaguely Indian, I think.  He was doing a whole dance routine, but it kept coming back to that butt movement.  
The second video/guy was at some kind of outdoor festival concert and there was a black guy in the background losing his shit.  
I'm looking to recreate these moves.  They are hot.  I'm hoping to be able to do them myself someday.  
  
Any of you bros know what videos I'm talking about?  I swear they were right here in this sub...  
  
EDIT:  Video #2 has been located, thanks to /u/MakeItRed.  Thanks bro!  Now just looking for Mr. RedShorts and his amazing Butt.  
EDIT2:  The search is over.  I did the Infinite Scroll until I found the right link in my (extensive) history.  https://www.reddit.com/r/gaybros/comments/94wm9u/yea_his_hat_says_top_but_with_an_ass_and_moves/  ",gaybros
Be careful out there,"Gay men are highly vulnerable to 3 STDs on the rise, and none of them are HIV.

&amp;#x200B;

[https://www.vox.com/science-and-health/2017/9/27/16371142/stds-syphilis-gonorrhea-chlamydia](https://www.vox.com/science-and-health/2017/9/27/16371142/stds-syphilis-gonorrhea-chlamydia)",gaybros
"Any artbros wanna share their work? I enjoy surreal/horror photography, what's your medium?",,gaybros
Wedding in Houston this weekend,"Several months ago someone posted that their wedding was gonna happen this weekend and invited everyone here to go see them. I couldn't find the post, anyone know the details? I just remember that It's supposed to be by the Herman Park Dr area in Houston TX. ",gaybros
Friend-zone Coping Mechanisms,"My best friend is a straight bro. Best friend a guy could ask for. Almost drove across the province to pick me up when my truck started acting up. 

Lately, I’ve been starting to feel romantic towards him. The other day I saw him in his PJ pants just out of the shower and I had to fight myself to not let my mind perverse our friendship. He does not know how I feel, and I do not feel comfortable telling him. I don’t think any good would come of it. 

Other gaybros, how do you cope when you start to catch feels for your straight Bros? How do you distract yourself and not cry to Sam Smith?",gaybros
"PSA We have a sub for your ""relatable?""/""Anyone else...""/""Has this happened to you guys?""","/r/askgaybros

I love you guys, I sincerely do, but lately it feels like agb has been overflowing into this main sub. I like the content, but I like to filter when I'm seeing it too

Just a reminder:

&gt;Gaybros is a network built for gay men who aren't confined to a media stereotype. *We come together around shared interests like sports, technology, and media.* Our subscribers have hosted social meet-ups all around the world.

Sorry for being a bitch tho 💀",gaybros
Someone needed to say it,,gaybros
"Politics Phriday August 31, 2018","**PLEASE NOTE:** This thread's comments will be largely unmoderated. Please participate with the knowledge that offensive and uneducated opinions may be expressed. Please report all comments that break Reddit-wide rules or Terms of Service using the report button. 

A weekly post to talk about anything political going on in the world. 

Please note that Trump-centric conversation IS allowed in this thread but will be removed on other days of the week. 
",gaybros
Cologne / Sexy Smell Advice,"I was curious what kind or colognes you guys think smell great? This guy I am seeing uses Dolce Cabana: Light Blue and it smells freaking great whenever I hug him. Not powerful enough t be overwhelming but enough when close to be like ""damn you smell good."" So what shampoos, colognes, conditioners do you use to smell great? Would like to get something manly smelling, maybe not too citrus like. Also wouldn't want to get Light blue to be a copy cat.",gaybros
Gay Bros Fantasy Football League,"Hey Bros,

Trying to put together a 10 team ESPN PPR Fantasy Football league. Anyone interested in joining? The draft hasn't been set yet but hoping to have it before next Thursday. If interested, please send me your email address so I can send the league invitation.",gaybros
"I wanted to see if others had opinions on a piece of this article that frankly made me upset: “The fear, which I share, is that we won’t contain syphilis among men who have sex with men,” Matthew Golden, director of the Public Health for the Seattle and King County... Read the full quote in article",,gaybros
Bears at Southern Decadence?,"I'm going to my first Southern Decadence this weekend. 

Wanted to know if anyone knows of any good bear bars, or anywhere I can find the big hairy men? 

I've heard about The Bourbon Pub/Parade, but don't know the area well and would appreciate any suggestions. 

Thanks my bromos!",gaybros
Catholic Social Services et. al. against the City of Philadelphia -- Adoption by Same-sex parents reaches SCOTUS,,gaybros
[Question] What do you consider more attractive: tan or pale (like Irish)?,"I'm Irish so I'm a pretty pale dude and I'm thinking about tanning. I personally prefer pale guys, but most people I know prefer tan. What do yinz think?",gaybros
"Is there a difference between hooking up(NSA) and making love to you? To me, there is and the latter is way more fulfilling. Which do you prefer?",,gaybros
Bad day.,"I'm having an extra low day. I'm looking for a kind ear and sounding board. 

Update: I sincerely appreciate all who reached out to me. It helps me a great deal.",gaybros
Any bros playing Fantasy Football?,Never really been a sportsfan but I am playing with my coworkers. Was hoping for a little advice/help.,gaybros
How I realized I was gay - relatable?,"When going to the mall and walking by the underwear section in men’s (at Macy’s) I would stare at the bodies on the underwear packaging lol. I was wicked young, probably around 10. Anyone else? Or what was your awakening?",gaybros
Abandonment issues after my breakup,"I think I'm having abandonment issues or self esteem problems. After my ex broke up with me and had to leave our house, I moved to a flat with a friend. She rented me a room for 6 months. But ofter only 3 months she asked me to look for another flat. She said she realized she needed the entire house to concentrate in her studies, but I was a bit shocked. Then I found another temporal room I am leaving tomorrow. I thought I had a  good relationship whit my flatmates, but just a couple of hours ago I saw them having drinks in a bar. One of them is leaving his room too tomorrow and they were partying, but they din't tell me anything. It piss me off because I invited them to go out for dinner for my birthday. I feel worthless and sad. What do I do wrong? They never complaint I'm dirty, noisy or something like that. I don't know if there is a problem with me and I'm an awful persone of if I'm paranoid after my ex rejected me and I'm just having bad luck with people. Thank you very much for listening.",gaybros
A bit of a flirt,"Last week I was with my best girlfriend at the grocery store.  The check out guy must have been around college age.  A totally cute and hawt twink.  He was slim, tall, had fair hair and cute glasses.  

He noticed that behind my left ear I have a semicolon tattoo.  He said he liked it.  I struck up a convo about it.  My bestie, who was right there, was the one who did the tattoo for me so I got her involved.  He said he was going home (from college here) and was planning to get the same tattoo.

Now, I don’t know if he’s gay or bi or just some cute young guy... but I felt something.  Or, maybe I wanted to feel something.

So I did my best at being chatty and enthusiastic.  He was the same back.

When we got back to my friend’s house and put away the groceries I asked her if she thought he was flirting with me.  She said she was wondering if that was what was going on but wasn’t sure.

I felt butterflies for sure.  I hope I’ll see him again.  I am not really good at flirting or meeting people or hooking up.  What would I even want?  

I know there’s a void inside me... perhaps we all feel it sometimes.  A desire to share something with someone... cuddles and kisses and netflix and geeking out and laughing and cum swapping... the afterglow and holding hands and being fascinated with the web between a cute boy’s fingers.

Reminded me of that Hayden lyric “gotta get out some more, go down to the grocery store, meet someone I’ll adore...”",gaybros
"Thirsty Thursday August 30, 2018","What are you drinking, bros? Share your latest finds or homebrew creations.
",gaybros
Any gaybros here who have lost their mothers?,"My mom passed away earlier this month, and she was my best friend. I’m heartbroken, I feel void... life just feels... empty without her. I miss talking to her. I miss my mom. I’m sorry to be such a downer, but just wondering if any of you bros have lost a parent, or your mom to be specific.",gaybros
The loneliest I've ever felt,"Hey guys, to preface it Im not gonna proofread this (okay maybe a little). 

But, I came out to my mom yesterday. Wasn't the worst case scenario. 
So, yay?
She is very religious and very ""woe is me, woe is me. How did I come to raise such ungrateful kids who don't do anything around the house."" 
I've already told her I'm not religious. She brought that up saying that I don't even go to church and it pains her yada yada yada. 
I was tired of just taking it time after time. 
Aye. 

Something clicked/snapped and the interaction went something like; 

""Why would i believe in a religion that tells me I'm going to hell regardless.""
""Excuse me?""
I looked her straight in the eye and proclaimed the statement above, but slower. 
""If you went to church you won't go to hell""
""It doesn't matter if I go, I'm still going regardless. 
Beca- 
. . .
Because I'm gay.""

We got into a discussion and parted on weird terms. I going to slightly avoid her for the time being. 
And that issue is another post for another day. 

But after, I got ready for bed and laid there for a while trying to sleep. I couldn't because I wanted to tell someone but couldn't think of anybody.
And, it's just sad. 

See, in my mind this kind of thing is too heavy, too much baggage to just unload onto someone. 
I will admit I'm private and hide behind an iron wall due to my past, but I've been trying to be more vulnerable because honestly, I'm just tired/fed up. 
I thought of telling my brothers, sister, my friends, and my best friend but they are straight and can't relate much with this issue. 
I do have a gay friend but, I've asked him out before. He wasn't looking for a relationship. So I agreed, and I'm honestly okay with, being just friends. This happened like 2 months ago and I don't want to overstep. 

I didn't know where to turn. 
I wanna cry it out but it feels like I got no tears. 
All I feel is bummed out. 
TBH, I just want a hug. 

I need to clear my head, Ima go out for a walk. 
Thanks",gaybros
Confusion.,"So. I came out as gay almost three years ago. But as of recently I've had feelings for one woman, and she had feelings for me. One thing led to another and now we're dating. But the problem is I'm scared of any sexual encounter because I like dick a lot.... So uh, how do I break it to her...",gaybros
Hey GayBros!,"
I recently met a gaybro who came out to his family and was immediately disowned.  Its absolutely killing me right now.  I can’t imagine what he’s going through. I’m making it a priority to make sure he knows he’s loved and has a safe place to stay. I just want let you all know that we are ALL here for you.  You are our family.  Whether you need a couch to crash on or just someone to talk to.  A lot of us have been what you’re going through and we understand how you feel. Your life is important and worth living.   Life gets better!  Please don’t ever feel like you’re worthless or without a home or family. Please reach out to me or any other gaybro for help.  We are here for you.  We love you.  You are one of us, and we will help you get through this.  ",gaybros
How to have long-term gay bros?,"Hey, bros! I have a question for you because I’m struggling with building and maintaining friendships with other gay people. My entire friends group consists of straight people. Whenever I meet someone gay IRL I get very excited and (I don’t know if this is the reason, but:) everyone wants to have sex. This isn’t a humble-brag post and sorry because I don’t know how to put it in other words. I have 0 gay friends now and I feel very disconnected and want to be able to hangout with gay guys. 


Actual question:  (assuming you 2 are a gay/bi/pan... man)


1- How do you guys make gay friends?


2- Have do you stay friends in the long term?

I probably sound like a moron to most of you. So if you are offended by this post, please let me know why.

",gaybros
Any Indians here?!,,gaybros
I am simultaniously upset and glad that I don't cum very far,"It's hot when other guys ejaculate to great distances, and it'd be hot if I could too

But at the same time I know it'd be a hassle to clean and maybe not worth it


If I had the choice, though, I definitely *would* prefer to be a long-distance ejaculator",gaybros
Please don't tease me lmao,"Any guys on here still really kid-like? Like, I still fuckin love stuffed animals and playing in parks and shit but I dunno if it's because I'm Autistic and we tend to lean towards kid shit still, so that's why I wanna get some input from some neurotypical (non autistic) guys. I don't really know where else to ask where it's gonna be guys only because I know plenty of girls that still are into toys and stuff lol. I'm not a little or anything, just a guy who still loves kid things like toys, cartoons, etc and I wanna know if neurotypical, non little guys feel the same. 

Also I'm super fucking sensitive lmao please don't tease me. ",gaybros
"Would anyone like to talk? 21 here, fucking lonely as hell tonight. I have absolutely no one anymore.",,gaybros
Lost?,"I realized that after my break up, which is still affecting me, that I don’t feel comfortable in my own skin. I feel socially awkward and uncomfortable around family and anywhere I go with others. My relationship with ex was great because I was able to live the gay culture with friends and places I went to and I was able to open up and feel like myself but I blew that relationship because I finally got a taste of the gay culture that I hadn’t experienced in a long time and ultimately smothered the fire that was between us after finally being happy with someone and the life I was able to live freely. Now I’ve basically crawled into a deep shell and as much as I want what I experienced now, I can’t even push myself to do it because I don’t even feel comfortable with myself... anyone gone through this situation before?",gaybros
[Comic Book Wednesday] Dream Daddy #1 comes out this week! What have you been reading?,,gaybros
Any other gay bros in security or law enforcement?,"I work in private security and recently came ohh to a few of the people I work with. It’s definitely been an interesting experience. All of them acted supportive but I can tell some of them are definitely acting different and weird around me. 

I plan on working in criminal justice/law enforcement of some kind until I retire and I feel strongly about being out, especially in such a  traditionally “tough guy” type job.

Any other out or closeted security or law enforcement professionals on here?",gaybros
Updated Workout Music Playlist,"Hey fellow gaybros,

Just added heaps of new tracks to my not-so-usual gay workout playlist on spotify.  
Some of you may have missed it when I posted it last week so just re-sharing the love 🏳️‍🌈

[Here's the music! Now I'm off to bed 😅](https://open.spotify.com/user/m-chael/playlist/68xQEEGN2s6OMbITpMq6LQ?si=DDLoZzZIQlKRnNMbwAELEw)

&amp;#x200B;",gaybros
Bulking and insecure,"I've started bulking one and a half months ago and now I'm sorta feeling the effects of gaining muscles and fat. I still have my torso pic pre bulking while I was semi-shredded in Grindr. When they ask for more pics or if I meet up with them they suddenly either just block me or behave really awkwardly in bed (not having an erection, being super passive, not innitiating) and I feel so so fat and ugly when that happens.

Like, I'm chubby at best right now and I have pretty large muscles. You can clearly see that I'm muscular. Yet, somehow the slightest of fat makes them cringe and they treat me like some bug they wanna avoid.

It gets me down because I get a lot of attention on these apps but in almost every encounter I get rejected or blocked after I reveal my current body. I basically get that dopamine rush of somebody texting me and then all of a sudden deep frustration. It's a rollercoaster of feelings and it makes me angry.

Should I just outright quit Grindr while I'm bulking or wtf is the deal with people?",gaybros
How do you bros protect yourself for oral sex?,"How do you make sure that when you are going down on a guy, not to catch something like gonherria or syphilis?",gaybros
What’s the weirdest fetish you’ve seen in the LGBT community?,"So I was on tumblr the other day for... scientific reasons... and I ended up in this page about Vore and Transfiguration/Transformation. Now, I have heard of Vore before but never about the latter. Apparently it’s this fetish/kink where you pretend you’ve turned into an inanimate object and get used by someone. For instance, a lot of the posts were about the guy turning into a shoe and being stepped on or having a guy cum on the shoe. 

I have quite a few kinks myself, but I thought this one was definitely pretty out there! I want to clarify that I’m not judging and I think it’s great and almost fascinating that our minds create these fantasies. I was curious to know if you bros have come across similar “weird” kinks (which is totally subjective of course). 

Edit: I just want to clarify that the intention of the post was not to shame people because of their fetishes, and I feel like some replies look like that. The question was not about what we find disgusting/gross, but more about what we find weird. There are clearly things that most of us will find disgusting (e.g. sneakers fetish) but that doesn't make it necessarily weird. Other things, like Transfiguraiton, which is literally impossible to achieve, are what strike me as odd. Anyway, if everybody is in it, it's fine by me!",gaybros
Would you ever pay for sex?,"So a while ago, I saw a gay porn star on grindr, whose name is Rafael Alencar. I've been watching his work since I was 16 or something. Inevitably, I wanna pay my respect.

&amp;#x200B;

So I opened my convo by saying ""Hey I grew up watching you"". And not so long he replied w ""have you checked my bio?"" The bio says something like you can pay to have sex with me. I didn't know what I was after, but sex wasn't it. So I replied with ""Oh no I just wanna pay my respect"".

&amp;#x200B;

He replied shortly after, not recognize my appreciation but with his quote. I wasn't sure how to react so I stopped texting him. I have no problem buying him dinner or drinks, after all he was there for me, among others when I have the need. But does my appreciation of him motivates me to buy a service from him? 

&amp;#x200B;

I've been thinking about this. The answer is no. But I can't say if this decision was me resisting the idea of prostitution, or he's just not hot enough...I have no trouble with people who provides sex service, as long as the person chose to do this with his/her freewill. But is it enough for me to buy service from him? I wanna know how you guys think.",gaybros
Where can I find the best beer and dudes in Denver?,So I’m taking a long weekend and heading to Denver because I hear that there is an amazing beer selection out there. However I also want to know where I can go and support the local gay bars. Looking online it seems that they are pretty spread out throughout the city. Where would be the best place to stay in Denver (hotel or AirBnb) Donovan get both great beer and gay bars?,gaybros
"STDs continue rapid rise in U.S., setting new record, CDC says. Experts say many factors have contributed to the increase, though the biggest one may be less frequent condom use.",,gaybros
"Advice, please","Anyways, this is my first post here. 

A little background, I've known I was gay for most of my life, but tried to get it to go away. I took a lot of shit in school because kids just knew. I wanted to keep it from my family until I moved out, but about a year ago they started questioning because I never dated anyone. I kept dismissing the concersation until my mom forced me into a car ride with her and made me tell her. She was awfully upset, but didn't tell anyone until a few months later I told my cousin. My cousin ended up telling my mom that she needs to accept it because she can't change it, but my mom lost it and told my dad and brothers. That turned into a huge fight. 

Fast forward a year later, my family acts like it doesn't exist because they all agree that I am just ""confused,"" but mom takes every chance she has to belittle me about it and how the Bible says it is wrong and that I have a higher chance of dying from STD's. It's awful.

About a month ago I met a man who I am interested in. We haven't met in person yet, but want to. We both work a lot, so we don't get a chance to talk everyday.. honestly my gut tells me he isn't all that interested because he tends to get very short in the conversations and has trouble replying when he is free. But then whenever I just don't try he sends me these sappy cute good morning texts and tells me he can't wait for a chance for us to go on a date? I just don't know how to proceed with this because one day he doesn't seem like he is into me and the next he sends me gushy things like this... plus it is hard to get him to open up when talking... help lol",gaybros
"Workout Wednesday August 29, 2018","Share your fitness goals, regimen, and brag about your progress or latest accomplishments! 
",gaybros
Out Canadian Olympic Athlete Eric Radford on overcoming bullying and homophobia in sports,,gaybros
Input from the community to help with stigmatization of sTDs through a podcast,,gaybros
Should I use my energy and time on this? Love/lustlife,"I'm a grown ass man, but would you lend me yours eyes and brains for some feedback on my love/lustlife!

So I met this fantastic guy on my summer vacation. His company and the sex might the best I've ever had. He lives in another country, 14 hours by train from me or 1 hours plain ride. He's never moving to my country and I'm never moving to his. I have the possibility to spend a week with him during the new year. I'm not sure if it's wise of me, to spend my energy and time on this project. The ultimate goal in my love life, is to be in relationship and that won't happen with him. But I'm lusting hard for him. 

Ever since I came back from the vacation I've been thinking about him a lot. I've actively been dating and hooking up, to see if I could forget him. So far I've had no luck with that and I'm comparing all my new guys too him. I'm scared I'll just intensify this situation, with planning to see him again.

Should I abort my project of seeing him and focus on my local men or should I go and have a fantastic week with him? 

I can convince myself of both options, so I just wanted to hear if anyone could give me their thoughts on my first world predicament :) ",gaybros
What do y'all think about your partner masturbating?,"I know this could get ugly quickly given the variety of lifestyles represented here, but for those that are in monogamous  LTRs, how do you feel about your SO using porn or jacking off?",gaybros
‘there is a lot that can be done through psychiatry’ if parents think their child is homosexual -The pope,,gaybros
"'We Are Sliding Backward': STDs Hit Record High, Resistant Gonorrhea Emerges",,gaybros
"Hey Bros, Need some Help. Boyfriend's Mother is trying to split us apart","Hi guys. My current SO and I have been together for about a year now. I'm the first guy he's been with. His mother has some mental and physical health issues that need to be addressed, so he lives with her in the basement. His mother was at first generally friendly, giving me hugs and inviting me to family dinners and being very happy about my presence. However this past May, she emailed me, stating that she needs the house to herself soon as she's getting old and she wants no guests in the house, so he and I should hang out somewhere else. Cool. No worries, that can be respected pretty easily. While I was out of town, I sent him letters. 

Three weeks later, however, He lets me know that she's threatening to kick him out of the house for ""not being loyal"" to her. He talks with her and we come to the agreement that officially, no guests are allowed in the house, indicating that she never told him about what she told me. 

Yesterday, he and I were supposed to get lunch together, however as he worked late that night, he overslept. No biggie. I got his favorite dish to go and left it at the front door while both of them were at work, as I am no longer allowed in the house. 

He contacts me later that night, thanking me for the food and how he's looking forward to our date this weekend. (going on a trip, so we are not in the house) 

This morning, at 7:30, I get an email from his mother, stating :

&gt; ""Don't *EVER* contact [SO] or try to communicate with him again ... or me, *EVER* -Leave us Alone""

I'm assuming she saw the food. 

Talked to my Therapist this morning, who said that her mental state probably isn't helping and that she probably has some issues to work with herself, as she seems to be wanting to control him. She's had a  divorce if I remember correctly. She is also his supervisor at work.

Did I do anything wrong? I feel like I did. I'm waiting for him to wake up for his night shift so we can talk about it. 

Thanks for listening. 

**EDIT**: revised a few sentences, added onto what her email said and a few more important facts

**UPDATE**: He's talking with his mother about it. Thanks for y'all and your lovely advice. I hope this turns out well!",gaybros
"If you had come out as a child, how would your life be different?",Would it have been better or worse? ,gaybros
Looking to learn more about LGBTQ+ history,"Are there any websties where I can learn more about the history of the community in detail. e.g Stonewall Riots, HIV, Marriage Equality, Decriminalization ,ect. I've tried googling but I can't find a website with it all collated.

Thanks gaybros",gaybros
Movie Recommendation: Mario (2018),"This month, the movie Mario was released in my city and I got to watch it. 

Here are my thoughts:

The acting is great.
The story is about 2 gay football (soccer)  players who fall in love. The movies also tackles homophobia in sport and other stuff.

It has sweet moments, funny moments , sad moments and happy ones.   

It has also some eye candy (buns but no peen). 

Overall a really really good movie.
8/10. ",gaybros
Anyone interested in playing fantasy football?,"I don’t have enough friends interested in playing to create a full league so thought I might try here. Anyone is welcome, even if you’ve never played before, I’m willing to explain the basics for you (it’s not as hard as you think). If you’ve ever thought about it, or have played before and want to join another league, hit me up! ",gaybros
Gay web series from Taiwan (with english captions),,gaybros
"U S boy, 9, killed himself after homophobic bullying",,gaybros
Am I just unlucky with STD’s?,"I have been out for about 10 months now. Before my coming out I had some sexual encounters with guys (no anal sex), but nothing that much or regular, and before that i have been with girls, got tested every year, never had a STD. And now, even though I can count the guys a had sex with for the last ten months on two hands, always used a condom for anal sex, only once had cum in my mouth, i have had Syfillis a few months ago (only bc someone gave me a bj) and now i have a genital wart on my ass. Like what? 

I know I have to get that feeling of STD anxiety out of my mind, because its not helpful, but now I just feel like as if I even touch an other man’s dick who has a STD with my pinky finger, a STD will automatically flow into my body. I guess it was just a little bad luck and I should use condomns now also for oral sex (nahhhh). Can anyone relate? Is it more common for gay people to catch STD’s than for straight people? ",gaybros
I need some advice for my first third date,"Hey bros, I turned 18 recently so you know I had to download tinder to see how the adult world of dating works with my own eyes. Long story short I met this guy around my same age and we seemed to click immeadiatly so I asked him out for coffee. And I quickly fell for him while talking. we're so compatible and have so many of the same interests so the next day we texted each other almost at the same time when we should have our second date. I was free the next day so we end up going to go see a movie. That was Sunday and now he asked about our third which I'm excited to go on... But now I don't know what to do. I like him a lot and im pretty sure he does too, but I don't know where to go for a third date that can hopefully end in a kiss to seal the deal because I don't want to leave him hanging. Its also my first kiss so I kinda want it to special. So Sorry for the rant, what's your advice bros?",gaybros
How to better engage with my boyfriend and make him laugh more?,"I’ve been dating a really nice guy for a few months now. I like him a lot, and it seems like he feels the same way. We talk all the time, and tell each other pretty much everything.

The problem is that we don’t have very good conversations. When we’re together we spend a lot of time in silence because we run out of things to say. I don’t know if this is necessarily bad, but I just wish we could carry a conversation a little better and engage with each other more.

The other thing is that our styles of humor are different, and we don’t really make each other laugh a lot. He’s kind of goofy and my humor is more dry. I want to make him laugh and make him happy, but sometimes I don’t know how to do that. 

I really feel like the feelings are there, but I’d really appreciate any ideas about how to work on these issues. Thank you! ",gaybros
I am getting it all out of the closet today because I have no money for a therapist TMI WARNING,"Coming out has made me stronger and braver and a better person.  


I've always been the meek little man in the corner. I'd stutter when talking to someone new, I hid all the things I liked because I was afraid of ridicule and I spent all of my youth trapped in the safety of my home around my family, I was happier than most, but also not as happy as I deserved to be.  


My first contact with bullying came at the age of 6, when I started getting fat. Cue 7 long years of bullying and isolation. No real freinds, on 3 separate schools and grades people pretended to be my friends so they could get closer to me and then humiliate me. I was so used to being the object of everybody's laughter I still have a sort of aversion to laughter.  


By the time I was 12 I mirrored some bad examples around me and started to tell homophobic and racist jokes in order to fit in. A desire to be like everybody else, even absorbing some of that hatred in my day to day life. These ""Just Jokes"" that ""Don't mean anything"" would have a huge part to play in my life. One of them was covert and took another 10 years to blow up in my face, the other was immediate. I became a racist teen. Mind you I never acted physically nor harassed other people with these beliefs, I kept to myself, I was shy after all, and my cowardice only allowed me to share this humor in specific places.   


I made my first friend when I was 13 and that was a huge confidence boost. But I was not an easy person to befriend, remember i've been burned many times in the past and for a while he was my only true friend. Even after I moved this person has struggled to keep in touch with me no matter how far away I moved, or dodged him on the internet. But still, no confidence boost was enough to make me new friends, go to parties, talk to girls, or anything like that. I eventually called myself an assexual, I had no intention or desire to be with a girl, though I was still terrified of them. American cinema influenced me on that a bit.  


When I turned 18 I spent some time alone, and I figured out I liked some stuff, I was educated out of my racist and homophobic beliefs but I still repeated some classics like  ""I don't have a problem if you're gay, just don't hit on me"" (ironic to say the least) or ""I have no problem with gays, but the effeminate ones though, ugh"" God I want to punch old me in the face.  


Anyways, I was spending a lot of time with myself and I discovered an unhealthy obsession with Disney Movies, a passion for musical cinema, a love for disco music and jazz too! (but I also was raised as a music snob, and that would take a while to get sorted out, I dismissed any pop diva as an untalented slut who relied on autotune and sex to sell) I became a more loving and caring person and people who my brothers would bring home started to gravitate towards me, calling me smart, sensitive, and a great listener. Being nice and genuine had been such a better strategy to make friends than being mean and nasty, and the people who were around these new circles were so much better and loving and caring too. I was on the right track.  


Come my 20s, still a shut in though my brother's friends were now my friends too. But i never had made a friend on my own, just meeting people through family, and it took a while for my self loathing mind to allow me to realize they wanted to spend time with me too. But as the shut in that I was I discovered a community online of the most varied people, and I started to talk to them, just like I am talking to you now, it's so much easier behind a screen. I met them, I met people from all backgrounds, people with drug problems, rape victims, gay people, furries, and the nicest people you'll ever meet. They tought me so much of the world, and so much of life, that it felt like a waste to pretend to be somebody else irl. So I tried to loosen up. I quickly did my first ""coming out"" sharing some of my hobbies I deemed ""shameful"" and that was okay, it made me feel okay, it made me feel normal. It was a good sensation.  


Then, I got to be great friends with 2 of these people, like, so much that we started chatting directly, out of this forum, though online we're all from different countries. They happened to be gay, and we were playing truth or dare, and I took this oportunity to make a lot of questions about being gay, and that dismissed so much of my internalized homophobia that a little door buried shut deep within my mind was suddenly unlocked. I was now aware that being gay was okay. By this time, I was 23 years old. I started to question my own sexuality, to dig out repressed memories of things I hid, people I found attractive, I took to the internet, watching porn (which I always hated) and now, after 10 years, I was reliving puberty. I who had no sex drive, was horny, I couldn't stop exploring and touching myself and over the process of a year, at the age of 24 I looked in the mirror and said ""I'm Gay"" it took 23 years to go even question my sexuality. 1 year to accept myself. And now I realize what was in the way. It was the passive aggressive cultural casual homophobia and micro agressions from day to day life. All of the faggot calling, gay shaming, ""that's gay"" comments. It made me afraid of me. Afraid to be that. SUBCONSCIOUSLY! And after that I started to live my life in the closet, testing the waters, I'd let slip something I liked that was particular and I deemed embarassing, like musical theatre, or a game, or a lgbt movie and so on. Little by little I was crawling out of the closet. And then I came out to my family, and now. I want to rid myself of all prejudice. I want to see everything with new eyes. I spent 23 years in hiding but no more, I spent 23 years thinking wether or not I should like something because of someone else would think of me but no more.  


Now I everything I do I do like I was living a new life, a life that started when I came out. And now, remember all those repressed memories and opinions, I used to sing and dance around the coffee table when I was 3, I used to wear t-shirts as fake hair, I liked lady gaga but was afraid to admit it to myself because it was ""inferior""  


And now I can't stop listening to Carly Rae Jespen along with Edith Piáf and Ariana, and Lady gaga, and Beyoncé, and Billie Holiday, and Louis Prima, and Ella Fitzgerald and I smile more, I am more outgoing, I am losing weight so I can find my first boyfriend and hopefully lose my virginity (at the age of 25, so many good years gone ;-;) I am calling out casual racism and homophobia because I don't care anymore, I dance at home, I speak my mind, I am stronger, I am braver, I am better now that I love myself enough to have come out of the closet.  This was a rant about casual discrimination and people who justify them as just jokes but it became a full blown mini biography rant because this has been trapped for too long. I needed to say this to anyone, and even if no one reads or replies, I'm glad I took this to the gay\_bros because you were pivotal to my journey of self acceptance. Thank you so much. And if you happened to read this far. Thank you so much.   


P.S. Forgive grammar and punctuation I don't feel like revising this Wall of text.",gaybros
The Irrepressibles - Two Men In Love,,gaybros
"Table Tuesday August 28, 2018","Bros, what is on your table this week? 

Share your latest culinary creations and food porn! Stories of failed attempts are also welcome.
",gaybros
Advice please,"I was here yesterday to vent about how I like a straight guy but now I have a question: how tf do I hide this crush? I'm autistic so social interaction is a mystery to begin with for me and I tried asking the autism related subreddits what to do but well - they're all Autistic so we're in the same boat there. So you neurotypical gays, how tf do you guys figure out someone has a crush on you and how do you hide that you have a crush on someone? Ever since I was little kids would always figure out that I had a crush on a guy and they'd figure out which guy it was so how tf do I hide it? Like, I don't think he'd be bothered at all because the dude is chill af and super nice, but I know he'd tease the hell outta me for it lmao and I don't deal well with embarrassment I just cry tbh.  ",gaybros
What do I tell my friends/roommates when I’m going to hook up?,"I’m pretty close friends with my roommates, and best friends with one of them. We live in NYC. 

When I go to hang out/hook up with a guy, I find myself having to lie or sneak around to avoid awkward questions. 

They’re both straight women, so they ask things that straight people do on dates. (What does he do for a living?, where are his parents from?, etc.) Another one of our close friends is a gay guy. And if he ever hooks up with a guy like that, they talk about it like it’s a serious guy that he’s dating. Like it’s a hook up. Low stakes. We both always use protection AND we’re on prep. 

It feels kind of slut shamey when I tell them that I’m just going over to his place to fuck, and they pull this face of like shock mixed with worry. 

It’s 2018. I have the right to just hook up with a guy, right? We’re all in our mid to late 20’s. How do I tell them that it’s not that big of a deal, and it doesn’t have to be talked about like it is a big deal without sounding like an overly sensitive  whiny bitch?
",gaybros
Is it okay that I don’t want monogamy?,"I just don’t. I’ve come to that conclusion, and I’ve been a lot happier ever since I realized that I don’t need a traditional relationship if I don’t want one.

But still I’ve gotten a lot of shame for it, mostly from other gay guys. I just need to be clear firstly that *I don’t think monogamy is wrong.* It’s perfectly fine and it’s popular for a reason. But it’s not right for me. I just feel way too constricted and suffocated in a traditional monogamous relationship. That doesn’t mean I want to give in to total hedonism and sleep around indiscriminately, because I’m not that way. But sex is fun and I don’t wanna be with only one person in that way for the rest of my life.

And it’s not that I’m incapable of loving someone either. I am, and I have, and love is great. I just don’t think that love and sex have to be exclusive *if you don’t want it to be.*

Is that really bad? Why do I get shamed for that? I don’t judge other people if they say they want monogamy, I just wish them well and look for people who feel the same way. I just wish I understood why people are so judgmental towards it. Less than a decade ago people routinely said gay relationships weren’t legitimate and fake, why is the same directed at me and people like me?

I would just like to understand is all.",gaybros
"Spain is the first country with a masculine rhythmic gymnastics team. Brave people! I think you all, guys, have to know it!",,gaybros
"I fucked up and blew a guy with HIV, he was my first :(","Oh Gay Bros,

I'm 33 y/o but still pretty inexperienced sexually and have only been with a few women, the last was close to 10 years ago. I stumbled coming out of the closet about five years ago and went back in. I finally came out and stayed out about a year ago.

Well, loneliness has finally gotten it's hold on me and I am starting to go out and try to meet people. This weekend, I went to a local gay bar for pride. ""No better time to meet someone!"" I thought.

I made some ground rules before I went out and repeated them over and over to myself so that drunk me would remember. In hindsight, the order is wrong.

1. Tonight is the night I suck my first dick.
2. No sex with anyone that's HIV+, you are not on Prep!

-

Well, I met a handsome older British man at the club and we drank, danced, and once we were both wasted, he told me he was HIV+. I insisted that I would not have sex, especially unprotected because I'm not on Prep! He was clearly not into the idea and continually pushed and whispered his desire to fuck me bareback, but I knew my rules. I was happy to leave it at dancing and kissing.

After dancing together and making out a bunch, the bar closed. ""Just walk with us, we won't do anything"" so I went. ""Come up and smoke with us, nothing else will happen!"" and I followed, what could be the harm in a little weed and conversation? 

When it came time to leave, ""let's take a shower and you can wash my back,"" again with assurance that nothing else would happen.

In the shower, he was more forceful. He did not abuse me or anything, but he pushed my head down to his cock and I put it in my mouth. I was so excited for this moment for so long, but this was not what I wanted and he was very rough and fucked my face. I stopped him after a minute and he sucked me for about 20 seconds, but whatever magic was there before, was now gone. Neither of us had cum.

I left shortly after and let him know that he was too pushy. I was clear where my line was all night.

- 

That was Saturday night (Sunday morning), today is Monday and I am freaking out. I was able to get PEP and took my first dose 36 hours after I performed oral on him. I know that the odds of contracting HIV from performing oral with out ejaculation are pretty low, and PEP lowers the odds even further, but my panic will not go away. 

But the odds feel incredibly high once you are facing them. I just can not let myself relax and forgive myself. Today, I have gotten symptoms of a sore throat and a very low fever (99.2) and now I'm really loosing it. 

-

My hope is that talking about it with someone will ease my stress, but I also want to give my story as a word of caution. I've waited my whole life because of fear and anxiety and the first time I acted on something, it went as bad as it could have.  Make your rules while sober and not horny make them conservative!  The thought that I ruined my life over a momentary lapse in judgement and over a guy that I really only liked because of the accent is tearing me up. There is no rush, it doesn't have to be TONIGHT, it can be tomorrow, next week, next month, whatever it takes for you to stick to your rules, especially in the heat of the moment.

Pray for me Gay Bros, I fear that I will need it.

XOXO",gaybros
Do you ever feel like everyone is against you?,"A bit of a rant, but Im just tired of trying only to feel further alienated by people. I really feel like I dont fit in with any groups Ive tried, and Ive tried a lot. I feel broken, and Im not sure how to fix myself anymore. Every time I try to do something for self improvement or a positive act, i get shit for it or no acknowledgment as a person or even a thank you. If you can relate, how do you fix this mindset/feeling?",gaybros
Interesting caveat of being gay...,"Do you guys ever get, like, insanely and primitively jealous at other guys when you’re browsing through subreddits or porn? Everyone’s literally so amazing to look at and their lives are phenomenal compared to mine. I mean, they’re hot but I just get super duper jealous of other men. ",gaybros
"Every one of my friends' weddings kills me a little more, and it's only getting worse","I guess I'm posting this just to get things off of my chest, and to see if any of you guys can relate to my situation.

I'm in my late twenties and live in a rural state in the southern United States. To make a long story short, I am feeling completely isolated and left behind. All of my friends, bar one, are heterosexual and dating or married. I am the only single person that I know. I love my friends so much, and seeing them find success in their romantic lives and careers is heartwarming.

It would be a lie, though, if I said that I didn't also experience simultaneous emotions of profound sadness and loneliness along with being proud of my friends. We are at the age where everyone is settling down and getting married... I have gone to so many (straight) weddings over the past year and it's eating me alive.

Being gay has never been easy for me, but I do the best I can. I have very limited romantic experience and have been chronically single for almost all of my life. This hasn't bothered me much, that is, until all of these weddings began to happen.

I have another wedding to go to soon, and I have never felt anything hit so close to home as this. My (straight) best friend who I have known since high school is getting married. He was the first person I came out to, and he and I have gone through so much shit, both good and bad. I love his fiance, and I don't think I've ever been more proud for one of my friends. But... now that even my best friend is getting married (the only person who has ever helped me through rough times), I am starting to feel completely mortified!

I don't have any new friends; I only have my old friends from my teenage years and early twenties. They are the only people that I can talk to about this, but at the same time, they are kind of the source of my worries. I know I can't cling onto the past, but I'm really struggling with this.

I am finding it very awkward to try to strike a balance between reaching out to old friends for help, and not wanting to burden all of my coupled-off friends with my problems that they can't help with. I don't have anyone else to talk to though...

I am trying so hard to not have a chip on my shoulder about my life situation, and I am trying to be optimistic about things. However, the longer this goes on, and the older we get, things are becoming *so* much harder. ""It gets better"" absolutely does not apply here. I am so fucking tired of not having anyone to talk to, and beginning and ending every day alone... year after year after year.

I know it's a little immature of me to get slightly bitter about all of these weddings, but I can't change how I feel. Now that my best friend is finally getting married too, it's making me seriously question if I will ever find love. I feel like I just have to keep a straight face and go through the motions, but I'm screaming inside. I just don't want to lose my friends, because they're all I have.

....anyone else felt this way? I bet there are loads of us.",gaybros
Ideas for figuring out if a coworker is gay?,Work in an environment that being out is frowned upon. Anyway suspect a coworker may be gay (maybe just hopefull because I'm crushing) are there any ways I could find out without directly asking him?,gaybros
Any bottom bros taking finasteride for hair loss have any loss of pleasure from the prostate-shrinking effect?,"Title says it all lol. I've started losing my hair and thinking of starting finasteride, which shrinks the prostate, but I'm worried I'll lose pleasure in my butt. Any bros have experience with this?",gaybros
Would not knowing how to cook be a dealbreaker for you?,"And think about this before you answer. Imagine being the only one cooking in the relationship, forever. Would this be a problem for you?

Cooking = (at the very least) tolerable/okay and being able to fend for yourself.",gaybros
"Either way, it’s a win win situation.",,gaybros
Rant,"I'm living in a homophobic country, Serbia. Recently, my brother showed me a post with a voting system on a Facebook group with students from Belgrade ( the biggest and most open-minded Serbian city ) about which thing is the most ruinous for our society : LGBTIQ activism or church ( there were more options as well, but these two were the most popular ).

Surprisingly ( or not so surprisingly considering the country ), LGBTIQ activism got so much more votes than church ( or anything else ) even if this is literally the best possible combination for a group of Serbians : students living in Belgrade. Belgrade = the least intolerant and close-minded Serbian city and students = the least intolerant and close-minded group of people, regardless of the country ( at least I thought so ). 

I got such a big meltdown although I am aware of the rate of intolerance in our society. I guess I had a little bit of hope for the youth to be more open-minded, but I guess it simply can't change so easily when the country refuses to put anything positive or even neutral ( most of the time ) about the LGBT in education. Hell, until the age of 16 at least, students can't hear anything about LGBT people at schools, they can only hear something from parents who are very homophobic most of the time to the extent that they refuse to say a word about it, frightened that it would raise the gayness in their kids.

The youth is what awaits this country. If they aren't much more tolerant than the old, I don't see much hope for this country. I'm 15 and it might change later, but currently, I just can't ignore other people's words, yet there's too much hate for even emotionally stronger people to handle. Moving out might change my experience with homophobia, but definitely won't change the world, or this country that I'm living in.

It all makes me extremely sad and devastated. But I'm powerless, unable and scared to even voice my ( positive ) opinion of the LGBT community.",gaybros
Coming Out Movies,"Are there any movies out there where older men come out? I'm tired of watching teen movies where the high school boy comes out and feels super accepted. I haven't been in high school for years, but I did not come out in high school. I was not comfortable enough back then. I did not have a support group back then.

&amp;#x200B;

Not that I really have a support group now. But representation is important. And I want to know movies that show older men coming to terms with how they are. Not married men. Just older men.

&amp;#x200B;

Any Suggestions?",gaybros
Advice,"Hey there, bros

So I met this one kid in my Bio Lab only to find out he has my lecture for Bio. We exchanged some looks, but I didn't take much from it. When we got of class today, he was walking right in front me and I feel like I missed a chance--my chance-- to speak to him. We branched off and now i'm deeply regretting not saying anything. How do i approach him? What to say? How to come off as not too desperate but enough to where it shows i'm interested??
",gaybros
Platonic cuddling,"I just survived pride. And i swear there's something in the water here because everyones much more huggy than any other circle i know (including the gay ones). At one point the afterparty i visited dissolved into four guys spooning fully clothed in a converted sofa bed. Plus I've never seen people actually do the greeting kiss on the cheek under the age of 40 before today, where it happened a LOT. The weird thing is after the initial awkwardness its kinda comforting.







Any of y'all got experiences to share?",gaybros
Two out of three LGBTIQ+ workers keep it hidden at the office -- do you?,,gaybros
"Any books, films, or games that have actually compelling gay characters in it?","By “compelling gay characters” I mean “well developed main characters in a good story that just happen to be gay”. 

I just wanna see some gay guys slay dragons or become magical beings tbh. Anything that just has good representation really. ",gaybros
"Me Monday August 27, 2018","It's that time of week again! Introduce yourself!

**Name:**

**Age:**

**Location:**

**One interesting thing that happened this week:**

**Photos:**

**Social Links:**
",gaybros
How do you overcome a religious background that inevitably tells you to hate yourself?,"(19M) Long story short, I’ve grown up in a Southern Baptist household where the Bible plays a major role in the philosophy of my family and surroundings. I go to church every Sunday to hear the same messages of obedience to God and his laws (something espoused by my family members on numerous occasions). I understand that they aren’t trying to intentionally isolate me or ignore my true feelings, but I still end up feeling bitter and alone. This causes me to aggressively seek out LTR very quickly, out of fear that my family will eventually leave me. 

How do you overcome this situation? Also, how can I learn to be happy alone and stop desperately clinging to others?

EDIT: Thanks for replying. ",gaybros
How do you love yourself? Unsure about who I am anymore.,"Hey guys and girls, 

I came out as gay to everyone in my life when I was 15 (18 now) and it went really well, everyone was supportive, loving, and kind. I was decently happy (for being a teenager) for about two years until I started having some doubts/feelings/questions about myself. I basically started to realize that I am not gay, or at least not totally, I started having more feelings towards women, both personal and sexual. So I have been feeling lost and confused on who I am, which makes me uncomfortable as I thought I knew who I was. During this time I also realized that I have a deep internalized homophobia that I never recognized before. This saddens me because I thought I was pretty proud about who I was before, but I definitely am not. 

Basically I am asking for your tips/guides/advice/help on how to love your self, how to find yourself, and any other help. 

I am in college now so I feel stupid that I haven’t a single clue who I am. 

Thanks. ",gaybros
"Thoughts on ""Alex Strangelove""","""Alex Strangelove"" is a Netflix Original film that came out in June on Netflix, and it follows a high-school boy who questions his sexuality. Not going to spoil anything here but was curious to hear y'all's thoughts on the film? For me it was relatable to the point of feeling personally attacked.",gaybros
Is coming out ever easy?,"I’m in high school. I wanna come out, right, really only one person at my school knows. I’m sure there are several that think I’m pretty sus, but whatever. 

Like I said, I do want to come out, but right now I know that the only things that would come from that would just be bad. I’ve been thinking it over and a question begin to form in my head: Is coming out ever an easy task?

It’s a pretty depressing thought, but to me I don’t think there would be any scenario that I would benefit from being publicly out. Don’t get me wrong, I want to be, it’s just I don’t know if I can...

I’m just lost and confused and stuff. I’d really appreciate any help.",gaybros
How my first time was fucked because I was barely fucked and then not fucked at all,"I am lying in my bed right now. Disappointed. Underwhelmed. *Angry*. Each breath of this motherfucker’s cologne (stuck to my clothes) refreshing the memory of my worst and only sexual encounter thus far. With sleep out the window, here I am bout to bring the freshest and juiciest rant, because trust me—there is NO reddit rant like the reddit rant of a horny virgin who got their V-Card STOLEN by some complete asswipe and essentially cheated out  of their first time.


But first some context: Having 5 whole days to myself before I move in to college as a freshman, I decide to “pass” the time by signing up for a popular Christian networking app known to fellow holy followers of Christ as “Grindr”. Within just a day after making my account, I already had several messages and found a hot guy to meet up with. 


Being the virgin that I was, (and still am goddamnit, but I’ll get to that later) I zoomed the fuck over to his apartment, reeling in the excitement of finally getting laid and pushing aside the fact that I had to drive 40 minutes to get there. When I finally arrive, he takes me in and we immediately start cuddling on the couch, watching TV. He makes his move, and starts kissing me. A lot of groping and kissing later, he brings me to his bedroom to start cuddling. So far, so good for me.  Fast forward a bit, I’m on my knees, with him behind me. He kept on assuring me that he was gonna go slow and that we could stop whenever it was too much. He then starts grinding me supposedly to get me loosened up. A little bit painful at the beginning then nothing. This goes on for 4 minutes. “Ok,” I think, “this is my first time so I guess it’s really tight”.  A minute later, I was about to express my thanks for him taking it slow and that he probably could start now. 


But, before I could say anything he fucking gets up, sighs, and walks to the bathroom. And then it hits me. NOT ONLY HAD HE STARTED BUT HE FUCKING FINISHED. HE WASN’T FUCKING GRINDING ME. HE WAS FUCKING *FUCKING* ME. THE ENTIRE FUCKING TIME I WAS WORRIED ABOUT IT HURTING, I LITERALLY FELT SO LITTLE THAT I MISSED THE FACT THAT I HAD A DICK IN MY ASS AND DIDNT REALIZE THAT I WAS HAVING SEXUAL INTERCOURSE. I sat there, completely shell shocked from underwhelment and disappointment, my cock completely soft and anything-but-hard so forget about being even remotely close to cumming. Being the bitch ass that he is, he simply shrugged and sat contently on his couch, lazy since he already had came and had his fill of pleasure. Since he was a top and apparently found penises gross, he refused to suck me off or rim, complaining about how he didn’t like foreskin and there might be lube in my ass although I had showered after the “sex”. We “hung out” for a hour, with him saying that he *might* be able to try again after a hour of round one. Fast forward, he tosses me on the bed, grabbing my ass and kissing me, before letting go and saying that he wasn’t horny at all. The most he was willing to do was give me a half-assed hand job. Quite literally pissed how he fucked me over twice by barely doing so the first time then not at all the second, I got up, completely fed up and done with being teased and cucked. The whole time the motherfucker grins at me and laughs, *knowing exactly* what he was doing. I stormed out with nothing but a string of fuck you’s and legitimate frustration...with nothing to ease my mind on the 40 minute drive home. And that’s how I ended up here, angrily venting away on the Reddit app, somehow more horny than before the hookup. And ho, it’s the virgin this time that feels disappointed and underwhelmed in this first time horror story. And that was how my virginity was stolen from me in a nonconsensual consensual way. Oh well, I’ve still got 4 days for Take 2 of Dick Scavenger. End of rant.",gaybros
My friend just came out to me...,"...and my heart is seriously so full. 

This is a guy I haven’t seen in nearly a decade (and we weren’t even super close then), but thanks to the miracle of following anyone you’re remotely friends with on Instagram, we’ve been able to keep in touch. Recently, we’ve both been commenting on stuff and engaging more, so tonight I messaged him to see how he was. A four-hour phone conversation followed and by the end he’d come out to me before admitting he’d only realized it himself in the last month

I’m SO proud of him, even though he’s nervous and worried and a little scared about what his new normal might look like. 

Btw I’m so grateful for modern technology. This guy was a casual acquaintance at best, yet we still stayed in contact enough for both of us to feel comfortable trusting the other. 

Gaybros, there’s a lot of beauty and love in this world and my heart is so full because of it. So proud of my friend. Just so so so proud. 🌈",gaybros
Using dating apps while closeted?,"Hey bros, I've been using Tinder for months with mixed success--I have premium, which allows me to only be visible to guys I swipe right on. I do this because I'm not out (except to a few people), I live fairly close to where I went to college, and I know someone who was outted after he was spotted on a dating app. Do any other dating apps offer this as a regular or subscription feature? Closeted bros, what apps do you use?",gaybros
Kiss Cam,,gaybros
ESPN College Pick’em Game,"College Football begins this week! There was a little interest in a group for this sub. Details are listed below for those that are interested.

Group Name: r/GBros

Password: CFB2018

Confidence Picks: Assign a value to each game 1-10 based on how confident you are in the result. 

Limit: Two(2) Entries",gaybros
Ran into a gay pornstar tonight,"Was out in town (Sacramento) at a night market event tonight, when someone catches my eye. I struggled for a second trying to figure out who he was.

Then it hit me. That’s [Johnny Torque](https://www.nextdoorstudios.com/en/model/Johnny-Torque/8927).
I’ve seen this man’s dick fuck plenty of dudes. I was able to confirm it was him by his forearm tattoos.

Sorry, my friends aren’t gay and I really needed to tell someone that I saw a gay pornstar in person tonight.


EDIT: [Mobile link.](https://m.nextdoorstudios.com/en/modelscene/Johnny-Torque/8927)",gaybros
Your favourite gay pairs/relationships/ships from games,"Possible spoilers


Hey Bros. 
I recently was replaying DAI (Dragon Age Inquisition) and loving the Dorian romance. 
I was wondering:
What are your favourite gay cannon relationships? 
What are your favourite fictional or fantasises ships?

Mine include: 
DA2Fenris-Hawke
DAI Dorian-Inquisitor
DAI Iron Bull-Inquisitor
Borderlands Universe Athena and Janey Springs
Divinity Original Sin 2 Fane-Red Prince
Divinity Original Sin 2 Sebille-Lohse 
",gaybros
"What's a good sub to talk about gay sex, more discussion rather than questions?",,gaybros
🤔 🤔 relatable,"This was art that hung in the palace of the last imperial dynasty of China, found it when researching for an art paper about queer representation through the ages and thought it was fitting here. Hope this doesn't break the pornographic rule (sourced from r/https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Homosexuality_in_China)

https://i.redd.it/xgfog73uxei11.png",gaybros
When your best bro is a straight bro,,gaybros
We got married!,"Hey bros!

A while back I posted that I got engaged to the love of my life!

A week ago we had our wedding and it was a huge party with lots of love! Just wanted to share a pic from our day with you all! Thanks for being my favourite reddit thread! Love you bros!

https://instagram.com/p/Bm67CtGAzOG/",gaybros
Dating Advice?,Hi there guys. I’m at the end of my rope and I don’t know what to do anymore. I’ve tried literally EVERYTHING to get a guy. You name it. I’ve done it. But nothing works. Think I should just hang up the towel? ,gaybros
Mean Gays?,"I consider myself a fairly sociable and likeable person.  I have a few quirks, but it hasn’t really kept me from making friends and connecting with others.  I am 35 and I moved to Denver a little over two years ago. For the most part, I really like living here.  I am an avid runner and I’ve made many friends in every place I’ve lived through running.  Not knowing many people in the city, I sought out several run clubs in Denver and found two (non-gay clubs) that were really welcoming from the beginning.   I am now the social media coordinator for one club and I was recently elected to the board of the other.  I say this because I see it as evidence that I must not be a complete social failure and it’s been made clear to me that these groups definitely want me around.  I felt strongly about that from the first time I met them.  

However, when I try to venture into similar open social activities with gay men, it feels as if I’m back living the life of the not-so-cool kid in high school.  In all, I’ve attended about six or so gay social events since I moved to Denver.  They’ve ranged from ho-hum to completely awful.  These are the two worst experiences:  

1. There was a meetup at a local brewery and I tried making conversation with various people only to find they all seemed to know each other.  The one person who did say more than about four words to me asked me to move to a different seat so his boyfriend could sit down.  I finished my beer and left at that point.  
2. I RSVPed for a trivia team night where only a limited number of people could participate.  Apparently one of the organizer’s friends brought his boyfriend, so they were over on people.  This was explained to me when I arrived by the organizer, with a warning that I should RSVP in the future. As I went to leave, I overhead the organizer say, “We could have had a spot for him on a team if he was cute.”

I’m pretty happy with my running friends.  We have monthly dinners.  We celebrate each other’s birthdays.  We plan trips together around races.  In all, they keep my social calendar pretty full.  However, I’d also like the opportunity to find gay male friends with similar interests to mine.  

Has anyone else had similar experiences to these? Is this just how Denver is?  Are other places like this?  I didn’t have this kind of experience when I lived in Minneapolis.  ",gaybros
🍑💯,,gaybros
I proposed to my boyfriend (Now Fiance) with my personal favorite romantic quote and it went SO WELL,"We've been together for almost 4 years now and things have been going so well, I've wanted to propose for almost a year and I'd asked enough vague questions about it to glean that he was also super into it as well.  After a few months, I saved enough scratch for a super special Meteorite ring that I knew he would love due to our mutual love of astronomy and star-watching. 

I knew he would hate a public proposal and I also new there was a non-zero chance he might say no, I asked him out on a day trip to the mountains up near Estes park. We had a great day shopping and dining.

Then it had gotten late, the sun was going down and we where near the lake side, it getting darker and darker, and I decided it was the time. My love for this man made me so loony that I wanted to propose with my favorite quote from the watchman comic books (well, in this case, the movie version cuz I like it slightly better""

""I love you, -----. And to think, so many different versions of you could have existed when you where born, so many copies and doubles, none that could hold a candle to you. But, against unfathomable odds, it was you, only you, that emerged. To distill so specific a form from all of that chaos; Your creation is like...turning air into gold. An honest to god miracle. And I would be Honored to be your husband.""

He said yes, And I cant imagine being happier. 

And I also wanted to tell everyone reading this that a significant other is WITHIN YOUR REACH, no matter how you look, how you are, no matter what. Cuz I know I thought I was unlovable until 4 years ago, and I can't believe how wrong I was.",gaybros
Weekend activities?,"Lately I’ve found my weekends have become dull. I’m in a LDR so sadly I can’t spend them with my fiancé, and I find myself often just wasting my time doing nothing until Monday arrives and the cycle repeats.

What activities do you normally do on weekends that you would recommend for one bored dude?

Also I’m in northern France if that helps.",gaybros
Does a bro who is generally not a happy person and doesn't come from an ideal home have any business wanting a boyfriend who is and does?,"So I'm not the happiest or most charming or fun person, like I don't come across that way at all anyway. Not outwardly anyway. I'm not rude or unpleasant, I just don't burst into a room smiling and cheering people up with my happy energy left and right. Guys seem to like me enough and all. My family is kind of basically all living in different states, dad estranged for decades with his own family in Spain now. The kind of situation millions of people are dealing with, just normal life stuff.

But I find myself really attracted to guys who who have lots of energy, are always smiling and wanting to make others smile, always nice to everyone and pleasant and always come across as being in a good/pleasant mood, even when they aren't feeling so great and they tell you so. Or guys who have a stereotypical nuclear family life, always grew up in the same house and didn't move around the country for parents work all the time, guys that like both their parents and tell them everything they need to know about how they are doing, enjoy family dinners, etc.

Is it wrong to be attracted to guys like this, to want a boyfriend like that, when I don't really bring the same qualities to the table myself?",gaybros
I had a weird day today...,"First, I had a dream that I fully identified and accepted I was a woman. Never even entertained this idea in my life but in my dream I felt like a woman, still me, but a woman with feminine features and an ungrateful CEO husband. I figured why he was an asshole. I was an Android because when I thought to myself about colorblindness, a huge server pulled up in my mind and I had information at my disposal. Then I went to a gay bar tonight and got sucked off by this country boy who was pretty neutral. Honestly, I’m so confused. Maybe I’m agender. ",gaybros
Looking for information about prostate cancer.,"I am 49 years old, and went for my annual physical, I had an elevated PSA, recheck 2 weeks later, down a little bit, but still high for my age group.  Needless to say I was sent to see the urologist, and prostate is a bit enlarged, and he wants to schedule me for a biopsy.  

A quick flip through the excuse library and I came up with work load, having to visit several different states and a few countries over the next few weeks.  This was just a put off so I could do research.  After that research I have decided the is no way in hell a DR is sticking a needle up my bum through my rectum, and into my prostate, not ones, let alone the 10 or 12 times they do to collect samples.  From the nightmare stories of men with antibiotic resistant bacteria in their colon making it to the biopsy site and into the bloodstream, to the blood in urine and or semen possibly for weeks, the swelling afterwards, to the DR actually missing any tumor cells completely, or absolute 100% worst case scenario actually hitting a tumor then contaminating good tissue with tumor cells, I opted to decline the biopsy.  And opted for a watch and wait scenario.  (More on this at the end)

I have lost a lot of sleep over this ion the last 5 weeks, and I cannot find any information on prostate cancer rates that is current or in my opinion relevant.  One survey indicated that gay man receptive to anal sex, and that have been with more than 20 partners have an increased rate of prostate cancer, but added the comment that this was skewed by the small number of men surveyed, and others unwillingness to discuss their sexual role with physicians.

I fit that demographic, but I am actually bisexual, married, and been monogamous since shortly after meeting almost 5 years ago.  Prior to that though I had quite a few long term relationships which by some standards would be considered hyper-sexual where we engaged in intercourse on a daily basis.  Then add in the occasional fwb, and one night stands.  And in nearly all of my same sex relationships I have been the receptive partner.

Can anyone direct me to some actual current information on this subject?  

I know a lot of people in the gay or bi community that are unwilling to discuss their sexual rolls with their MD, and forget discussing it with anyone else but their partner.  But I remember seeing demographic studies on several different subs over the years, and it would be great if we had one that addressed just men's health issues where we could answer questions 100% anonymously, in an effort to actually gather some accurate medical history information for persons based on age, orientation, and role.  I would undertake this task, but I do not have a clue where to start, or how to write it.

In my research I have found that just checking the PSA level and a digital exam should not be considered the gold standard for punching a large bore needle through someones rectum into their prostate.  Medical history needs to be considered, to the best of my knowledge none of my uncles or grandfather ever had prostate cancer, stomach, liver, lung, skin, and colon, but they were all born in the 30's and 40's, raised on a farm, and exposed to various herbicides and pesticides over the years like DDT and Roundup.  A contrasting MRI can be performed, so can a ""4K score"" test that actually looks at 4 different antigens and gauges the aggressiveness of any prostate cancer found, however in the case of the later it has not received full FDA approval, so most likely is not covered by insurance. 

&amp;#x200B;",gaybros
Recently started my second semester of nursing school!,"After a long summer of microbiology, I’ve finally started out my second semester in nursing. Our first section’s required reading is only 1/3 done and I’ve taken 20 pages of notes, but it’s so worth it to move forward in a field I love! Wish me luck! ",gaybros
Addicted to a video game?!,"Have you ever been so addicted to a video game, that you must play it right when you get home? That's me with Octopath Traveler right now. 

Honestly it's been a very long time (at least a decade or more) since I've been this addicted to a video game. Idk what it is about it, but damn, it's got me hooked. 

What are you gaybros playing? ",gaybros
"I know it's cliche, but anyone know how to get started with Crossfit?","I really want to get started working out, and I want to meet people. I feel like it's at least a pretty social thing, you know? Any advice?",gaybros
☕🐸,,gaybros
Is this biphobia or a serious concern?,"I'm always hesitant to get with bi guys because eventually I want to ""settle down"" and in all of my experiences with bi men, if they want to settle down it's with a woman. I'm wondering if anyone else has noticed it or it's just some irrational fear of mine.",gaybros
Anyone else feeling like they having a problem with low sex drive?,"I've always felt like i have an unusually low sex drive, and it has been bothering me for several years, I like at most feel like having sex 2-3 times a week. I've mostly been with guys who have had a quite higher sex drive then myself so the difference has definitely annoying at times. Even when I feel like it, it's usually difficult for me to get aroused and to keep the arousal up.

Just wondering if anyone else has any experience with the same problem, and if there really is anything that can be done about it. Or maybe I'm just overthinking stuff lol",gaybros
Still Dealing with Breakup... Nearly Five Years Later,"I'm sure others have dealt with this but I don't know if anyone has dragged it out for five years. I'm in need of some advice for how to just finally move on since it's way overdue that I do.

First a little bit of background: met my former boyfriend in 2013 while living in NYC through a mutual freind. We became freinds and a few months later we started dating. We were together for about 1.5 years and it was my first relationship. He was my first love which makes it harder to deal with.... 

And then he broke up with me when we were hanging out at his place one day after work- I didn't see it coming since we had a great relationship (or so I thought) and it hit me like a ton of cynder blocks. His reasoning was he didn't want to get married.... Obviously I was devasted by the breakup but we stayed freinds for a few months. Though, he knew I was still in love with him and we stopped hanging out altogether, I'm guessing he did that so I could get over him.

After that I internalized the possible reasons for the breakup and developed depression causing me to idiotically quit my job leave my freinds I made and more idiotically moved back home with my parents 1/2 across the country to Chicago thinking I'd start over there.... Now I see how depression can systematicly dismantle your life if you let it.

Now it's been 3 years since the move and while I've been able to somewhat restart my life gaining casual aquaintences and the cloud of depression is lifting I realize I'm being held back by remaining baggage and issues triggered by being broken up with such as lower levels of self confidence, doubting my looks, comparing myself with ""desirable"", ""successful"" guys and determining I can't compete or attract them, etc.... Logically I know those aren't true but emotionally theses limiting ""feel"" true.

It's a bit sad to see all those limiting beliefs written out. Making matters worse is my life situation I've gotten myself into making me feel completely undesirable and ashamed and embarrased enough where I don't even really want to put myself out there for just finding a freind or two since where you lice and what you do are part of a natural getting to know you conversation....

What desirable guy is going to want to date a 30 year old underemployed guy living with his parents? To be blunt I've let my ex breaking up with me nearly ruin my life and turn me into a loser- five years after the fact and let the grieving process drag on for too long which is a bit ridiculous to be honest. 

When I faced rejection before meeting on dates I would shrug it off as part of the process of dating. Now I ruminate for a day or two and wonder what's wrong with me or that it somehow confirms my self appointed loser identity.

I don't blame all of the issues on my breakup since that wouldn't be rationale or fair but I think the roots of a few stemmed from being broken up with and need to be dealt with before doing further damage.

Anyone have advice how to get past this and move forward positively? I'm starting to regret my stalled out life and not making any progress toward getting it back; especially since it seems like I took a big leap backward in terms of my quality of life. I wish I could but I can't recover lost time; I can only repair the damage done.",gaybros
Sadness or Depression?,"I need someone to rant to bc i'm going to lose my mind. I just started college and after having a shitty high school experience, I thought it would be better. After all, they say life gets better throughout college. Well, if that's true, why am I feeling even worse than when I was in high school? At least then I was able to distance myself from others and knew what to expect. 

But it seems like whenever I meet or even see a potential guy, some force or whatever it is seemed to not agree with me. It always has to end with me feeling even worse than when I woke up. 

Am I depressed or is it just sadness. Also, note that I have tried to cry but to no avail. Also note that I just feel empty inside; yes I laugh,but the joy doesn't last very long. Sorry for the long rant.",gaybros
Why is everyone on Doublelist(Craigslist) married? Why even get married in the first place if you’re going to go out and cheat on your supposedly “straight” marriage?,,gaybros
Don't be LION now,,gaybros
Any interest in playing in an ESPN College PICK’em league,"Huge college football fan here and I play this fantasy game with a bunch of alumni. Just wondering if there were any gaybros interested in playing in a league with other members of this sub. If so, I can set one up tonight/tomorrow. Games started today but the real week one is only a few days away!",gaybros
Really?!?!,"I just started pharmacy school this week, and I absolutely love it!! There’s a super cute guy that’s been going with me everywhere in school, we usually sit in the same discussion group every day, and keep eye contact for a huge percentage of the time, we went on the same community visit, and when I got on the bus before him for the visit, he sat down right next to me. On the bus, we talked about fish keeping (we’re both fish nerds) and when I mentioned going to the city’s super super gay bar, he said he’d been with friends a couple of times. So, yesterday, I asked if he wanted to hangout sometime, and he said yes!!! We agreed to hangout Monday after class. Of course, I was almost jumping for joy!





Then today, when we were alone and walking toward a campus bar for Friday drinks to meet up with people from our class, he turned to me and said, “About Monday, I still want to hangout, but you should know that I’m straight”. fml

I’m still meeting up with him on Monday, because we do have tons and tons in common, and I want some closer friends than I have here at the moment. After much analysis some of the girls and I have decided that I’m likely the only queer in class. Also, I’m trying to set him up with one of the cute girls in class that was dropping hints that she wants to date.",gaybros
No further explanation needed,,gaybros
"Saturday Songs August 25, 2018","What are you listening to? Share your music recommendations here. 

Spotify, Apple Music, Google Play links are encouraged!
",gaybros
First time joining a team since coming out.,"I just transferred colleges and am definitely joining the club lacrosse team. I can't imagine not playing. Since leaving my last team though I've come out as gay. I'm not nervous of people or teammates knowing that fact. I'm 165lbs fasting after a giant shit and typically I'm around 180 during the season, imagine standard bro. I can stand my ground with any of them. Really I'm worried it may hinder some of the commraderie and brotherhood I've felt with all my teammates previously. I know someone here has seen something like this on a team and how it was dealt with before I hope. I really could use some advice. 

Tldr: Refuse to stop playing the greatest sport, not sure how to approach a new team and still build that teammate connection with this possible hurdle.",gaybros
I feel like I fall in a weird place between masc and femme and it makes me undesirable,"I guess you'd probably define me as more femme than anything. But I don't feel that way. My bed is flanked by plushes. I sleep with a prince Sidon body pillow under posters of mccree from overwatch. I have purple hair and it's my favorite color. I like things like marina and the diamonds and glittery stuff. I wear rainbow wrist bands and women's fashion sunglasses when I run. There's a purple plastic diamond hanging from my rear view mirror, and I spend an inordinate amount of time looking up pictures of Rilakkuma and pusheen and princess peach.

  


But I'm covered in hair, my voice is deep, I have no style, I neglect my laundry, I have way fewer masculine examples to give apparently....I don't wear makeup, I don't know cars, I don't like sports, I don't go to bars, I'm skinny but I'm not fit, I have a tummy but I'm not fat, I dunno it's all over the place.

  


I just don't feel like I fit anywhere, though. :/",gaybros
This is the first guy to ask me out in like two years,,gaybros
"Bob was actually the first gay male athlete not only to come out, but to come out at the peak of his sporting career in 1989. He is literally the pioneer of out athletes and deserves to be remembered.",,gaybros
"Gay friends around Luton, England?","I've come to the realisation that I have about 1 gay friend who I talk with on a daily basis. I'd love to get to know more LGBTQ+ people around the area I live in and I DON'T want to try grindr, cus we all know how that turns out.

&amp;#x200B;

Anyone living in Luton or around?",gaybros
"Is there any theme park in the USA, big or small willing to have a ""Breakdown"" for a wedding proposal?","Is there any theme park in the USA, big or small willing to have a ""accidental"" breakdown for a wedding proposal? I'm thinking at the top of the Farris wheel or roller coaster. Asking for me. ;)",gaybros
"Just came out, feeling like crap","Well I just came out to my mom.
It wasn't the worst case scenario I was fearing. But it does feel like I was hit by a bus.
Some casual insults and some other shit that was upsetting. I can deal with the insults, they cut the tension at least.

She didn't deny it and seems to accept it but some family traditions and rules don't aply to me anymore.

My mom gives a gift to every newborn child and she said she'll just give the one for my firstborn to the next one that is born. It's only for children that are born from both parents apparently. Gays can't have children together so I won't recognise yours.

I won't come to your wedding because a wedding is between a man and a woman.

Are you the man or the woman in the relationship?  When I didn't give an answer ""that answers that"".

Something about don't be a pedofile was also said. Managed to say that being gay is not the same as being a pedofile. This one actually hurt really bad as I babysit my nieces and nephews alot and I'm a teacher.

She didn't kick me out because I prefaced the conversation with I'm looking to move out. That scared her enough to not kick me out on the spot. Something like who will drive for me and do the chores around the house.
She was however contemplating it as she said so. I had a plan in place should she have kicked me out.

God I feel like crap.

I'm sure that she will come around eventually but it just hit me like a ton of bricks and the atmosphere is weird. 
But she's trying in her own weird way. She did say to give her some time and to not hold these words against her when a wedding or a child is actually there. She might change her mind when the time comes.

I wasn't counting on the happy comming out story like in the movies or some of the other users here have. Just wish it at least was good enough to not feel like utter crap.

Now comes the rest of the family. Managed to agree that I'm the one telling them and not her like with every other thing I told her.",gaybros
I generally like to think that I’ve grown past unrequited straight crushes. I have one straight bro who sometimes reminds me that I’m wrong.,,gaybros
the best part of being in a frat is finding shit in the walls,"In the past week, me and my bros (who are remodelling some rooms in the house), have found 3 dildos and 2 gay porn CDs.

I just love how absurd it is, to tear down a wall and find a neatly placed dildo in the walls.",gaybros
"In your experience, is it bad to come out to people over text?",I'm inexperienced which is why I'm asking. It's so much easier to say what you need to say imo,gaybros
For all the closeted gay bros out there seeking suicidal.. please watch this.,,gaybros
States ask Supreme Court to limit LGBT protection,,gaybros
I'm so tired of crushing on straight men with girlfriends,"It happened twice today. TWICE. I met and worked with two really attractive and nice men, and seriously thought at least one of them was gay, because of so many different signals. Then, allowed myself to crush on them really hard. As it turns out, neither are, and the saga continues.

In short, when this thing happens, it causes my depression to blow up and run rampant in my head, and can ruin a good week for me. 

I am so sick and tired of this crap it's not even funny. I've had my heart thrown to the floor and stomped on by this sort of thing too many times and I just want it to stop. I'm so sick of it I wanted to swallow an entire bottle of Tylenol.

This sort of fuckery makes me even wonder if it's even possible for me to find a boyfriend, if I'll be single and miserable forever, and if life is even worth living. I even wonder if those gay couples you see and hear about online are even real. Like honestly, does it even happen??? 

Fuck this, fuck that, fuck them, fuck me, fuck everything and everyone. Bloody hell. Rant concluded. ",gaybros
I hate catfish profiles.,Wasting my time. If your going to catfish at least choose someone that has similar features and body type. Dont pick a 8 when you're actually a 3. ,gaybros
Me and my gay friends today,,gaybros
DTLA Proud?,Anyone in LA going to the DTLA Proud weekend?,gaybros
Join the DCGB Chapter tomorrow at our annual bar takeover!,,gaybros
Not sure if this is the place to ask but I need help on how to use a prostate massager,I'm a gay virgin and just recently bought a prostate massager. I think I'm doing something wrong because it hurts like hell every time I try to use it (and yes I'm using lube). Is there something I'm supposed to be doing other than just sticking it up there or do I have to just man up and deal with the pain,gaybros
Met a boy and don’t know what to think,"We matched on tinder a while ago, and we’ve been talking on and off for a few months now. We haven’t gone on a date yet or met, but we flirt a lot and he calls me ‘his man’. I like him and want to date him, but maybe I’m reading too much into him calling me that? ",gaybros
Any tips on getting laid?,"I’ve been under a pretty bad streak. Less than 2% of guys I message respond to me on gay apps and when I finally meet them or they’re on their way, they change their minds and leave. Should I just stop and abandon all hope? I can’t get laid, I can’t even get a relationship. Is there anything I can do?!",gaybros
I really have to get this out of my chest and need some advice,"I met this guy a couple months ago. Things went surprisingly well. The attraction was mutual, intelectually and physically. So we decided to start dating.

The thing is we do not live on the same city at the moment but that seemed like a little bump on the road since I graduated last year in the capital and went back living in my hometown with my parents for some time while working on an underpayed job until I get my finances together. So I was already looking for a different city to move on.

I am really commited to evertyhing that I do, specially relationships. It bothers me so much the usual image that a guy cannot be faithful and LTR oriented, specially if he's gay. The idea that gay guys are promiscuous and unable/uninterested to have a solid non open relationship seems to be passed by in the community in a way that makes me not feel like I'm part of it and that sucks (that's a topic for another day).

With that said, I had my share of NSA fun. I am 26 but despite having been with quite some guys, I was always looking for someone to settle down with and build a future togeter.

He's 24. Since we started talking, things just went so smoothly great and when we met in person I couldn't belive how the surprises were just positives (something really rare), meaning that things were like we hoped or even better. I stayed for almost a week in his city and we spent almost all that time together in bed or going to the movies, picnics, he showing me the city, etc. 

I knew things were too good to be true but what else would I do? Seemed like I was having this huge opportunity to finally blossom this relationship and make it mature and long term.

I came back to my hometown and since then we continued talking, flirting and while both of us were in a way trying to avoid get ours hopes up about the long term, we both were interested in seeing were things could go. Since the beginning we talked about how we were uninterested in an open relationship or things of sorts. He was the one that started the subject.

He's quite narcisitic while I am more estoic and low profile. He's trying to be a media content producer, has a Youtube channel, is super active on Instagram while I shy away from social media in general and only lurk on Reddit on some subreddits that I find interesting. I thought maybe these diferences could mean we would be adding to each other. He would frequently tell me about how guys hit on him or send him sexual messages on Instagram. We would just make jokes and he would say say how he was already taken.

Last night when I got home from work he said that since we were trying to be always honest and open to each other, he wanted me to know that he would not be able to be only with me sexually. That I was a great guy, everything he could hope for and more bla bla bla but maybe he would need to see other guys. That people would hit on him and he couldn't say that he wouldn't eventually give in. But that if this ever happened he would tell me after beacuse he woldnt't lie to me (I will make no comments on this).

I not usually one to lose my balance but I was shocked, suddenly everything that I was planning and looking for disappeared. We talked that it was ok to see other guys while we were living far away but he said yesterday that even when we would be together the monogamy would be a problem. When I started talking he realized that I was not ok with it and then he said that it could be just the distance and the horniness talking, that he was confused and he felt that me going live there was like I was putting a pressure on him for us to be together despite all the times that I said that I wanted to move to be closer to him and because I am overly qualified and underpayed for any job that I coud get on my small hometown, so my career was really important and something that I was (am) trying to rocketeer as well by moving.

We talked for some time in which after a while was just me texting like crazy trying to make sense of things and quite disappointed for feeling like I was lead to belive we were on the same boat when clearly we weren't while he just said a few words trying to make me believe that only now he started feeling this way (and maybe it's true) and that it shouldn't change things.

So I sugestted that we shouldn't be together anymore until I effectively moved to his city and then we could try and see how things could work out. He said that to him things would stay the same but I said that to me it is not. That I feel like I've been thrown a bucket of cold water (an expression here) and that is pointless to me to pretend like nothing happened. I kinda want just distance now. Be alone and not thonk about him. But at the same time that for sure is a way of killing whatever chance we may have.

The thing is, my carreer is really important to me and I am deeply depressed with my actual work and how little pay I get. Since the past few months I was looking for better opportunities in other cities, states and countries too (I will leave Brazil some day yet!) the moment that we were discussing how we would do things, I received a late night message from an organization apologizing for the inconvenience of the late message and saying that they analized my resumé and that it would be a perfect fit for some open vacancies that they have on other countries.

It was an blissful coincidence. If it was some time ago I could refuse depending on what they were offering. Now I am quite heartbroken but maybe it is an opportunity to stay alone and at least resume my career and do something more meaningful than what I do now.

To finish this long text, I do not believe we are searching the same thing and despite being confident that things would be great in the short term, I am not naive enough to belive that things could workout in the long term. There were a lot of hints that I actively ignored before but I feel that insisting in this would lead just to more pain. I couldn't barelly sleep last night, I woke feeling really bad, bad enough to come make a post about my personal life and on the internet, something that I wold never normally do. I feel so lost and frustrared that I just feel the need to spit it out and hopefully be given a new point of view in this. I will continue to be looking for better jobs but now I do not feel the need to go live in his city or near him. At the same time I wanted us to workout. I'm not sure if it's the loneliness talking, I've been on some shitty relationships before. i don't know if I'm overprotecting myself or I just know by now that it wont' work.

&amp;#x200B;

Thank you so much for everyone that take the time to read and give me advice.

&amp;#x200B;

TL;DR; met a guy from a different city a couple months ago, he said that he was only interested in monogamous relationhip as did I. Yesterday he changed his mind. I was willing to move to his city to work and be near him. Now I don't know how to deal with this and it's killing me. We seemed like a great match but I do not want to be in an open relationship. 

&amp;#x200B;",gaybros
i met a cute gay guy on spotafriend but in the middle of our conversation he left me on read,"idk if i should even be sad about this? our conversation was going well and i was sure he was also interested in me. i mean, if we matched to begin with he’s somewhat interested right? should i try hitting him up again later?",gaybros
Best places/apps to meet more gay friends?,My boyfriend and I want to make more gay friends and expand our friend group. We’re trying out grindr but that’s obviously more angled towards sex than anything. Anyone have any recommendations of any apps or even places (in LA) to visit to try to make more gay friends?,gaybros
I think we can all relate with the black guy,,gaybros
"Banned from LGBT, am I welcome here?","16 year old gay here, just wondering if i'm allowed here after being banned from LGBT. I got banned for writing the word ""gay"" on a lesbian marriage picture. It was a very gay, wholesome post. When I sent a reply to the moderators to sort the ban out (I wasn't rude or anything like that) I was muted for 72 hours from replying to them. So, since one lgbt community despises me, should I also avoid this sub?",gaybros
Hairy men Subreddit,"A couple of friend and I have decided to make a subreddit based around hairy men, so if you are a hairy man lover check us out.

&amp;#x200B;

[https://www.reddit.com/r/HairyBearMen/](https://www.reddit.com/r/HairyBearMen/)",gaybros
"Politics Phriday August 24, 2018","**PLEASE NOTE:** This thread's comments will be largely unmoderated. Please participate with the knowledge that offensive and uneducated opinions may be expressed. Please report all comments that break Reddit-wide rules or Terms of Service using the report button. 

A weekly post to talk about anything political going on in the world. 

Please note that Trump-centric conversation IS allowed in this thread but will be removed on other days of the week. 
",gaybros
Gay people in Russia,[removed],gaybros
Gay Life In Denver ?,"Hey All!

So I'm thinking of making a move out of SF to a smaller city, such as Denver or Austin (just like everyone else, I know). I grew up here in SF, and just feel ready to get away to a different city with different people.

I'm curious what the gay life is like in Denver --- I know it won't be like SF in terms of actual amount of gay people / gay bars (which is totally fine, it's actually one of the reasons why I'd like to leave), but is it a pretty gay friendly city? Is there a gay neighborhood at all like the Castro? 

&amp;#x200B;

Just at a point here in SF where I've essentially been priced out of the city, and am struggling to make meaningful connections with people here (I think it has to do w/ the paradox of choice tbh). Any other bros make the move to Denver recently ? How have you liked it?",gaybros
Just going to leave this right here..,,gaybros
I painted this portrait of my boyfriend as he worked on his laptop across from me at the cafe. We recently celebrated our one year anniversary.,,gaybros
20 Elderly Gentlemen Who Will Redefine Your Concept of Handsome,,gaybros
Gay &amp; Loneliness?,"I have received quite a few invitations to attend weddings since the beginning of this year. They are all from friends I made back in school. I honestly can't help but getting jealous. A lot of them even have already settled with kids etc and I can barely maintain or 'start' my relationship. 

&amp;#x200B;

 \*\* please know that this is not a rant, just open for discussion! \*\*

&amp;#x200B;

I was just wondering how are you all feeling? 

&amp;#x200B;

With all these gay hookup / 'dating' app making sex so easily accessible, I feel that finding a relationship is almost impossible also I have a hard time believing 'dating app' would work? Because there is simply no foundations or anything to build on. (I read from many people's story it always start off amazing, learning about each other etc. But once you have talked about almost everything and then what? what do you talk about after a year or two?)

&amp;#x200B;

At what point should one just accept being alone for the rest of his life? (I had a chance to talk to a few men in their late 40-50's, they've all told me (unfortunately) all the relationships they had in the past was either cheated on &amp; 'drifted' apart. 

&amp;#x200B;

Anyway, what are your thoughts?",gaybros
One of the best short movies ive seen,[The Language of Love](https://vimeo.com/278740891),gaybros
"Just finished ""Something Like Summer"" and it hit me like a train.","Good god this book gave me ALL THE FEELS. And I'm not that kind of guy. I've only ever cried twice, I think, my whole life. But last night, around midnight, I finished Something Like Summer (the first book) and I couldn't hold back the tears.

&amp;#x200B;

Mind you, *none* of the events in the book felt relatable to the kind of experiences I've had. But it was still such an engrossing book. I know that some people aren't big fans of the ending, but without getting into spoiler territory here, I still found the entire book beyond satisfying. Not the way I would've ended it, but still ah-so-good.

&amp;#x200B;

Time to start Autumn, I guess.",gaybros
I'm 24 yo and mostly into 40-50 yo men. what to say or not on my dating app/sites bio to appeal and reassure this demographic?,"Hi guys, I don't want to start a debate regarding daddy issues or social acceptance of age gap, my preference for older hold into them being just...sexier, stable, and overall knowing what they want or not. 
For the last 3 years i've been in and out of the gay scene of my moderately big french city, and most of the actually enjoyable experiences and friendships I had, were among men between 40 and 50. Now I've recently came to the realization I might actually want to settle down with a man in his forties. 
Unfortunately the task is quite hard, since the gay scene (in my area at least) is full of straight married dudes that didn't figure out what they really wanted, married, had kids and didn't want to start again and prefer stay in the closet. And the actually gay ones are mostly attracted to their own age category.

So, my question is, what can I display on my dating app bios, or say to present myself in clubs, etc...to actually draw their attention as a viable partner?
For the background, I'm working full-time, independent, tried already alot of stuff, especially on the kinky side, and figured out my expectations in the matters of sex and relationship.
Hope to get some help, thanks in advance ^^",gaybros
Thought I'd share this cool video game themed gift my husband and I got for our anniversary,,gaybros
BIGGEST turn-offs on dating apps for me...,"1. Having random girls kissing on you like I’m supposed to be fucking impressed...
2. Flexing at the gym, when you should be working out.
3. Having a bunch of kids from third-world countries in your photo, look up, “savior complex”
4. Having a clear attitude, not attractive. 
5. Having a group photo, can’t tell which one you are. I always assume the one in the center of the shot.
6. The Snapchat puppy dog filter...literally so 2015/2016, so overdone. ",gaybros
Gay is not a choice proof?,"Happy almost Friday,
So, I had recently come out to my parents who were extremely taken aback, to say the least. The conversation basically steered towards my parents asking if I'm choosing to be with men rather than women, although I only had 1 heterosexual relationships in high school for half a year, I think?

Said I dont have a choice and yes, followed by profanity and a lot of yelling, fists thrown at the wall, and storming off by my dad. A day later after the silent treatment, we talk again. He starts by saying how I dont act gay, acted straight yadda yadda... and I basically say I dont have a choice in this matter. Dad retorts with asking if there's physical proof that it's not a choice. Followed by, ""cant you wait and see if maybe you'll be with a girl in a few years? I need to have you in my life"" (In my head, just kinda thought like the hell? What do you think I've been trying to do since I've known I was different? Wouldn't be here if I could do that...)

I know I'm not gonna back down. I'm confident and happy with myself. I've accomplished a lot and got a lot more to accomplish. Only thing is, just want my parents to be in my life but dont know how this will all play out/what my next steps should be. 

Any similar experiences or advice? 
(25, been in an awesome relationship with my current bf for quite some time.)",gaybros
"One of my friends went on a date last night, and the other guy took the condom off without telling him","Last night one of my friends went on a date with a guy he met on Tinder. I hadn’t seen him since the date ended until I got home from work today.

My friend (who is a bottom) went back to this guys place and they started hooking up. When they were about to have sex my friend realised the other guy wasn’t wearing a condom, and asked him to put one on. This guy said he didn’t have condoms “but I’m on prep so it’s ok”. My friend told him we wasn’t getting fucked without a condom, so the guy ran to a store down the street and got some. My friend watched this guy put the condom on, but after they finished he noticed the condom laying on the bed. My friend asked and the guy confirmed he took it off before he finished, and he had cum inside my friend.

As far as I know my friend just brushed it off as a ‘bad date’ and wasn’t planning on doing anything about this. He gets anxious and nervous very easily and is on medication for depression, so (trying to manage his feelings and reaction) told him I’m sure everything would be fine and he has nothing to worry about, but he should go to a sex clinic tomorrow and talk to somebody about PEP - which he agreed to. He is still inside the 72hr exposure window so *if* (worst case scenario) he does have something to worry about, he can still be treated and he’ll be ok (and I’ve told him this) - but I can tell I’ve rattled him a bit, I think because he was in some sort of shocked state or a state of denial ect. He has a history of low self esteem so I don’t think this really bothered him until he shared it with somebody who took it seriously - the gravity of the situation didn’t kick in until he heard my reaction.

I guess I’m asking if anybody has any experience with a situation like this? Can anybody offer some advice - either for my friend directly, or for me in terms of how to support him?

Is it worth reporting this guy to the police or anything like that, since this is technically rape? We live in Australia (for context).",gaybros
I fell for it,,gaybros
Anyone want to come to SAM Remix,Hi is anyone interested in coming to the SAM art remix,gaybros
I messed up and my boyfriend is leaving me. Any advice?,"Hey GayBros! I hope everyone is having a good day!

​

I need some advice for my relationship and hoping that you all can help me. My boyfriend and I have been talking for six months or so and dating officially for about half the time. A couple of nights ago, my boyfriend came over after work. I left while he was in the shower to go grocery shopping for something to make for dinner. As I was checking out at the store, I got a text telling me he found text messages between my ex and I and that he was leaving - when I got home, he was gone. I just remember dropping my groceries in my living room and crying. Some backstory: a few months ago, my ex, whom I dated for a year and a half, asked me if I wanted to get coffee to catch up. I told my boyfriend about it and he said it made him a little uncomfortable but didn't want to get in the way of my friendships here (I live in a rural college town - graduated a half year ago so I have no real friends besides my ex and an old friend from work). He told me to tell him if I ever did again, and I promised him I would since I knew how he felt. Well, I got coffee / lunch with him a couple more times in the past three months or so and didn't tell him. My relationship with my ex is \*strictly\* friendly - I have no feelings whatsoever for him, but he had gone through a death in the family and we just got along well to talk and shoot the shit. So it was cool getting lunch with him, and I know he likes talking to me. But I am not romantically invested in him.

​

So, my boyfriend found texts of us planning to get lunch and stuff. He feels extremely betrayed that I kept it from him and lied. Don't get me wrong, I totally know I messed up. I'm an idiot, because all it took was me to tell him I was getting coffee and we wouldn't be here (he told me this himself). I know I screwed up, and I assured him I never cheated or did anything he wouldn't approve of if he was there, which he told me he believes.

​

He's telling me that he has zero trust in me anymore, especially given the trust issues and anxiety he already has. He wants to move back home a couple of states away now and told me he's not sure how he could ever trust me again. I am head over heels for this guy - I mean actually feeling like I'm falling in love with him, which is a big thing for me to say. Thats a strong word for me, I don't know what to do to win him back and have him not move away. I told him that I'd cut back hanging with my ex, and I swore on my life that I would tell him every single time my ex asked me for coffee. I swore I'd keep him updated with what I'm doing. I don't expect to go back to the way things were right away, I told him I'm willing to do anything and wait as long as I need to earn his trust back, and he told me I'd gave him a lot to think about and that he'd text me later on today after work.

​

The reason I kept it from him was just because I didn't want him worrying about me cheating on him with my ex, when there was nothing to worry about. I know its so stupid, and I should've just told him, but I know how his mind starts to run when he thinks of my ex and I.

​

I just don't want to throw away this entire relationship over the fact that I kept it from him. We just got back from an amazing roadtrip to Denver. Had plans to buy plane tickets soon for my friends's wedding in Seattle. I see a future with him. I want a future with him.

​

\*\*tl;dr - my boyfriend found texts of my ex and I planning to get coffee a few times. He feels like he can't trust me anymore and I'm not sure what to do to salvage our relationship.\*\*

​

Is there any advice anyone can give me? Thanks in advance!",gaybros
"2 queers, 1 legbeard, and a year of torture. A story of how a ""fag hag"" or ""fruit fly"" made my life hell.","Let me tell you the story of a legbeard, 2 queers, and a sexual harassment charge.

Cast list: 
Me: a sophomore in high school who came out of the closet 
Bf: my boyfriend in high school  (now ex) who was a senior 
And Grit: a 6'2 fujoshi girl, who had acne so bad her face looked like sandpaper, (hints the name Grit.) I also should mention she was a sophomore.

So I should preface this by telling you a little about me and a little bit about my school. My town has around 1,500 people living in it, about 200 of which go to high school. Everybody knows everybody basically. Well, me and my bf we're both quite nerdy, both in honor classes, both in matching band, me a lover of chess, etc. We never bothered anyone and were in general quiet, until I came out and made our relationship offical.

This is where Grit comes in, I knew her from class but never really talked to her...she was a weeaboo and loved yaoi. She went as far both write and draw yaoi and her ""ships"" in class. Never bothered me, although the teachers yelled at her a lot for it, she of course would retaliate by writing gay fanfiction about the teachers. Regardless, she decided to insert herself into mine and my bf life whenever we were dating (Note we're the only openly gay couple in the school.) We didn't have a problem her hanging out with us at first, till she started making comments about us, such as ""you guys are so kawaii"" and ""so which one of you is the seme and which is the uke"" I had no fucking idea what either of those were mind you.

But no that's not the worst of it, she then decided to start drawing art of me and my bf in an anime style, some of it highly fetishized. Being so proud of her *artistic skill* she starts showing people these images every chance she gets. I find this disgusting that someone would make such crude art of myself, I honestly felt a little violated by it. 

Then the true horror cam, the fanfiction...if anything can give a socially awkward person ptsd, Grit managed to do it with fanfiction. Truly so God awful, that it was weaponized for war. She started asking questions to us like ""how bigs your dick"" ""what's the sexiest dream you've had about your bf"" ""who climaxes first"" I of course wouldn't answer any of it. however, this didn't stop her from feeling in the rest.

The last straw was whenever my jacket went missing. I often left it in teachers classrooms so I figured it was no big deal, it'll be returned to me soonish. I sewn my name on the tag, becuase I lost it so much. I finally got it back probably 3-4 months later, by Grits mom..who was at marching band practice one day. I asked where she found it and she casually replied ""at my house"" I guess she figured I was over there one day or something. Well curious about how it got there I asked Grit, who answered "" I took it to wear for whenever I write fanfiction, it gives me inspiration"" I don't know what she was doing in it, but hearing rumors she watched yaoi to get off...I decided to get rid of the jacket.

This finally caused me to snap, and I reported her to the school for the last time. I did this once or twice prior but they never took this seriously. I finally to the office that if they didn't do anything to her I would be filing a sexual assault charge on her and ropethe entire school into a court case. Seeing this they finally separated her from all my classes and even held a school-wide assembly on what was *appropriate* to conversate about in school and what wasn't. She never did stop gossiping about me however, until finally my boyfriend graduated at the end of that year. Haven't heard from her since the end of senior year, I think she works for minimum wage at a gas station.

",gaybros
What do I do about this?,,gaybros
"Thirsty Thursday August 23, 2018","What are you drinking, bros? Share your latest finds or homebrew creations.
",gaybros
Crushes on straight boys are so annoying!,"We know that they are straight, we know they have no interest in us, yet we still can't help the feelings we have towards them. I started working with this cute guy who I thought had the potential to be gay. We hit it off and talked a lot at work, and then he told me about a girl he hooked up with. Knowing what I know, I still can't help but stare at him all day at work, and picture a relationship with him that will literally never happen. And it makes me upset but I still can't control it. Has anyone here ever told their straight crush that you like them, just to get it off your chest?  I think we get these stupid ideas in our heads because we believe there's that slight possibility that maybe they're in denial about their sexuality, or maybe that they're bi. But statistically, that's not the case. I would love for my being gay to come up in a conversation somehow so he can at least know.",gaybros
How did Stella get her Groove Back?. Any thoughts?,"I am in my late 40's and probably look the best ever in my life. I have great salt and pepper hair, lost weight, shaved completely, and got a new job as a flight attendant. I have ladies flirt with me constantly, and I even had a lady stop me at the airport to tell me I looked good. My job pays peanuts, so every dime is important. 

I am not a big facebook guy but I spend time in IG. I have been chatting with someone my type and he is pressing me to meet and see what happens. I am apprehensive. 

I have been single for ten years, and have grown to hate dating. I haven't found anyone so magical that I want to spend every second with them. If anything it's the opposite. I am angry I have to go out and spend money. I am angry I don't get to do what I want, but instead meet someone for drinks. I have become so selfish, that compromise is no longer in my vocabulary. 

How did Stella get her Groove Back? How do I re-learn to value people again, enough to actually WANT to invest the time? This guy who likes me is super hot, and seems to genuinely want to know me and I feel like I built a wall and won't let it down.

Any advice?",gaybros
Gendering bending Lara Croft cosplay.,,gaybros
"Loving a guy in the U.S., distance dilemma and gay community?","So i ve been chatting with a guy who happens to be doing his phd in the U.S. and we are really interested in each others, and there is a real deep connection between us, which something rare to find these days.

As we were talking about distance and such, we were thinking if it is possible for me to move in with him but I m not really sure if i will be able to do that?  (I live in an homophobic country)

I mean i do have a tourist visa for the U.S. and all but I m not sure i will be able to live there and i will need a work visa to work and have money.

So i was wondering if anyone has any idea about the subject and whether the gay community have programs or support such as applying for asylum or to get a work visa. 

Thank you for your time.",gaybros
"How to deal with ""true"" Christians?","I entered a new work environment 2 weeks ago and I quickly made friends with ""B"" who is my age.

Today the group at work somehow went into the ""is being gay a choice?"" discussion and B surprised me with his hardcore religious statements:

""Men and women should be together, nothing else.""

""Homosexuality is a result of nowaday's fallen world, which I personally belong to and admit to being a result of, too.""

""My friend became gay because of his parents neglect and the friendly male neighbour who gave him love, so he associated love with a male figure and rejected women due to this. Only after he found God, did he find the right path etc.""

I tried to counter his statements by giving myself as a counter example to his friend and that I became gay despite receiving love from both parents. This argument really made him hit a wall, mentally.

But other than that I couldn't argue scientifically at all. It's not like it's been proven that there's a gay gene or that there's an explanation for homosexuality in the first place.

So how do I argue against that logic? I can't disprove his religion upon which his argumentation is heavily based on. Many have tried doing that and everyone has failed because it's just not tangible and is based on faith.

So how the fuck do I defend myself from him telling me all of this.",gaybros
oc inspired by my sad life :(,,gaybros
Thought this was pretty good,,gaybros
My LGBTQ card company is having a summer sale that I thought I’d shamelessly share!,,gaybros
Any Nashville bros? I'm moving to Music City in September!,"I'm a 27 y/o dude moving from Knoxville to start a new career. I'm probably going to live in the Berry Hill or surrounding neighborhoods as the job is in Franklin so I'm looking in South Nashville.

Any favorite spots (bars, food, parks, bookstores, cafes) or event/food blogs that y'all suggest? I've got a couple friends in the area, but always open to new friends or food/drink suggestions!!

✌️ Y'all",gaybros
Testing how fucking weird I can get with the sugar daddy scammer,,gaybros
How do you feel about FWB’s?,"I’be only been in that relationship once and for some odd reason, the guy stopped talking to me. Maybe he was upset I didn’t eventually develop feelings. I kept my feelings at bay to respect the relationship but I don’t know if I can do this anymore. I’m so ready to get into a committed LTR, and I’m so willing to be there. It seems like guys my age, 21, don’t want that. I mean, I try to accommodate and not develop feelings, no kissing, no eye contact but I can’t do it anymore. I need something of REAL substance and NOW, this new guy is interested in a possible FWB. Should I just be honest or no? Because part of me still has desire but I just want more. Like, I’m not the type to demand him to marry me on the first date but I am putting it out there that I’d like it to possibly lead somewhere, naturally, not forcefully and with the expectation that he has to commit and develop feelings. If it doesn’t happen, I’m okay with that. Still fucking sucks though.",gaybros
[Inspired by r/AskReddit] What's the worst sex you ever had?,,gaybros
My fiance wants a baby. I do not.,"This has always been a disagreement but it spiralled into a full out fight this morning. He saw a cute photo of his sister's husband holding their newborn son on Insta and said he couldn't wait to have children of his own. I told him ""Not to get his hopes up,"" and an argument we've had before hit mach 10. 

For the record, I am firm on this; I plan to have a busy career and I want to travel and live in a huge city right in the middle of things where raising a child is very difficult. Plus we do not have time or money for adoption/surrogacy. He is also firm, he desperately wants to have a kid one day. Is there any possible resolution? Do you understand where he's coming from?",gaybros
What should I get?,"So I'm 17 and Bi. I've been wanting a sexy toy for a little while now, In your guys opinion what is more fun and will give me more pleasure: A Dildo or a Butt Plug. I don't want to spend too much so I am only getting one.  ",gaybros
"Garrett Clayton Comes Out as Gay, Reveals He's in a Longterm Relationship",,gaybros
Hmmm,,gaybros
No one wants the type of guy that I am...,"I’m just your average triple minority that’s black, gay, and atheist. So, I guess my pool of potential people has dwindled rapidly with each order of magnitude. Especially in the gay community. No one is looking for me. No one wants fat, nerdy, black guys. sometimes I wish I wasn’t born black. Idk, I’m just deep in depression right now and I feel like a waste of oxygen on this planet. ",gaybros
Ass Acne,"Any tip/tricks/cheat codes to get rid of those ugly little red bumps? Plz halp! Like, how do I turn my average ass into a smooth edible bussy?",gaybros
"Workout Wednesday August 22, 2018","Share your fitness goals, regimen, and brag about your progress or latest accomplishments! 
",gaybros
I've had a harder time coming to terms with being effiminate than being gay,"anyone else? on one hand i hate that gay people are stereotyped, on the other hand... im gay and im like, really fuckin gay",gaybros
Should I propose?,"Hey gaybros!

I’m going on a cruise with my boyfriend next week, and have had this itch to propose to him. It could seem way too early to some people, as we have been together for only 8 months, but it’s hard for me to picture myself with anyone but him. 

In our short time together, we have already been through so much, that I don’t see anything else being able to break us apart. I know my family will freak out with it being so soon. Hell, I’m even weirded out about wanting to do this so soon. 

If anything, getting engaged doesn’t mean we’re getting married right away. We could be engaged for a while for all I know 🤷‍♀️

I was just curious to get some insight before doing this, because I haven’t talked to anyone about it yet! ",gaybros
Hey I just wanted to say that some 4chan group is brigading the chat room,I’m not sure how to stop them but they’re a bunch of accounts with Peter from family guy as the profile picture and they take shifts spamming the chat with homophobic and racist things and make it impossible to even use. Not quite sure what could be done but I assumed this could maybe get mods attention.,gaybros
Feeling really sad and alone at the moment,"So I’m 17 years old, a bisexual boy, but leaning more towards guys at the moment(I sway), and recently I have just been feeling really alone, I really want to have a meaningful relationship with someone, but I’m still sort of closeted save for my close friends and mum, anyone got any advice, because I just feel really down in the dumps not being able to find someone :(",gaybros
The Velvet Rage,"Has anyone else read this? 

It’s an interesting book but I’m having a hard time engaging with it because I don’t fit into the generalizations at the beginning (I had an emotionally present father and a fair amount of good male friends). I’m also wondering if I have gotten over the shame it describes in Part II or if I’m just repressing that shame. 

Wanting to hear others’ experiences with it. It’s made me think quite a bit tonight. 

EDIT: Wow it’s really cynical of any behavior outside the hetero-prescribed norm.",gaybros
What do you have to say? Upload your voice,"I used vocaroo to upload. 

[my post](https://vocaroo.com/i/s0yiXcaIKJ0T)

Edit: [I hate taking pictures but here is me. ](https://www.reddit.com/r/gaybrosgonemild/comments/9942m2/i_look_happy_to_be_anxious/) 

Please feel free to do the same !

Edit 2: I haven’t forgotten about you guys! I left work to get home to no WiFi! I’m trying to reset it now (I know it’s paid because I’m on auto-pay for everything) but I’m getting tired and I might need to go to bed before this issue is resolved. I get poor cell reception in my house too so I can’t upload bigger files :( 
I promise I will continue this ASAP!!",gaybros
Do you moan during sex?,"So I'm 17 and I always wondered what sex would feel like and I really wanna try it but there's unfortunately no one to try it with. So I always wondered whether I would moan if I actually would have my first time or just make no noises. I really to be honest can't imagine myself moaning to be honest I never even moaned when jerking off at least. I tried to moan one time just for fun when I was horny but I really felt very weird and I was very quiet when I tried it, and it didn't feel that special maybe a bit. 

What's your guys experiences? ",gaybros
A (hopefully) refreshing Workout/Fitness Playlist!,"Hey guys, I'm just sharing a Spotify playlist I created for my gym/running sessions.

Nothing worse than opening a workout mix that recycles the same old same old. This is a big varied mix of dance, house, big room, pop (and a few of the usual suspects just for fun haha).. hopefully you find something in it that you enjoy!

You don't have to follow if you don't want, it's really just all about the tunes x.

[Click here for the musiccc 💪](https://open.spotify.com/user/m-chael/playlist/68xQEEGN2s6OMbITpMq6LQ?si=ksMCp1AcQtqKFu8e2NMayA)

&amp;#x200B;

edit: Will be updating it as I go along, theres probably a good 100 or more songs I could add - didn't wanna overwhelm you guys haha",gaybros
What are the most and least stereotypically gay things about you?,"We all know that stereotypes aren’t necessarily accurate, but I thought it might be a fun question to ask what everyone thinks is the most and least stereotypically gay thing about themselves. For me I’d have to say that the most stereotypical thing about me is that I do my brows pretty often, and the least is that I enjoy/am good at math and statistics. How about you?",gaybros
Lucid dreaming about my hopeless love,"I don't know why I am sharing this here or if this is the right place. Just that I don't have anyone \[else\] to share this with, and it would do me good to get this out of my system.

I've had a crush on a close friend for many years, which I finally acknowledged to be love. I am bisexual and he's gay, a decade older, and helped me during my coming-out phase. In all this time, we've both been through multiple relationships, and he once politely and sweetly confirmed he wasn't romantically interested in me. He was in a relationship at the time (which I didn't know about), but I don't think that makes a difference, and we live in separate countries anyway. He also said that perhaps I felt that way because he was around at a difficult time. That isn't true, and in fact my strong feelings for him were the reason I realized my attraction to men. There hasn't been a day in the last few years when I haven't thought about him. I chose to not confront him with all that, and we continue to be friends (our contact is limited by geography in any case).

I'm not out to my family, and homosexuality is illegal in my native country. Lastly, I've been lucid dreaming for a long time. Lucid dreaming is when the dreamer is aware that they are dreaming, at which point they are able to control the dream to a good extent.

One day I decide to visit my family home, and lo and behold, he's there being hosted by my folks. It seems he wanted to give me a surprise, and my family's always happy to have a guest. We hang out, and I show him around town and have tons of fun. I keep throwing hints and flirt lightly, but am too timid to go beyond. This goes on for three days (skipping details of those days here).

On the third evening, we are by ourselves on the terrace under an extraordinarily starry sky, and I'm thinking how wonderful it's all been. And then it occurs to me: is this a dream? Come to think of it, that did cross my mind once or twice, but I just chose to ignore it. Now I realise that if this is a lucid dream, I can take it places.

My curiosity starts getting better of me, and I figure I'll confirm the dream by stamping my foot to see what the deal is (that's one of the techniques for realizing one is dreaming). I look down at my foot and it's there, but it disappears when I lift it up. As the confirmation hits, I am terrified of waking up before I have a proper conversation with my love. I scream his name, and am conscious of those screams possibly being heard IRL. He's close by and walks up to me.

Me: \[rapid/nervous\] You knew it was a dream all this time, didn't you?

He: Well, yeah.

Me: \[mild anger\] Then why didn't you tell me?

He: I wasn't supposed to tell you, you didn't want to know.

Me: Okay, before this goes away, let's…

And he was already leaned in and frenching me. We made out, and it felt as real as any kiss ever has. That went on for a while, and I didn't want to stop.

Me: I… I think this is starting to go. Why the fuck did I have to stamp my foot?

He: You know, whatever happens, we had a great time together. Make sure you don't forget…

Me: Forget what?

He: …

And I wake up, and look for my phone in a frenzy, record everything in a detailed voice memo less than 30 seconds after I get up. By the end of it, I'm crying.

This had a profound impact on me, somewhat positive and inspiring, but also reinforcing how important the potential of that relationship (or a relationship with anyone whom I could be head-over-heels over). This will never leave me.

This was a week ago, and I am back to my restless self, obsessing about him. All I can do is get back on the dating scene and do the Tinder dance at some point, which I find tiring now, but what else is there to do. And share this anonymously with my gay bros, and hear their experiences. If you think there's a more appropriate sub for sharing this experience or exploring my unrequited LGBT love, do let me know.",gaybros
What is your perfect wedding like?,"Bros, what is your idea of the perfect wedding?

For a lot of my pretty conservative family, it's fairly unconventional for me to marry a dude one day. Personally, it would feel weird for me to have a ""traditional"" wedding with everyone in church before a priest, etc. 

I want my wedding to be like the intro to the gay shows segment on Joel McHale's, ""The Soup""... Flames, Harley's, leather, rock music, and some deep voiced announcer proclaiming ""GAY SHOWSSSSS."" Jk jk. https://youtu.be/diskbC4DBLI

But in all honesty I picture it being a celebration of two dudes coming together, which is inherently masculine (whether my spouse turns out to be masc or not) since two dudes with functioning dicks are joining as one. Beers, rock music, Brazilian steakhouse catering or a cookout, in some great venue like a big mansion overlooking the Pacific coast, a camping excursion, cruise on a really big yacht, or an island. I want it to be the best party of our life and not some sappy affair with the old lady at the church piano playing ""here comes the bride"" as my husbro and I walk in.",gaybros
What are some small businesses you enjoy that sell sexy men's underwear online?,"It can be thongs, jockstraps, briefs, singlets, etc.

I know these things can be found on bigger sites, like Amazon, but I thought it'd be better to support smaller sites. Especially if they're owned and/or operated by those in the lgbt community.

Thanks in advance.",gaybros
First breakup postmortem,"It’s been about a week since my guy broke up with me and I wanted to share my journey on feeling my heart break. I’d like to think it’ll help others who experience this for the first time but it’s also for me to get my thoughts on paper.

In my late 20s, I entered my first real and long term relationship—we were together for a year and change. He was the first person I’ve introduced to my close friends, and that was a really big step for me. 

The end came out of nowhere; he said the morning after an amazing time at a music festival that we should break up. He said he never wanted to be in a relationship, and, though’s he told me that in the past, what he wanted now was to break it off completely. There were some recent signs, like being antisocial and talking like I wasn’t in his future plans, but I attributed those things to life events like the stress of job hunting and traveling overseas for work. 

My reaction was muted that morning because I was hungover. It didn’t hit me til later in the day. I started shivering, I was sweating, I had shallow breaths, and my stomach was doing backflips. I felt paralyzed in bed; I tried sleeping but couldn’t. I tried crying but couldn’t. I couldn’t eat. I kept trying to convince myself this was a bad dream and waited for his text to say we were still meeting for our dinner double date that night. 

The other couple, who are my friends, came to keep me company, and we decided to still go to dinner. I hoped he might still show up. He didn’t, and I continued to shiver, I had no appetite, and don’t remember any of the conversation that night. They kept me company all night and we sang songs at my house. I finally broke down when I asked to sing When Somebody Loves You from Toy Story. (A lot of love/breakup songs make so much more sense to me now lol)

The next few days weren’t better. I tried doing some things like watch a movie or have people over but I wasn’t able to focus. Every single thing in my house and in the city had a memory of him on it. And often when someone said something, I’d be triggered and just fall into a fond memory. I didn’t hate him. I didn’t have too many bad memories of him. 

I just felt confused and scared and alone. He texted the next day asking how I was, and I told him truthfully I was in pain. He just said he was glad I wasn’t ignoring him. 

I went through the workweek as a zombie; it was a total blur. I couldn’t hear things people were saying and I was totally unfocused. He called me Monday night and we chatted briefly. He said he was young and didn’t want to be tied down in a relationship, and he said that he said he was sorry he couldn’t give me a satisfactory answer. We texted a few times in the days that followed. 

I had some time to process, so I asked to go on a walk with him on Thursday. I wanted to retrace the first walk we did together and meet at the park we first met at. I wanted it to be a reflective talk, where we could talk it out (and some part of me hoped he’d reconsider). But he was really defensive and reluctant, repeating he said everything he had to say. Up until then, he was in control — dictating when we broke up, when we texted, what the narrative was. I wanted to take back my feelings and some of the relationship. I kept pushing and trying to get him to say why, after 1 year, even if he didn’t want to be in a relationship, we were still a thing. If he didn’t see it as a relationship, what were we doing? 

After a lot of yelling and trading barbs, he said he defined a relationship as being with someone you want to be with the rest of your life. He said he liked me a lot and liked being with me (a line he had used many times in the past), but now he added he no longer wanted to have sex (it got boring to him) and just wanted to be friends. I said I never thought we’d be together forever. If he moved away, I already knew that I wouldn’t be willing to pick up my life and go with him. So while we were on the same page, we never talked about it, which may have led to this sudden end. I also thought we had some more steam left to learn and grow from each other; we’d come to conclude to end things when the time came. I’m definitely not without flaws or fault, but I had a lot of love to give still. Instead, I felt he robbed me of a say in the decision. 

To remain friends, I told him I’d follow his lead, because I know he’s been able to remain friendly with his ex’s, and I have never gone this far before with anyone. So we hugged and cried one more time, and he sent a handful of texts that day. 

The next day he didn’t text at all. It drove me nuts. So I started asking myself: Why do I keep checking for his messages? He has no obligation to text me every day or at all. He still may be on my mind constantly but I have to get him off of it...because I’m no longer his priority. It made me sad all weekend, but I deleted the app we chatted on and turned off texts from him. I needed time to breathe and try to live without him. 

I’m sad that we didn’t get to finish things we’ve planned or long talked about: doing the symphony gala, making falafel waffles, going to Hawaii and Vegas together. 

I’m sad because it ended so abruptly—while it’s clear now he made up his mind a while ago, I was still chugging along. And both of these made me realize that I took time for granted: you never know how long someone will be in your life. My dad once told me life is like a train. You’re on a journey to a destination and there will be people who get on the train with you and hop off when it’s their time. I just didn’t feel prepared for that time to come so quickly. 

I haven’t been able to get a full night’s rest yet. I wake up early in the morning after a dream, then remembering we’re no longer together. Even though he kept saying he never wanted a relationship, I know we had something special, and it’s been so hard to let that go. It’s hard not to long for the good times, and hard to reconcile how much energy I gave to someone with a result like this. 

I feel a large emptiness in me: no one to share my thoughts with, no one to experience life with, no one to share my love with. I have great friends who kept me company all last week, but ultimately they have their own lives and SOs they turn to. I read this could be a sign of emotional dependency, and I’m reading more about how I can get over it, so I can live for myself and not for someone else. 

I see now why people say love yourself and take time to date yourself. I know I had a lot of shit buried but now it’s all coming out. I’m going to keep learning about my insecurities and hope to do better next time. 

What I’d advise others from all of this: Get your heartbroken early, so you know how to recover. It sucks the first time but better to get it out of the way sooner than later.  

Thanks for reading if you got this far. ",gaybros
Music you listen to during work out/gym?,"Just curious , because the music in the gym is sometimes... weird . I  listen to House , UKF or Kpop or 90s House.  And you ?",gaybros
"Bros, I think my ""boy?"" is gonna ask me to be his boyfriend","Hello Gaybros,

I don't want to sound dramatic or anything. I'm just ""scared"" this is happening to me. What's happening is that... I'm really in love with him. And he's with me. I don't doubt that for a second.

A month and 4 days ago, I've meet him on Tinder (I know right, I would never find the love of my life there, but shit... that happened). We instantly started talking a lot and we got the chance to meet 5 days after. It was amazing (he lives 60 km from me. He lives in Lisbon and I live in a rural area, Tinder matched us by ""accident"").

It was amazing how we \*always\* had subject. We found each other more and more into each other. We started talking 3-4 hours on the phone every single day, making video calls, texting in the morning, during the day. Caring a lot for each other. The empathy is undeniable  and this is like the second time in my life I'm sure I love him so much.  And he's... he's sure he does too. We managed to meet 3 more times after that. He spent a whole weekend with me when my parents moved for vacations. After we went on vacations together last week with my 2 best friends and they're like as much best friends as me and them are. They loved him. They said they never really saw me like that at all. After that, he came to my house and he's there for 5 days. So we're living together for 15(?) days now. And things are better each day.

We've had some fighting but because I looked kind unsure about my feelings (not because I am, but I got hurt a lot of times and he wanted to make sure I was the more open with him possible and he says he wants me to stop grabbing the past and live the life with him, that he's gonna do his best to make me the happiest person ever).

We started saying the L word to each other 4 days ago... And I'm getting the feeling he wants to ask me to be his boyfriend. I have absolutely no doubts that I love him so much and he does too. It's not about words, it's about attitude. He's literally living at my house while my parents don't arrive, he's cooking for me, he's taking care of my animals and house like it's his (my holidays ended, I'm at work again, so he wants to make sure he helps me the best he can while he's home-alone, even when he doesn't have ""rural"" experience, he's doing his best to please me and to help me).

What's cool is that even S is amazing with him, we never had the t or b conversation. It just happens. But even that is amazing and I enjoy every single second of it with him. I'm also not a *gold digger* at all, but he gets a shit ton of money monthly and he's not afraid to help me out without asking anything in return. It feels like I'm living a dream and I couldn't be happier. It feels way too good for me... I'm just not used to be loved this way. HE EVEN TAKES CARE OF MY ENTIRE FARM!! HE'S A CITY BOY!

I even had a ""small"" car accident and once I told him, he found a solution in less than 30 minutes to make me feel safe and secure. He said he wanted to pay (I won't allow that... I'm not with him because of money at all. My problems, I fix that. At least for now). But you get the good will you know?

I've never felt happier in my life. Every single second with him counts. We go dinner out, we go for walks,we spend hours looking at each other, we hold hands even making morning coffee. We keep smiling at each other, we keep telling each other how much we love each other. He told me a lot of shit that happening with his life he says he never told anybody: his father loss, his mother left him when he was young. A lot of bad shit also happened to him. But I don't... I don't ""care"" about. All I care is that he's good and happy now. It's just the way I am, I don't give a f\* about people's past, I want to build a future. But I'm too insecure about myself I can give someone a good and happy future and he... he deserves more than that. The word ""boyfriend"" scares the hell out of me.

Redditors... I'm afraid this is too soon and that I end up being disappointed again. But for the first time of my life, he's all I ever wanted to be happy and I know I make him the happiest guy ever. Please, advice me... is it too soon? All I want is to build my life with him but I'm afraid that's a bit early and I get my heart broken. Once I say that ""yes, I do"" I know I'm delivering him my heart in a box (I already did tbh) and I'm gonna feel wrecked if things don't turn out to be with a happy ending. But at the same time, he's giving me all the proof he loves me from the inside out. He loves all my worst, my best. He asks me gently to change my bad habits and slowly taughts me to leave them at my time and pace. He even gave me a extra cute watch he bought the other day with the excuse ""this is your temporary ring."".

I couldn't be happier, but I'm afraid to be hurt again. He's the first guy I kissed in public, held hands. Things are naturally evolving but my anxiety is making me crazy. Please, send help! @\_@ I NEED YOUR ADVICE MORE THAN EVER!

Have a great day, those who spend their time reading about my venting insecurities.

*@edit:* **check the comment I made below.**",gaybros
"If a guy you are seeing makes fun of fat people or a slightly racist comment every now and then, but are otherwise a 10/10 for you, is that a deal breaker?","Casual discrimination is bad, but a 10/10 is a 10/10. ",gaybros
Breakup Rant,"So, a little backstory first, my ex and I had been dating for about 2 years or so and late last year we broke up. I can barely remember why we even broke up it was that stupid. Anyway, we spent a few months apart and then we started talking again. We’d both been on a few dates with other guys but neither of us had any luck. I realised that I still had feelings for him and we’d started to go on a few dates with each other again and try and repair things. 

Fast forward to a few weeks ago, I ended up staying at his place for a week or so when I’d moved out of my university flat for the year. We got on really well and he was giving me all the right signs to make us an official thing again. Unfortunately, he was going off on a week long university trip in mainland Europe, so I decided to wait until after he got back to ask if we could be an official couple again. That’s when he started not replying to my messages.

When he finally messaged me, he said he’d met a guy there and that he really liked him. I feel absolutely crushed and heartbroken right now. I really thought that everything was going well for us finally. 

Sorry if that was a bit too ranty but yeah, I really needed to get it out

**Tl;Dr:** Guy I was falling for goes on holiday, falls for someone else within in a week

",gaybros
2018 problems: new gay parents have moved into the neighbourhood and now mum is pressurising me to settle down and have a baby “like those lovely men”. FML.,,gaybros
Got engaged on top of a mountain in South Korea ❤️,,gaybros
Snapchat Bros?,"Looking for more awesome people to snap with! I’ve met some bomb ass people off this forum that I’ve been Snapping with for over a year now! I’m 27 (almost 28) from Detroit, but I’m moving to Orlando next year! I’m a singer, LOVE DISNEY, and am very passionate about WWE too. Huge horror buff. 

Post your snap names below, or add me at TjXSinger",gaybros
"Table Tuesday August 21, 2018","Bros, what is on your table this week? 

Share your latest culinary creations and food porn! Stories of failed attempts are also welcome.
",gaybros
I'm new to all this (closeted but wanting a relationship),"Hi guys! I'm sure you know what this post is gonna be about from the title. I'm just looking for advice cos this whole thing is really unnerving!

To cut to the chase, I'm an 18 year old gay male who's still in the closet (it's pretty dark here!), however, I want to meet people (preferably sexually, but I'd still appreciate a romantic/platonic relationship). I'm a virgin and never done anything remotely sexual to a guy or girl. Same goes for dating. Of course, I won't meet my future boyfriend tomorrow, so I gotta work myself slowly into this whole dating scene. Yes, I'm in the closet, so it's gonna be much more difficult. I've asked anonymously for advice from gays online and a common thing they tell me is to **""STAY AWAY FROM GRINDR!""**. I'm not complaining though – the thought of meeting a stranger you just met and then going on each other is a bit scary for me. **BUT**, the thought of meeting a guy and sucking his dick and pleasing him is just so… ugh 🤤! Anyway, I'm not attractive so it's not like a simple profile picture will lure guys to me. Probably the contrary *\*sigh\**…

Tinder could be a thing, but I'm in the closet so I fear that I might be forcibly outed! I'm not sure what I'm supposed to do. If it helps, I live in Sydney and go to university. Oh, also, I'm pretty much an introvert, though once I get to know someone, I'd get more comfortable with them (unless they're really attractive – then I'd be self-aware of my ugliness and feel sorry for the other person for talking to a guy like me 😕). Other than that, I hope you all have a great day!

Cheers!",gaybros
I found this book in my new classroom today. I don't think this would be considered school appropriate.,,gaybros
Skin colored bike seats or something else? 😈,,gaybros
In need of some advice,  ,gaybros
Will anyone ever wanna be with me?,"Idk I am 17, I feel like I am not attractive enough for anyone to wanna go out with me... I am chubby and short, face wise I would not say I am ugly just chubby. Idk I feel like it will be a while I find another person that would find me attractive and would wanna date. Do you guys ever really consider chubbier guys? I mean like not obese, just a little fat. Idk I feel like it will be a while before anything happens to me. ",gaybros
Met a guy on Tinder... (Need advice),"Hey GayBros! I need y'all's advice. 

So, I met a guy on Tinder. We've gone out a total of three times now. Each time has been great: we've met for a drink or grab something to eat, and then we keep talking for several hours. So far, the conversation has flowed smoothly, and I'm into him: he's funny, smart and handsome. 

However, last night that I saw him, we talked about where this is all headed, and he said he doesn't want to force things but wait for it all to evolve organically. Now, I like the idea of not rushing into a relationship, but this is a guy I could see myself falling for. Waiting for things to just happen gives me a bit of anxiety as it is all very uncertain and could lead nowhere. With that being said, I have enjoyed myself being with him and would like to keep on seeing him.

Other than keeping my expectations on check, how do I navigate this situation? Or should I run for the hills? (Not going to like, there's a little voice in my head telling me this is all a bad idea). ",gaybros
Any recommendations for Melbourne?,"Visiting Melbourne in December and looking for some places to visit? Any good restaurants and good gay bars? Any other sights I should check out? I’ll be there for a week and debating hostels or Airbnb. 

",gaybros
"If you were a gay villain in a video game, what would be the name of your final attack?",What would the attack do to your opponent? Status effects? Etc...,gaybros
"If I had a dollar for every time a historian explained away an obvious gay relationship by saying ""It was a different time""",,gaybros
What celebrity do you suspect is gay?,,gaybros
Does sex ruin friendships ?,So yesterday I sorta fooled around with a close friend of mine. We're both openly gay so nothing to worry about on that end. But we both seem to be worried that it may make it awkward to hangout. That hanging out may keep ending up as sex.,gaybros
I’ve heard of stories of this but I’m not sure...squatters in the gay community?,"So, I hooked up with this guy twice. He seems off, nice, but off and not normal. He’s always paranoid and pacing and he does eccentric things. He just asked if he wanted to sub lease on my apartment because he just got booted out of his roommates place for who knows what reason. Then he asked if I could fuck him daily in exchange to live at my place. I don’t know what to do. I’m scared and I think I potentially have a squatter or whatever you call it on my hands.",gaybros
“59 M looking for a daddy!” Give me a fucking break...,,gaybros
8D Music// Better than Sex?,"Bro's.. I need to share this youtube channel
I don't go to church, but I know heaven when I hear it. 

Deceased. 



https://youtu.be/QYsGv8Vit2w",gaybros
Is there a reason to be out at work ?,"          I've always believed that one should keep some distance between their work life and their home life. However, to what extent is up for debate. So that's what I'm here to ask. What do you think? Is there really a reason to be out at work?",gaybros
"Me Monday August 20, 2018","It's that time of week again! Introduce yourself!

**Name:**

**Age:**

**Location:**

**One interesting thing that happened this week:**

**Photos:**

**Social Links:**
",gaybros
Turned down 3 times in a row,"So I came out to my family this summer and decided to start looking around for guys to date and maybe start a relationship with. One guy I talked to for about two months and I noticed he was getting more distant. So I asked him if he was still looking for something. He said no and that was the end of that. Something similar happened a couple weeks later and then again a couple weeks after that. Every single time I had to get them to tell me that they didn’t want to talk anymore. Please if you’re ever not interested in someone, just tell them. Don’t ghost them or ignore them. Nothing has felt trashier and I wish they would have just been upfront with me.",gaybros
Xpost I found interesting,,gaybros
Have you ever had a bromance with a straight guy?,What was that like?,gaybros
Boys boys boys boys who drive cars,"Aghhhh

I spent last night at a this guys house and I don’t usually ever stay over places. I really really like him. I’m at this point in my life where I’m looking for different things/different people. He’s the last person I thought I’d be so interested in but weirder things have happened hah I’m going back over tonight to cook him dinner, I think I’m gonna bring him flowers or something cause he seems very into gestures and he’s a bit conservative.  Yo this shit is so lit ",gaybros
How far we’ve come.,,gaybros
Folsom Street Fair ID,"Do they check ID at the entrance of FSF, I turn 18 in early October and want to go before I go off to college. ",gaybros
How straight guys see it...,,gaybros
Cant cum,"Hey Bros, so I have a problem that has seriously been stressing me out. Whenever I have sex with my boyfriend I can't ejaculate. I have no clue why, but I usually just shrug it off. Keep in mind I've only recently started having sex. And it's not him, I'm very attracted to him.

For whatever reason when I've tried masturbating during the past few days I haven't been able to cum either. I usually feel like I'm getting close then I panic and my penis goes soft. It sounds like a joke but I swear that's what has been happening to me for the past few days. Idk what's wrong and idk if this is the right place to turn to but it's becoming a problem in my realationship and it's stressing me out. I haven't been able to cum in about a week and I've been trying to everyday. I've never appreciated my penis working without any problems until now.

Any advice or stories would be super helpful, thanks. ",gaybros
The Wrestlers Are Not Really Wrestling----The worst bait ever!,,gaybros
The gay history of British Royals,,gaybros
"Got turned down on a date because I'm not a ""strict top""?","Hey dudes, bi guy here for the first time. Some background -- I'm an athletic 6'2"" guy, don't have tons of sexual experience, been with a few guys here and there. I consider myself a top since I've never really enjoyed bottoming, but I have tried it while hooking up with other tops before. (I've only had a couple of sexual encounters with other bottoms / vers guys, in fact.)

Anyway the other day I was chatting with a cute guy on Grindr (who self-identified as a bottom). We started texting off the app, and were planning a dinner date. He asked I was a top, and said yeah, I've bottomed a few times and didn't really enjoy it, but that meeting the right guy is also important. A day later I hear from him and he days he thinks that we're not compatible since he prefers ""strict tops"". I asked him to clarify and he said that he wasn't interested in someone willing to bottom.

Is this a thing? I was pretty confused and disappointed, and I don't really get the need/desire for strictness here (if I'm still gonna be a top with him, what does it matter?). Have others experienced this, or have similar preferences? Trying not to be judgy, just want to understand.

EDIT: clarified language about experiences with other guys (in first paragraph)",gaybros
Relationship structures: Primary partner and side man?,"Hey guys, I'm looking to get a better understanding of today's dating norms and behaviors. I'm a 32 year old guy living in Minneapolis. I've been a in a few relationships in my life, some more substantial and meaningful than others. As some of you guys my age can relate to I grew up with the development of internet dating culture, so I understand the facility of it.

Minneapolis -like most urban areas I'm sure- is dominated by grindr and other dating apps. Seemingly every gay here is connected to the apps and uses them frequently. Whether it results in dates or hookups or not, its presence has altered the dating scene to the point where spontaneous face to face meetings say at a bar or out somewhere is collectively considered less valid to meeting someone online.

In light of a culture thriving on the idea of there are always other men out there to function as play things or secondary partners, I want to reach out and get a feel for what you guys notice in your communities. In practice, how often do guys in relationships keep open or have more than one partner, hook up individually or together?",gaybros
I actually got my first kiss lmao,"This was probably the MOST ballsy thing I’ve ever done in my whole life, and I’ve like jumped 20 feet off a ledge into the ocean. 

So to provide a lil’ context, my dumbass fucked up my grades junior year, so my sister (aka. Third parent) told me I couldn’t go out  until I finished ALL of my assignments for the weekend :,). 

I wanted to go on a tinder date (don’t attack me pls I use it responsibly I promise!!!) last night, and I couldn’t let my sister know (I wasn’t allowed to go on tinder dates because of my punishment), so my friends and I planned a dinner before I met up with my date, so me going out late would’ve been understandable... 

I still would’ve gotten an FAT ass-whooping anyways but it wouldn’t be as bad as going on a date with someone I met online :/

So I went to the main strip of my city and met with my tinder match after.

It was maybe around nine or so, and we walked to the beach from his place. We found a good, dim spot away from other people, and we started talking. We talked a lot and we opened up to each other about a lot of things. 

At one point, I talked me never having my first kiss, and I don’t remember the exact conversation, but it led him to tell me “lay one on me”. If it wasn’t dark, you probably could’ve seen my cheek go tomato red. I started flustering my speech, I went for it. 

And like, it felt... really nice. After that, we talked a lot more and just watched over the beach. 

In the end, I came home at like 1:00 am, and luckily, my sister went out early and couldn’t watch me over and my parents knew I was out with “friends” so they didn’t even bother texting me to go home. 

The date was probably was one of my best I’ve had. It was nice just talking about life and stuff to him, he was really sweet and he hella hyped me up, it was an overall really nice date.

I think Im so okay with kissing him because at least from what I see, it meant a lot to both of us. 
 This is just me being flustered and shit lmao, thought I’d celebrate my first kiss on here 🤷🏽‍♂️

TL;DR I got ballsy and went on a date without my sister knowing and it ended up me getting my first kiss which was really nice and sweet 

",gaybros
"What's the most recent song you've listened to that you would describe as ""Intense""? What about ""Gay""? And what about ""Intense and gay at the same time""?","This is my incredibly inefficient replacement for Spotify's Discover Weekly which I can't get to work right now for some reason.

[Powerful- Hunger by Florence and the Machine](https://youtu.be/5GHXEGz3PJg) 

[Gay- I'm Not Madonna by Hi Fashion](https://youtu.be/XVFn51VNRVQ?list=LLzCTR9LoizJ3b0hKG6y3XQQ)

[Intense and Gay- Kill V. Maim by Grimes](https://youtu.be/c2EJMd7ZN7w)

",gaybros
What was your first date like?,"So I haven't had my first date yet and I was wondering if you bros would like to share your first date experience. If you were able to change something about your experience what would it be? Also what tips would you give a high schooler, that has never had a boyfriend, that's has never been on a date before? Peace ✌️ ",gaybros
"Went out with someone, would like advice on how to proceed","Hi everyone, this is my first post here. There's a tl;dr at the end.

So, I started using Grindr two weeks ago because I was somewhat tired of not knowing a lot of gay folks. It's worth saying that I've never had a boyfriend or hooked up.

Among other people out of which no concrete plans really came up, a guy looking for ""making original plans and taking photos"" wrote me and we kinda clicked. We exchanged numbers and he even called me for a bit.

Well then, we agreed to go out. I had a pretty good time, we got to know ourselves a little bit and he even grabbed me by my shoulder to cuddle with him and started to touch my hair saying how much he liked it.

I didn't really make such advancements out of fear, so I was pretty glad he did. Anyway, we parted ways, hugged, and agreed to keep texting each other...

...Which brings me to this: I think I fell for this guy and want to see him again . But I don't really know if what we did is considered to be a date. I don't even know if he's looking for a boyfriend or if he stands by just ""original plans"". And me being a little shy and fearful, I find it a bit hard to make a significant move. 

Today I let him know that I'm up for more plans on another day.

Could you guys please give this inexperienced mess some advice? Should I text him tomorrow, too? Should I try to keep going out with him and slowly gain confidence with him before making any other move? Should I ask him if he's looking for something else or just straight up tell him I kinda like him? Should I back off because he may be looking for other guys on Grindr, too? The latter is what I'm most afraid of.


Sorry for the huge textwall! Any help is appreciated!

**Tl;dr I met a guy on Grindr and we went out to get to know each other (not sure if it's worthy of being called a date). I kinda fell for him and would like advice on how to proceed to get him to go out with me some other time and maybe letting him know that I'm into him**",gaybros
Where do you folks see yourself in 10 years?,"After being pretty much done with college and landing a steady income, boyfriend, and housing situation, I have been thinking a lot about how time I actually have to pursue my goals. Thinking ahead is not something I am to keen on, but I am really excited to get into what I want to do. That being: working with queer communities. Maybe running a community center one day!",gaybros
How the internet has changed dating,,gaybros
a tall meme but funny,,gaybros
Gaybros in DC who don’t have Facebook?,I’m a gaybro in the Washington DC area looking for fellow gaybro friends. How can I meet them if I don’t have a Facebook?,gaybros
Update: So I’m coming out tomorrow...,"Edit: Adding link to previous post, phrasing and more information 

[Previous Post](https://www.reddit.com/r/gaybros/comments/985cpd/so_im_coming_out_tomorrow/)

Ok, first I want to thank each and every one of you for all of the love and support. This was not easy for me to do today. It was an absolute emotional roller-coaster. I’ll give a quick summary of everything that happened. 

I moved into the apartment and got most of my things unpacked. I was fine up until the point of meeting my sister for lunch. I began to get extremely nervous and scared of my parents reactions, and I didn't say anything during lunch or the ride back to the apartment. We got back to the apartment and finished unpacking a few things and they said that they were going to head out to drop my sister off. I ran back into my room and grabbed the letter from the previous post (last night I wrote the letter out by hand because I thought that it would be more personal). As we were saying our goodbyes I got really emotional and started crying. I handed my mom the letter and told them to read it later, and walked back up to my apartment. 

They sat in the parking lot and read the letter and then drove off. At this point I was an absolute wreck, I regretted giving them the letter, I regretted opening up. Fast forward about 45 mins. I get a text from my mom saying that they want to see me before they leave town. I get in my car and met them in a grocery parking lot. When they pull in the parking lot I start to freak out a little, unsure of what they will say or do. 

The very first thing that happens is that my dad gives me a hug, and I start crying. Through the crying, he apologized for everything that he has ever said that was homophobic and said that I better not think that he will do anything except love me. I start absolutely balling my eyes out. After a few moments they both said that they support me 100% and that they will always be there for me, no matter what. A few more things are said, and we all cry some more. They ask me want I want them to do or if I need anything from them. All I say is ""This, this is what I need from you. This moment."" We go back to the apartment and finish the final few things. After about an hour they head out, we say our goodbyes and they leave. 


Right now I feel extremely good, a 10,000 pound weight has been lifted off by chest. I cannot thank everyone enough for the love and support that you have given me. I known that it will take time for them to be completely open and accepting of this, and I will give them as much time as they need. I know that I am extremely lucky to have the parents that I do, and that many others are not nearly as lucky. Again, I want to thank everyone of you because y'all gave me the strength to come out today, and I could have never dreamed of them having a better reaction.
",gaybros
TTITD,"Hey bras. Any of y’all heading to Burning Man? Just a week away! 

I’ll be camping with Trifucta at 4:15 and Esplanade. Huge sound camp with an adult playground and cargo net suspended above the dance floor. 

What’re you most excited for this year? ",gaybros
A couple words of encouragement would be very kind,"I'm 17 and I signed up for this dating website half a year ago but I'm not very active I'm just curious to see what people are there and what they are looking like. It's for adults but I don't have a face pic on there, I know I shouldn't do this but I again was just very curious. There aren't any gay guys in my area or in my school so there's a big city an hour away from my town where a ton of gay guys are so I just set my location on that big city. I visit the city every once in a while because I have family members there. I live in Germany btw. I talked to a bunch of people on that site but at some point they wanted to have face pics so the conversation wasn't going anywhere or they were very old or very annoying or I just didn't had a good feeling talking to them or simply just being not very nice. I don't feel comfortable with sending people twice or triple my age pictures of myself. There were like some people I almost would have met up with but for certain reasons it didn't happen. Which is very surprising to me cause you really could say that the universe is trying to tell me I'm not ready. 

But like 2 months ago I met this guy let's call him Jan, I only took a letter out and added 2 letters so his name looks a little similar. Also he's s 31 but he doesn't look it maybe you could say 26-27-28. He lives in this big city where there are a lot of people who speak English cause it's like a city with a lot of tall buildings and a lot of banks and stock exchanges etc. His profile had 3 cute pictures but it his profile didn't say much and it didn't say what language he speaks so I thought he would just speak german so I said hi and asked him how his weekend has been in German, and he responded in English, and then I said I was confused in English, so that was a pretty fun start of a conversation :) I remember looking at his profile and thinking he was really cute. He asked for pictures and I somehow didn't had a problem sharing pictures cause right at the beginning I was very comfortable talking to him because he was so polite and sweet. He almost always attached a "":)"" on his messages which was soo cute. We talked about a bunch of things I said I was going to watch Love, Simon and what we watch on Netflix just cool stuff. The night I told him about Love, Simon we were talking about romantic stuff and I asked him if he would date me and he said although I'm a little too young for him he would love to go on a date with me but when I read that in my mind I was like ""yeah... sure... 😓😓"" I never do these kind of things but he wasn't intrusive about it at all. He's actually very nice and polite. I of course told him right at the very beginning I'm not 18 as my profile says. After a couple days I noticed he didn't wanted to talk anymore cause his responses were getting shorter so I confronted him about it and he was even surprised that I noticed. He said I was a little too young for him. Which I totally understand and agree with now, If I would be 31 and a 17 yo who also is underage would ask me out it would make me very very uncomfortable too. His profile said he's looking for friends and a relationship and I asked him about what he's looking for and he said ""dates and maybe a relationship"" his profile did not say anything about hook ups but I'm not sure about if he only really looks for dates and a relationship. 
Sometimes it's good to question everything right? 

Now this is the 3rd post I'm doing about him so the next bites of information are already on my post history and it's very long so I'll try to make it really short. I tried to stop talking to him 2 times and after that I just couldn't get him out of my head so I messaged him again, one or two times with a very long message saying like yeah please don't hurt my feelings, I want to get to know you blablabla, which I totally regret now but the first time I just asked if he wanted to continue our conversation and see where this goes. He agreed. But after some time I started to take it a little too serious (long messages) even though I don't know why he would still respond. So we continued chatting and I was most of the time asking questions but yeah he even said that he enjoyed talking to me which was very sweet. But it was kinda hard believing him because I just thought that I'm so annoying. I asked him if he would go on a date with me and he said ""maybe but you're just soo young"" 

I was feeling a bit frustrated because he wouldn't want to know anything about me except for a couple of things or If I asked him what he wanted to know about me. I told him how feel about it and he said ""I guess I'm not that talkative but I'm a great listener :)"" so yeah maybe it's that. At some point he said he likes me as a friend which is a bit weird since we only chatted through texts. But I'M definitely the weird one here, not him. 

He's actually a very interesting guy he said he's from Slowenia and moved to the US and then lived in London for two years and is now making his PHD in economics and his doctorate so he has pretty high education and he also works in an office. I'm planing maybe going to university too. He's been single for a long time so he has dated a bunch and he's bisexual and he's versatile. He's online a lot but not always only every couple hours. He just seems like a very sweet and genuine guy. I know we are in completely different life stages but he said when I asked him about what ages he usually goes for he said that he goes preferably for younger guys around 25-22 and even around 20. He said that I'm mature for my age in the beginning but I don't know how he feels about it now. Like 2 weeks ago I said ""you really don't want a date? :/"" He apologized and said that I'm just too young for him. But later said when I asked If I should wait a year that 18 is still too young for him. So he said ""maybe in 3 years ;)"" 

We actually talked for 1,5 months and for someone who already said in the beginning I'm too young for him is a bit confusing. Maybe there's interest between us but it's very hard to tell. But on my side there's definitely one but I don't know maybe he's just being nice although I don't get why someone would talk to me for so long, when there's clearly not anything going to happen. He didn't mention my skin colour once, which was soo nice of him because there a lot of people who say ""yeah I've never done anything with a black guy I really wanna try it"" maybe it's just meant to be a compliment or whatever but every time someone says that to me it really makes me upset. He just didn't see race in me which I really cherish about him. 

A week ago I was being a bit intrusive but he still would answer my texts I didn't send more than 2 or 3. But when I tried to start a conversation I brought up that I was in school (which he already knows) and I'm now 10th and he didn't responded and I asked him If that made him uncomfortable and he said yes.
He was very polite about it. We then put things to an end.

I completely accept the fact that he doesn't want a date with an underage guy like honestly. I can really imagine how he feels about that. But I have a hard time getting over him. I can't imagine how scared I would feel if he actually agreed for a date especially because English was not my mother tongue. And I feel very intimidated when I hear people around me who speak English with an American accent. He really seems like a very nice and caring guy. This would be completely out of my comfort zone. But at the same time I love English so much it's my favorite subject in school. But I'm glad that he didn't want a date. But I think I would want to try to ask him again in a year cause then I'm legally an adult. If his account is still active of course which I really hope. Cause right now I have to focus on my school because I'm graduating next year and I need to study for the final exams and my presentation exams so I see the universe has a very very good reason why it didn't happen. I would just want a simple meet up and go drink something and see if there's chemistry. Since my mom wants to move to that big city next year I'm very excited. I'm in the closet so I don't know but it's a big city and nobody knows me except a couple of my aunts who live there.

I sometimes can't believe that I actually wanted to go on a date with a 31 year old , like this time I was the one who wanted a date so bad usually people would ask me for a date. When I'm class I look out the window and I start to fantasize about him and what our date would be like and what things we would talk about. And then I think about all the embarrassing texts I send and the second I think about that I quickly make fists because I want to punch myself in the face so bad for being so pathetic. Then I feel very guilty about wanting to go on a date with a 31 yo, I look around my classroom or at home at my mom and I see all my classmates and my teachers and in my head I'm like ""they have no idea..."" which makes me feel even more guilty. 

I clearly have a obsession with this guy but I'm really trying, believe me, I'm really trying to suppress it and not to think about him. I don't have many friends after schools over, I always feel very lonely but music sometimes helps. I also every couple hours catch me myself talking to him on a date in English in my head and then I'm like ""COULD YOU PLEASE STOP"". When I'm alone at home I even just start talking like actually talking like he was sitting in front of me its so pathetic. 

But I really want to try it in year. I don't think he would go on a date with me in a year from now but yeah only time will tell. I can also really imagine myself being ok with him not wanting a date next year. I'm fully okay with him not wanting a date now because I know why it can't happen and I also want to grow up a bit before I would ask him in a year again, who knows maybe he'll change his mind he's already going for younger guys so yeah. It doesn't even have to be a relationship I would even love to be his friend. He seems like he could be an amazing friend to have. Although I don't know how a friendship between a 18 yo and a 32 yo is supposed to work but time will tell. But I'm okay with being alone since I'm used to it. 

I just wanted to express my feelings, I know I have to deal with this situation on my own. I'm not sure but it's I think even affecting my school life like I have a really hard time concentrating in class because I think about all of this and it's making me feel guilty. It's a lot of information I know, I'm sorry, but I just can't talk about it with anyone. what would you even think if a 17yo tells you that irl oh my gosh. Thank you so much for reading this. ",gaybros
Life is shit,"I am 23. I have never had a relationship and I never will. I regret the fact that all other people get to experience relationship and stuff way back in highschool while I am so far behind and I will never catch up. And I never will. It's time to face facts. 1. My family will never love and accept me if I am gay.
2. My friends will never love and accept me if I am gay.
3. I will never get to have a real relationship, get married, have my family at my wedding.
And  don't give me all that stuff like ""make your own family"" and so on because I don't believe in that. There is nothing I can do. I was just fucked from the start to be born here. Bad luck, bad chance or whatever. My life sucks. ",gaybros
"Londoner travelling to the States this weekend for the first time - how gay friendly are New Jersey, Pennsylvania and New York?","The UK government's travel advice is pretty useless and just says that attitudes vary hugely across the country. In London, I feel relatively safe coming out to pretty much anyone - is it the same over there? If I go on dates, are restaurants and bars likely to give me crap - like refuse service or be really rude? Any spots in particular you would recommend? ",gaybros
Bottom power!,,gaybros
Is online dating the main way to meet people now?,"I've tried it, and I don't seem to get any lasting conversations. I also don't like taking pictures of myself. Is this something I'll just have to get to used to because the gay dating pool is limited?",gaybros
Had my First real Gay Date,"And it was absolutely amazing.  I never realized, after a decade of dating and relationships, that a first date could feel like this. I don't think I've ever enjoyed myself this much on a date before.  Of course maybe it helps actually being attracted to your date.  Weird to think that I had thought I was just abnormal because I wasn't excited about my dates in the past, that it was just my curse to not feel sparks.

We went to a local brewery to drink some beers, went out for dinner, held hands walking on the beach, and listened to a bunch of drunk Marines sing karaoke.  I hope there are many more nights like this, and as much spark.  I don't want to ramble on too much, but I just can't believe how much I have enjoyed myself with him the two times we've been together.  It's hard not to let my hopes get up too high.

Just thought I'd share",gaybros
Has anyone seen an anime called Free! Iwatobi Swim Club?,I think you'll like it a lot.,gaybros
The Fetishising of Arabs in Australia (Sydney &amp; Melbourne specifically),"Hey bro’s, 

I’m a Lebanese gay guy in Sydney, Australia. I was wondering if any other Arab/Middle Eastern guys around the world experience this? 

When guys ask for your ethnic background, and you tell them, there’s an overwhelming reply of “I love arabs/lebs” etc.

Is this commonplace everywhere? I’ve always found it pretty gross. Comments like “you must have a huge dick” or “do you want to dominate me?” 

Keen to hear everyone’s experiences in relation to this.

Just for a bit of context for those who aren’t from Aus, Arabs here are pretty rough. Hyper masculine, juiced up, drive nice cars and are generally obnoxious but extremely attractive because of it. I know right? ",gaybros
good to know,,gaybros
"Whats your biggest non sexuality themed ""I've found my people"" moment",I may have become a music festival person. Everyones kind and covered in glitter and you get to see cool stuff happening and people do weird and wacky tricks,gaybros
IDLES - SAMARITANS,,gaybros
Advice on What to Get for a 6-month Anniversary?,"I have my 6-month anniversary coming up. I've never really been big into the whole thing, but my boyfriend is. I know he's getting me something, but he won't give me any hints on it, so I have no idea what to get him. Any ideas on what I should think about getting, bros?",gaybros
So I'm coming out tomorrow...,"Edit:

\[Update\]([https://www.reddit.com/r/gaybros/comments/98e6b5/update\_so\_im\_coming\_out\_tomorrow/](https://www.reddit.com/r/gaybros/comments/98e6b5/update_so_im_coming_out_tomorrow/))

Just a little background. I'm 21, and from a deeply religious family in the south. I have know that I was gay for probably 7 years now, but only accepted it as fact this summer. My friends will be ok with it, and won't care. I am moving to college for my senior year tomorrow, and I am going to come out to my parents. I am not out to anyone else, and I want my parents to be the first people that I come out to.

I am planning on telling them after I move in and then giving them this letter.

&gt;Dear Mom and Dad,  
&gt;  
&gt;I cannot thank you enough for all of the love and support that you have given me for the first 21 years for my life. The two of you are the two people that I trust most in this world. You have always said that I could come and talk with you about anything and tell you anything without you getting upset. Up until now I have not taken you up on that offer. I have walled myself off from both of you and have lied to you. I am writing this letter so that I can change that. So that I can be completely open and honest with you. I have something that I want to get off my chest. I’m gay.  
&gt;  
&gt;I don’t know if you knew this already, or if this is news to you. I know that this may not be easy for you to understand or accept. I wanted you two to be the first people that told because I love and trust you two more than anybody else I know.  
&gt;  
&gt;Firstly, I want you to know that I am sure that I am. I have thought about this for a very long time. I questioned it and fought against it for years and tried to not be. I tried to convince myself that I wasn’t. I am not ashamed of who I am.  
&gt;  
&gt;Secondly, I want you to know that this does NOT define me as a person. This is only one aspect of who I am. I will not let this dictate my life or who I am as a person.  
&gt;  
&gt;Lastly, I want you to know that nothing has changed. I have always been this way, I did not change or choose this. The son that you have known for 21 years is the same son that is writing this letter. I still love all of things that I loved before telling you this. I am just opening up and revealing something that I have kept hidden for years.  
&gt;  
&gt;This is not easy for me to admit, I have been trying to figure out how I was going to tell you both for months now. I have struggled with depression and the stress of coming to terms of you I am. I don’t want this to change our relationship. I want to have a healthy relationship with you both, and I want to be happy.  
&gt;  
&gt;I wanted to open up and tell you about this one aspect of myself that I have struggled with and hide for years because I have not been happy for a long time. I want to be happy and I don’t want to be depressed anymore because I am hiding something from you. God made me this way for a reason and I don’t know why. Maybe to help people become more welcoming and accepting of people who are different from them. Or maybe to help me grow as a person.  
&gt;  
&gt;I know that it will take time for you to come to terms with this, but I want you to know that I love you both more than anything else in this world.

I am nervous, but ready to stop hiding this fact. I am ready to live my life and be happy.",gaybros
Have you ever been hit on by a guy in a restaurant before?,,gaybros
Thoughts on coming out to one parent before the other?,"I know my mom will be okay with it, but not so sure about my dad. Is it unfair for my dad if I tell my mom first?",gaybros
"Saturday Songs August 18, 2018","What are you listening to? Share your music recommendations here. 

Spotify, Apple Music, Google Play links are encouraged!
",gaybros
Discreet only,,gaybros
He's married to a woman.,"I got hit on (yay!) I was excited to see how things will go. We met up twice and got coffee. He's fun to talk to, but he's married to a woman anddddd she knowsssss. They got married because he says they're soulmates. And I was a little confused. He was shy to tell me this. Fortunately, I took it well since it was a date and we didn't hookup or do anything. 

Has anyone heard of something like this? ",gaybros
Thoughts on dating/hooking up with trans men?,"this is something I’ve been thinking of for a while. I honestly don’t think I’d be able to get with a trans man because, well, I very much dislike female genitalia. Does anyone else feel the same way? Why or why not? I’m sorry if this comes off as transphobic. I have much love for my trans brothers and sisters, just wanted to share my thoughts. ",gaybros
Handy map if you are going to Europe,,gaybros
"In 1940, Cary Grant played a man who tracks down the guy who was banging his wife. In reality, these two actors were banging each other.",,gaybros
"I Freaking Did it, bros... I Came Out!","I've known I'm gay for 13 years and now, at age 26, I am officially out of the closet. I came out to an online friend of mine recently and I guess it awoke the courage inside me to finally come out. I had planned to come out on National Coming Out Day in October, but for some reason today I just said screw it. I took my younger sister aside (she's bi so that's why I came out to her first) and just told her. She kept asking,, ""Really? Like, really? Seriously?"" and I kept having to nod and say yes until she finally believed me. She was happy for me so I immediately left my room and told my mom. After the words came out her expression froze for 10 or 15 seconds or so while she processed the truthfulness of my claim. I'm a joker and a prankster so it wouldn't be unbelievable for me to come out as a joke. If I wasn't actually gay, that is. After I assured her that I wasn't joking she was totally fine with it. ""It's not like I'm gonna love you any less. You're still my boy,"" she said casually. Both her and my dad were friends with gay men in the '80s so I knew I had nothing to worry about.

 I then zipped off to the kitchen where my dad was cooking dinner and gave him the ""news"" as well. First reaction: ""Psh. Yeah,"" accompanied by an unbelieving smile. He thought I was joking as well. I assured him that I wasn't kidding and he asked me how I knew to which I answered simply, ""'cause I'm attracted to men."" That was good enough for him apparently and he said the same thing my mom said. A while later he came into my room and jokingly asked if that means I'm going to start wearing rainbows and become fabulous to which I jokingly replied, ""Yeah, I came out because I want to start on the road to becoming a drag queen."" The reason why both of these things are funny is due to how not me both of those things are. 

After telling my dad I made a beeline for my older brother's room and told him. His reaction: ""Okay. Whatever. Doesn't really matter to me."" A perfect response by his standards. My aunt was last and she told me, ""There's nothing wrong with it at all. You're my nephew and I still love you."" Very sweet of her to be so reassuring. So yeah, the only person left to tell is my older sister and brother-in-law, but for all intents and purposes I am no longer in the closet.

It feels... pretty much no different. I thought I would get all emotional and that I would cry, but it was actually extremely casual like I was telling people I liked chocolate ice cream or something as equally insignificant. I'm glad to be out; I feel lighter and freer, but I still feel like the same bro I was before. Well, I hope all of you bros are having a good one and if you made it this far know that I appreciate it. Well, now that I'm out I guess I'll... go back to playing video games just like I was yesterday.",gaybros
"Anyone else think construction workers are hot af? (Also, advice request.)","There's a building under construction across the street. I always see the construction workers walking around and I get so turned on by the fact that they're covered in paint or dust. Lots of them are Latinos and tatted all over. Yum. :P

The advice part. Has anyone here ever engaged in sex with a random person you saw in person somewhere? I'm pretty sure there are places at or near the construction site that are private enough for a quickie. The problem is the guys are usually in pairs. I try to make it obvious when I check them out but I'm afraid to approach one because I don't wanna get beat up or embarrass them. 

Tips/Tricks to show a masculine construction guy that I'm interested without being too obvious would be appreciated. I've always used Craigslist and apps. So never learned that skill.",gaybros
My mom thinks if I go to prom with a girl then I won't be gay anymore,"She's been pressuring me for the past month to ""figure out what girl you want to ask"" and to ""find a pretty girl to go with""

._.",gaybros
"Exchange in Long Beach, CA.","G’day everyone, how are we today?!

I’m a 24 year old Australian who will be at CSULB for four months while on an exchange program. 

Back in Australia I’m out to everyone but I’ve never actually been able to legitimately explode my gay side. The area I’m from is accepting but doesn’t have much of a scene. I’m looking to make as many gay friends as possible because I have questions about being gay and I haven’t been on a date in years. 

If anyone knows of any gay youth meet-ups or something please let me know! Thanks!",gaybros
Having real trouble finding a guy with the same interests/passion.,"So I'm super into bodybuilding/ powerlifting and would like to find a guy who's just as dedicated, but so far, I've come up dry. 

It's a very big part of my life and I like to take it extremely seriously .  would love to find someone with the same dedication. 

How did any of you manage to find a guy like that? Any tips would be greatly appreciated.

(Wish there was a specific gay dating app / site for gym freaks)",gaybros
VENT: I don't feel safe.,"School started again, and the people who have been away from pointless drama for over a month are back for even hotter steaming shit! Now, as of this moment, nothing big has happened to me yet, but I can't shake the feeling that something is about to happen very soon.  


For context, I'm a high school junior and in the closet, I plan for it to stay that way. I go to a school in a poor city and lately, my fellow students have collectively become a bit more hostile than I'm used to. I've been hearing about flaming religous debates, latent douchebags have become overt douchebags and so on. I often walk through the halls and see the usual full-of-themselves looking condescendingly at me and talking to each other, but I can't help but notice that they've increased in quantity.   
It's almost as if now, where classes have become a lot more mixed, people begin to notice and talk about each other more.  
The thing that makes me uncomfortable though is the steadily increasing talks about lgbt subjects among them. I sometimes catch glimpses of their conversations, such as ""You can't call them human."" ""Nah, he's g-\*aprupt silence\*"" or the good old ""faggot"". The reason this troubles me so much is, the aforementioned increased looks I get from various students. Sometimes behind my back, from the distance, and some guys even watch me directly and wait for me to look at them so they can have tea to spill.  


I plan to stay in the closet until I've graduated because obviously, I'd get attacked by various means, physically and mentally if I came out, but what if it doesn't matter if I came out? What if they collectively decide that I'm gay and begin to wordlessly sabotage me and my school carreer? I feel like all the effort I went through to hide my gayness isn't enough and that I must become even more closed off- but maybe my fake attitude is what sparked this subconcious suspicion of me in the first place...  


I don't want to talk about this to my father because he is doing his best to banish all traces of my gayness out of his conciousness. All he cares about is me getting perfect grades and wordlessly taking all of his insults while fixing all of his mistakes because if I don't, I'm gonna get the blame anyway. Not to mention that I'm gonna get thrown out if I admit to being gay. I have a mom who knows about all this, but I don't want her to get too involved, as I think it's unfair for her to have to try to support me on her own.  
I considered talking to a teacher about this, but where will it go from then? I can't go to a teacher just to vent, and I also don't want anything to change, yet something must change for the better, or else it's all going downhill automatically.  


Should I take it easy? Should I try harder? Any advice?",gaybros
"Someone Wrote a LeBron James Homoerotic Novel, and it's Awful",,gaybros
"Open relationships are a big “no no” for me. I have no problem with other couples doing it, because maybe that helps them, but I want my boyfriend/husband to be devoted to me and vice versa. Is this a common opinion nowadays?",,gaybros
Does anyone else have doctors INSIST on giving lectures about safe sex once they find out you're gay?,"So I've been to like 4 doctors in the past 5 years (lots of moving and one retired).  Every time I need to fill out a form asking me basic lifestyle questions and often if I'm gay.

As soon as they get to that part of the form they insist on ensuring I'm having safe sex.  Usually this is fine, gays are high risk, but today I went to a doctor (in a very progressive city) who INSISTED on forwarding me to go on Prep.  I kept telling him I always had safe sex no matter what so I wasn't interested but he insisted on giving me papers about it.  It made me uncomfortable.  Why is this protocol?",gaybros
First date with guy with same first name this weekend.,"Has this happened to anyone else here? Feels kind of weird, but I kinda like it at the same time. I'm hoping the novelty doesn't wear off too fast and it just gets old. ",gaybros
Can anyone recommend places in South Florida to meet other gay bros?,"Hi guys. I'm a bit frustrated because while I have good friends and family, I'm the token homo in my social circle. I'm a bit of a geek and so I don't do too much of the party scene or clubs etc... And don't really have any gay friends. I'd like to find /meet some like minded individuals who can I can relate to versus my current friends who are great but at best can empathize. 

Any geeky gay bros in the Miami area? Or anyone else know where they hang out? 

Thanks in advance for your help. ",gaybros
Is a 12 cm erect penis too small in your guys opinion... would you find a larger dick to be sexier? I feel like if I get a boyfriend he might get a little disappointed.,,gaybros
Mike Pence horrified to discover unisex toilet in own house,,gaybros
I just found out about this miniseries and I just can't believe how amazingly good it is.,,gaybros
"Am I the only one who often feels bittersweet after watching an intense gay romance movie? I’ve been with my husband for 20 years and after I watch a film like Brokeback Mountain, I find myself longing for those old feelings of falling in love to the point that I’m tempted to avoid these films now.",,gaybros
"Politics Phriday August 17, 2018","**PLEASE NOTE:** This thread's comments will be largely unmoderated. Please participate with the knowledge that offensive and uneducated opinions may be expressed. Please report all comments that break Reddit-wide rules or Terms of Service using the report button. 

A weekly post to talk about anything political going on in the world. 

Please note that Trump-centric conversation IS allowed in this thread but will be removed on other days of the week. 
",gaybros
UPDATE: Told my straight friend i had a crush on him,we got married and got two dogs and a cat and one of the dogs is magic and also the cat taught me how to bloodbend and i used it to save the world and we had a taco bar at the wedding and princess mia was there with the stang,gaybros
Bear Appreciation art ;),,gaybros
Someone must’ve had a good time 😏,,gaybros
Green Lantern movie rumors rant.,"I found out recently that Tom Cruise is slated as the #1 pick for the GL movie and probably all iterations involving him. Recently, in the DC Comics New 52 reboot, they made GL a front running gay MC (Alan Scott, not Hal Jordan, though). The comic also has a history of being more progressive towards the LGBT community compaired to so many others. Knowing Cruise's politics based on his religion, he will refuse to play a gay character, so GL will prob be straight. It feels like a step back.

Real talk: I was hoping this would be our Wonder Woman, or our Black Panther. We're a group that is typically relegated to the background in rom coms and dramas, occasionally taking the spotlight in a major motion picture involving a some sort of romance. And it's almost always white people, but that's a whole other can of worms.

Admittedly, I'm not all that into the superhero genre right now (it's a bit overdone at this point), but I'm kind of salty that we aren't even being represented by even just a fucking side character. I want to see us portrayed as the heroes that I see us as. An acknowledgement of our existance in these universes is not too much to ask for, yet here we are, demanding representation in yet another mega-media sensation, and it falls on deaf ears for fear of ""marketability"".

Also, on a personal note, Tom Cruise is a shit actor who is so much older than Hal Jordan ever was. If he is in it, I hope it bombs because I'm a salty hoe at this point.

TL;DR: I'm counting the days til I see a gay superhero on the screen, amd the new GL movie is probably not going to make that happen.",gaybros
I don’t have a type,I know it sounds weird but I don’t really know the type of men I am into and i was wondering if anyone else feels the same way.,gaybros
Gaybro out of laziness? (Turn on captions),,gaybros
Have any of you ever dealt with significant grief?,"My older sister died from leukaemia in May, and I still don’t think I’ve processed it properly. I was just wondering if there was someone on the other side of it who could tell me if three months is more than enough time to have “accepted” it?
Just, I’m really struggling these days and I didn’t think grief would feel this hollow. I miss her like mad. She was fearsome and beautiful and ridiculously overprotective and could drink any fella under the table and I hero-worshipped her; ye all would have really liked her. I come from a very, very accepting and extremely close family, which is unreal because unconditional love is rare in Ireland, but I feel like I’ve lost the one person who accepted and understood me beyond a shadow of a doubt. Despite her being the oldest and me the youngest, we were the closet. She was my person. Sorry for being the “wet tap post” on this thread, it’s just my friends failed me when she died, especially my best mate, and I’ve different perspectives of them all now and so I feel like I don’t have anyone anymore apart from my family. I’m a bit lost and just “unfeeling” these days. I need to try and either get out of this funk or understand it more so that I stop just staring at people blankly when they ask me how many brothers and sisters I have. 

Please tell me, what did grief feel like to you. ",gaybros
Did you ever indicate to your crush that you're gay by using puns or making gay references? What's your story?,"My crush is getting closer to me day by day. He recently complimented a photo of me, although it could mean nothing. 
I have been wondering how i can suggest to him that i'm gay in a way that if he's gay he would get it. Dropping the name Sean Cody in a conversation won't work for me :P
What's your trick? Or even better, what's your story? ",gaybros
Madonna turns 60! What is your favorite Madonna song!,I'm split between Into the Groove and Bedtime Story,gaybros
This only made me want to smoke,,gaybros
"Does anyone else hate the term ""partner"" or ""significant other""?","The other day I was out with my boyfriend, and we met up at a bar with one of his friends (who I haven't met up until that point). She is a lesbian, and when my bf introduced me as his boyfriend, she sorta gave us a wierd look, and introduced her wife, saying ""this is my partner"", with extra emphasis on the word. It got me thinking, and I hate that term. Imo, it causes a disconnect between straights and the gay community. This is not my partner, we're not lawyers. This is the man I love, the man I'm going to marry someday. What do you guys think?",gaybros
Finally justice for a gay refugee who was refused asylum because he did not know the meaning of each color in the rainbow flag,,gaybros
"Life near Ft. Meade, MD","Hey bros, I'm transferring to the Ft. Meade area. I've done a ton of Googling for the area but am still kind of stumped. I prefer a commute on the shorter side (ideally less than 30-40 mins), would like a place (townhome?) with a garage, and my budget is no more than +/- $2,200 per month. Would also like to be near a decent population of gaybros. Any bros that live in the area willing to give some pro tips???",gaybros
Do you remember your very first heartbreak?,,gaybros
Finally came out to my siblings...,"Just a brief bio:  I am 37, the youngest of four, and just came out to my siblings.  

So last Sunday night we celebrated my parents 50th anniversary.  We took them out to a nice restaurant went to my brother's, exchanged gifts, and after they left we all stayed behind and chatted and had a drink..  Well more than one.

Well as we were enjoying evening, we talked about our folks, growing up, and our current relationship with our folks.  We were all joking about the who the golden child currently is (my brother - most recent to have a grandchild).  I used to have Golden Child status, but after I came out to them after a career change, I have lost that status and our relationship has been somewhat strained.  So my sister asked what actually happened, and I just mentioned the career change.  She then said, ""you won't have golden status until you have a child"".  I laughed and said, ""well that is only going to happen if I adopt.""  My sister, then asked why adopt only?  To which I said, ""Well kind of hard to have a kid with another guy.""  

At this point in our story we get the, ""Ohhh, okay.""  My Sister-in-law, said she knew, as she saw I was in Boston during a Gay Pride weekend (we all share our locations via phone, because why not?).  I blushed and she laughed.   Another sister said she kind of guessed based on how I always made my DnD characters Bi.  We laughed and the conversation moved forward.  

So that is my story.  It feels good to have that out there.   I am finally out to my siblings.  Now there is no reason to stop me from going out and looking for a boyfriend.  Now where are all the good guys?

TL;DR: I am 37, came out to my siblings, I feel good about it, and now looking for a boyfriend.  :)",gaybros
So I told my straight friend I liked him...,"

So i told my friend (who is straight and has a girlfriend) that I like him a few weeks ago. He said he's not gay and he never will be. Then he said he was bi but he was just joking. And, he calls me babe sometimes. Then today, on my birthday, he sent me a dick pic. Later on we hung out and he flashed me. When it was time to go, he kissed me on the lips. What is going on???",gaybros
Hey I am Bisexual but do you mind if I join your group?,"I am a 17 Bi guy, there aren’t any groups for Just Bisexual guys so I thought this would be the closest thing to one. Do you guys mind if I join here and have some fun chatting about gay stuff? ",gaybros
What are some interesting fantasies yall have?,,gaybros
When to get tested?,"Okay y’all, I don’t know if this is a dumb question or not, but sorry if it is. 

So, my ass is still a virgin, but if some miracle ever happens and I might get laid (sp?) do I get tested before or after my first time?

Again, sorry if this is a dumb question I really don’t know. 

Edit: Thank you all for educating me, much appreciated!",gaybros
That Same Christian Baker In Colorado Is Back In Court — This Time For Turning Away A Transgender Customer,,gaybros
"Thirsty Thursday August 16, 2018","What are you drinking, bros? Share your latest finds or homebrew creations.
",gaybros
What are you guys jerking to these days?,"Tumblr? Videos? Porn sites?
Welcoming new recommendations!",gaybros
So he stopped texting me.,"A few weeks ago I went to a gay club in the hood (thanks for the encouragement from r/gaybros). I met this cute Asian dude and we hit it off, playing pool and singing karaoke. We've been texting back and forth since, and last night I asked if he wanted to play some pool this weekend and he just stopped texting. What is the deal?",gaybros
Advice??,"Looking for some advice? So I have a house mate and buddy of mine. We get along well and are decent friends. We are both gay males. Me (m 23) and he is (m 25)

He has said multiple times how attractive he thinks I am. I do not feel the same way towards him at all. I only like his company.

Now here's where I have an issue. He always comes over to me and hugs me before going off to bed for the night if we are hanging out watching TV before bed. He will always want to hug me before parting ways.

Also, he will come over to me and sit on the counter while I make food or clean the kitchen ect and talk to me. He will constantly just start talking to me and being all up in my space whenever we are home together or in the same place. I also catch him just straight up starring at me randomly for long periods of time.

I feel very uncomfortable with all of these things. I do not want him touching me. I dont want to hug him every time we part ways. I dont want him touching my head after I get a hair cut. I do not want him following me everywhere I go. I don't want him always trying to come over and talk to me all the time we are home at the same time. I do not want to go to the gym with him everytime I work out. I don't want him starring at me for prolonged periods of time. I hate this shit.

I feel very awkward and weird around him. He is not the brightest bulb either. I think he has learning issues and social cue problems. Sounds harsh, but he's kind of stupid. Not smart at all socially or intellectually.

How do I approach this?? Ugh I just want to have my alone time and I don't want him to touch me at all. But he's very sensitive and pretty clueless to almost everything about cues. I dont want to hurt his feelings and I want to still be friends. I don't want him to feel bad. I just feel fucking awkward all the time because we share a home after all so we are around each other quite a bit. 

How to I approach this and not hurt his feelings and maintain a healthy friendship? This is getting way out of hand and negatively affecting me every day. 

Thanks for the input",gaybros
...Waiting until you're closer to your your own type?,"I've been thinking about how to word this  question for a week or so. I figured it would just get it out there... And so I ramble... With dry and sarcastic humour, good intentions nonetheless... And then I realized maybe I answered my own question. Who knows. :)  
   
 So as a gay dude who is tall with broad shoulders and chunky, I find an interesting balancing act between confidence and realism.   
   
 I don't expect the six foot tall lacrosse coach stud with the messy blonde hair (I'm joking but half serious! -- Just an example hahaha.) who complains about a two inch extra lower gut expansion to go for me. And I respect that! But on the other hand I'd sure as hell be a good friend to him. I would hope that a reasonable dude would at least consider that! I mean really... If you met me in real life you'd know I'm pretty sincere... and when I say I care, I mean it...   
   
But if we take the mold of that dude and put him into a range of similar types, that's where I end up falling. (With some deviations. Even guys not unlike me! So yeah, I'm “wishy washy”... Which as a hopeless romantic who tries not to dabble too much into focusing on only one aspect of attraction, it can be an interesting cycle!

There is that old phrase: ""...We all want, what we cannot have...""  
   
 Or maybe we can?   
   
What if I take what I cannot have and perfect myself to physically become a lot closer to that dude? For me.

I turn 31 in a few weeks. I am in a new sizable town. I am getting myself out there as I work on myself. -- It's been overdue for a decade but I do not give up easily this time around!

I am not very sexually driven so that helps in a way – Given that I want the context of a relationship and then I will rock the guy’s world. 😉 . 

We shall see…

Keto for life... \~50 pounds down, more to go! 

'Just speculating...! ",gaybros
Biden launches initiative for gay youth,,gaybros
Would you cheat?,,gaybros
I feel like I need a tribe.,"Hi r/gaybros, 

This is more like a venting and just trying to get this weight of my shoulders. Thanks for reading this is gonna be long there's a bit to unpack. 
So I'm 27 from Puerto Rico, chubby, Afro-latino currently at 250+ lbs 5'7"" height. I've been stress eating, sheltering myself in front on my screen majority of my day. So dating life is none existent other that being constantly rejected in Grindr and/or other apps.  I feel alone, desperate and I currently don't have a job other than my podcast whom is the only thing that makes me feel useful and also entirely happy and lol is my main source of stress because I go to all my might to promote the show and so people can laugh and listen (it's a comedy podcast in Spanish BTW). I feel hopeless to be real right now. Don't feel bad for me I'm good I just feel tired of trying to find love and people whom can understand me. I feel tired just so tired of wanting to find people like me queer people that I can actually talk and just connect and go out and share interest and just be like my tribe you know. I'm trapped alone and hopeless. This is not to cause any sadness and I'm really not looking for advice, sympathy or even pity I just needed to write my feelings and thoughts and hopefully if someone reads and feels like me doesn't feel so alone. There's people like me searching and maybe you are tired like me but don't stop hoping. Things will turn out fine and even if it doesn't fuck it  do the things that make you happy for me it's the podcast I hope you find yours. Love you guys and thanks for reading this stupid rant/pity party. ",gaybros
Why do people say they’re coming to hookup but never come.,I’ve never understood why they do that. It’s super rude and you just come off as a dick.,gaybros
What’s the most homophobic remark you’ve heard from a straight person because they didn’t know you were gay?,"Hi, I come from an all boy’s school. After we graduated, one friend came out. We would have dinners as a gang. His bf was even in our dinners. I thought everyone was ok with it. Then, one friend confided to me that he wish that our friend was straight. From my mom, she would make remarks that older gay guys spend all their money on young guys. It is why they are always poor. ",gaybros
"Workout Wednesday August 15, 2018","Share your fitness goals, regimen, and brag about your progress or latest accomplishments! 
",gaybros
Some clarification?,"I want you guys to excuse my English in advance, but I can’t find help in Italian forums so...
I’ve had a crush on this friend of mine for quite sometime a week ago I tried to hit on him. We were playing videogames and I randomly touched his leg and looked at him and we both smirked, but he didn’t mind. So I decided to move a little bit on and started rubbing his leg (this makes me cringe to write but I didn’t know what to do) and I even touched his six pack.
Today at a party between friends we kept on messing with each other by touching and we even cuddled while laughing with all the others. At the end of the day I even kissed him on the cheek and happily went home. Now he has booty pics on his phone but I highly doubt that he is 100% straight, so what I am asking is if I should go on and try to kiss him maybe, or take a step further back. Any advice is happily accepted!",gaybros
Shit isn't shit anymore,"I'm gonna keep this really short (Maybe).

Was with abusive guy a year ago, spent a year being self destructive and destroying myself, came out 3 months ago to family, started searching for love again, got depressed, got less depressed, found a cool guy who is chill af, fun, and quirky, today we decided to say it, now I have a boyfriend. 

The best part of it all, we haven't even slept with each other, and he's super sweet about it*. 

*He has seen me naked, but didn't make shit weird

I'm literally on cloud nine and I couldn't be happier, after all the emotional turmoil I've been through in the last 2 years I needed this, even if it doesn't last, I'm happy to have someone who likes me for who I am.

That is all, thanks for the love, support, and cute pics of butts &lt;3",gaybros
"Is it Just me, or is it harder to come out to the people you care the most about ?","Maybe a dumb question.

I guess I'm curious to hear about other experiences, and of course, I also feel the need to talk a bit about me. I'm seeking for advice if there's any to provide, because I know this is a personal matter.

First, sorry if there's several mistakes along the way, English isn't my Native language. That being said, here's the story. 

I'm a 23 years old guy, still closeted to his family, although I'm sure my mother suspects my homosexuality for a long time. In fact, it's more than just a suspicion, because she actually asked me while I was in highschool. I was only 15 or 16, an insecure teenager and not so sure yet if I was really gay, so I simply deny it. Never had a similar conversation again.

I became a 100% sure I was gay around 19. Since then, I never took the bull by the horns and come out to my family and closest friends. It's a combo of different things. I never felt the need to tell them, because I didn't have a boyfriend and wasn't looking for one. I saw it only as a private matter, as I didn't want to be identify by my sexuality (or maybe that's just me fearing stereotypes, as I'm not at all an ""alpha type"" of guy already, but that's an all other topic). Time will come when it comes, right ?

Well, fast-forward four years later (now), I am out to some friends, most I met within these four past years. I have no problem letting new friends know that I'm gay, or telling someone if I'm asked. But time flies, and I struggle more and more with not telling this to the people I'm the most close with. I mean, isn't it weird ? I didn't talk about this to these people who I deeply care about, whereas I do with others. That's the first time it feels more ""hiding something"" than just ""not telling"", if that makes sense. I am lucky to have friends and a family that I know have no problem whatsoever towards homosexuality. But now that I have waited that long, I fear most of them will be hurt I didn't tell them sooner. Irrationnal fear ?

I told myself I will come out before 2019, but it's harder than I thought. Sometimes I wish I knew sooner, when my mom asked me few years ago. I had so much missed opportunities back then. I feel bad complaining though, I am in an accepting environment, so I keep asking myself what I am actually waiting for !?

I've never been in a relationship, I never wanted one. I didn't feel the need, and I consider I have too much shit to deal with in my daily life that I don't want to put someone through. But I'm starting to come around, so there's that too. I didn't feel the need to tell anyone before because of that, but it might have been a false excuse. So I'll stop finding excuses to not to.

I had a challenging summer, due to personal issues (the death of my grand-mother, which I had to take care of because my alcoholic father couldn't), but things are looking up. So now feels like a good time to do it, to evacuate all these things on my mind, move on and focus about the future. Late 2018 really feels like the beginning of a turning point in my life (I'm also searching for a new job), and after the storm comes the sun hopefully.

Sorry, I tried to keep this as short as possible, but I ramble. To anyone who has borne with me during this post : thank you ! I'd love to hear your experiences or/and your take on this. I don't know if it's just me who has the hardest time telling that I'm gay to the people I care the most about, because when I read other stories on this sub, it seems to me it's more the opposite.",gaybros
does anyone else find that they still seek validation from straight guys?,"I feel I put a lot more effort into friendships with straight men, half because im gay and they're cute but i also think it has to do with growing up and always wanting to fit in with the straight guys. friendships w females come way more naturally

its kind of unhealthy actually now that ive become aware of the fact that i do it",gaybros
"“I think in five years more people will figure out ‘Hey, I can be into rugby and dudes and that is a cool thing.’” (August, 2013) ... is this true yet? Is this at least true in Philly?",,gaybros
"A funny scene from “It’s Always Sunny” explaining thinks, bears, and power bottoms.",,gaybros
From r/suddenlygay,,gaybros
Homosexuality went from allowed to forbidden according to this very interesting piece,,gaybros
Just another one of those nights,"It’s been a couple of months since my Ex broke up with me and it still has been broken because I feel like I could have done more and prevented what happened between us. I underestimated my emotions of finding someone that I actually connected with but I think I overwhelmed him, yet tried so hard to avoid it from happening. Even though he didn’t mention it when we broke up, I spoke with his best friend and he saw these things that I feel ruined it and didn’t notice it. We’re ok, at least I think or maybe he’s just trying to be nice whenever I reach out to him. However I asked him about a fresh start but he was going through a loss until I found out that was the case he replied back to me apologizing for not answering my previous text but left it at that. I know a loss is a lot to take in and so I can imagine thinking about us is the last thing on his mind but... I don’t want to let go because I really did like him and yet I feel at fault because I ruined it before something more could come from it. I’m not sure what I’m trying to ask or just trying to vent about this but these feelings have me feeling down and all I want to do is be there for him and have him by my side.... I miss him but I don’t want to get to the point where he’ll ignore me for good. I want to be in a relationship but I’ve tried looking and the one thing that the other people don’t have is that it’s not him....",gaybros
This anyone else's preferred method of cuddling?,,gaybros
"100 Gay Men's Biographies - This summer I wrote 100 biographies of gay men to share with everyone for free. You are not alone in this world. From San Francisco to North Korea, gay men are everywhere: here are some of our stories. I hope you enjoy it :) [Playlist inside with music only by gay men!]",,gaybros
Some online friendship for help me with english :),"What’s up gays?
I’m a 18 boy that wants improve his english of course I’m not a native speaker and I came from Italy (yes, pizza, pasta &amp;amp; mafia ahaha so funny).
I always used snapchat, for... you know ahah, but today I thought that would be cool talking with native speaker, so he can teach me something or correct me if I’m wrong and also create new online friendship, if you want I’m [here](https://www.snapchat.com/add/xxmaltxx)
@xxmaltxx

There is a story with my face

Pls help me, I need you
",gaybros
Police at Austin Pride - We've Come a Long Way From Stonewall,,gaybros
Thoughts bros?,,gaybros
"To those who are in/were in same sex relationships, how long did it take for your partner to meet your parents and vice versa?","I've been with my current boyfriend for just over 5 months now and I met his family after about a month or so of being together. They were so lovely and welcoming, thank god. However, he has yet to meet my parents. It's mainly because my parents are still not fully comfortable with me being gay, let alone being in a relationship with another guy. I don't want to force them to meet him, but then again I really want them to meet him so they can get to know him better.

I was just wondering if there's anyone out there who has been in the same or a similar situation as I just feel bad that my partner hasn't met my parents but I met his so long ago. ",gaybros
When you’re comfortable with the guys you hang with...,"Was at a football game with my straight bros in crazy heat where everyone was sweating buckets and said to one, “I gotta admit that I have been to a lot more football games since Rebok and Nike started making uniforms that get transparent when wet.” Over the stadium noise he said “What?” And I said “I’m saying I shouldn’t drink beer on an empty stomach” and he grins and says “have another!”",gaybros
Any Hopeless Romantics?,"How is your boyfriend hunt going? Or how long has it been since you gave up on Grindr? Or is there someone you still think of?

Just curious. All ears!",gaybros
"Disney's 'Jungle Cruise' casts Jack Whitehall to play gay character, gets backlash for ""hiring a straight actor"" and for making the character ""campy""",,gaybros
How do you guys do it?,"I try to be relaxed, approachable, amiable, nice, open. I listen, I let people have their day in the shade. So, why am I still single? Why am I still unfuckable? Am I ugly as fuck? Because everyone says, be positive be positive and I do that but it doesn’t work. Everyone gives me awkward small talk or ignores me completely online and at the bars and clubs. Maybe I should throw in the towel and by a mega collection of gay porn. ",gaybros
How to make the pain of unrequited love stop?,"I’m suffering. Everyday, my love grows stronger for him. I can’t live without him. He’s everything to me and now, in an effort to let go, I’ve totally ended all communications with him. I thought giving myself space would help but it just made it worse. I don’t know what to do, so much in my life is going awry, I’m at odds. I can’t even sleep anymore because of everything going on. I doubt I’ll ever get better or get through this. I feel like a lost cause, a shitty, useless, hopeless romantic. I’m tired of this pain. I’m so tired :’(",gaybros
Got trolled again.,"Was talking to this guy for a hookup off and on for a year almost and he was always reluctant to be specific on where we should meet. One time I went to where he said he “lived” and all what he was make me go around in circles. The second time he called me saying he saw me and was scared to meet me. Now the third time shame on me. But he always made it out to contact me though. Whenever I told him I’d rather meet him in person he always pleaded to just hookup. I did a photo search for him and so on and I know he’s real but not sure if he’s just in the closet/down low or just like to lure guys out for fun. 

I feel so stupid.",gaybros
My boyfriend of 7 months and I are splitting up and I need your help gaybros.,"Ok so I'll try to make this as short as possible. But I've been with this guy for 7 months and have known him for a lot longer than that. He's the perfect boyfriend no question because he's literally everything I've ever dreamed of. Now he's only 16 and lives in Florida, I'm 18 and live in Mississippi (sadly). We could never meet each other because his parents weren't comfortable with me no matter how hard I tried to gain their trust. Now we are both virgins and have never really been in anything as serious as this. I love this guy more than anyone ever could and I never knew it was possible to love something as much as I love him. I need him but the thing is, he wanted to move to Germany with his grandparents. Here recently he changed his mind after us talking about it realizing realistically we wouldn't see each other for 4-9 years and no guarantees either. He talked with his parents but they are making him leave because the plane ticket is non refundable. I don't have any money to cover the cost or I would give it to them. I can't wait that long, I know he is worth it and love is worth it but the distance already was killing me as it is. Any advice? Should I move on and just become best friends with him? I can't move to Germany because my mom wouldn't let me, I'm still living in her house, and I have no money or job. ",gaybros
Round 2 of the minimalist bear Desktop Wallpaper.,,gaybros
"Table Tuesday August 14, 2018","Bros, what is on your table this week? 

Share your latest culinary creations and food porn! Stories of failed attempts are also welcome.
",gaybros
Can’t get guys to stay the night,"I frequently have guys over for sex or dates but they almost never stay the night even when I ask. It is probably not me since many see me several times. Perhaps it is the community I am in. Maybe the age difference. I am 57 and most of the guys are in their 20s. And yes, they do try to audition to have me be their daddy. My house does not turn them off since it is a high end condo that gets interesting reactions from guys new to my place. I decorate every room in a completely different motif and in originals, such as manuscripts from the 1400s. Guys are fascinated. Guys have asked if I am a clean freak, I say no, and I tell them that is what the housekeeper is for. I say she doesn’t care about the gay porn because she is lesbian and we talk about that stuff all the time. Actually her girlfriend is my lesbian cousin. Weird. It gets strange reactions. But still, come on. Who has trouble staying at a hotel suite type room?  Sex yes. Overnight no? I don’t get it. ",gaybros
Phoenix Bros 08/17 weekend,"27 M from Denver and plan on visiting this weekend for a lil get away. &amp; would love to meet up for someone to hangout with or give me some tips... I plan on tubing the salt river friday also so company would be nice.

Thx MG",gaybros
A repost but still good.,,gaybros
Someone finally validated me!!!,"I know, it seems silly because I should determine my own self-worth but it’s really hard in our community. He may have been lying, even though, it still felt good, he made me feel worth it instead of worthless. He said I was sexy and beautiful and no man has ever said that to me before. I’m a bigger guy, and I’m not really the poster child of the gay community so it was a welcome shock. ",gaybros
Alone in the game. Where to find it?,"I was really looking forward this documentary, and then forgot about it. It's out now (no pun intended), but I don't have AT&amp;T/DirectTV and can't seem to find it anywhere. Anyone know where to find it/how to watch it?   

Thanks in advance.",gaybros
Tried to make a minimalist bear wallpaper today. any notes?,,gaybros
What’s the last LGBT film you watched and would like to recommend?,"I just finished [Monster Pies (2013)](https://imdb.com/title/tt2379082/)! It’s bittersweet, but I recommend it. If you’re dealing with grief though, maybe not much so. 

Also, not LGBT labeled but [“American Playhouse” The Roommate (1984)](https://imdb.com/title/tt0088016/) has some sexual undertones in it. It’s a really good flick! ",gaybros
Ft Lauderdale and Miami Bros,Anyone looking to meetup. I will be there from this Wednesday - Sunday and would love to meet some local Bros.,gaybros
"Just started reading War on Peace by Ronan Farrow, it is such an interesting read and really well written. What are you all reading?","Btw I have such a thing for Ronan Farrow, he just seems like the whole package.

[The aforementioned book.](https://www.amazon.com/Ronan-Farrow-Hardcover-%E3%80%902018%E3%80%91-Author/dp/B07D2CJJ68)",gaybros
Help me find a gay love story thread?,"So, first off, a newbie to the Reddit world here. Forgive me in case I'm mis-posting
I was looking for a gay love story thread which I know I read here on Reddit, which, of course, I have seemed to forgotten. 
The story went on like this, with the guy being on a trek with his group of friends and getting lost. They then find a guy, with a dog, who helps them get back on track.
I know this is not much to go on, but it was one of the most beautiful serendipitous story I've ever heard. 
It also helped that the photo of the 'rescuer' was also posted along with his dog, who were , to say the least, a definitive 8/10 spectacled looker.
While I can't remember the subreddit or even what else was going on in there, I sure do want to read it again, so that I can once again ugly sob and go to sleep quickly!

Please help out a bro here?
Love to you all out there!",gaybros
Found on r/offmychest,,gaybros
"Guy on gay dating app messaged me and said he's ""Straight Curious"". Dafuq does that mean?","I'm not entirely sure that's a word. Is he just not out? I asked him what he meant by that, and he pretty much refused to give me a straight answer. Weird ",gaybros
all I want is a cute boyfriend who doesn't mind that my living room is basically a huge shrine to all my favorite crap and that I own like 25 plushes and want more,Nevermind ,gaybros
New Subreddit,"I’ve created a new subreddit for the Gay Bros of Louisville, KY. Feel free to join and chat. All topics accepted. r/LouisvilleGayBros",gaybros
Minneapolis Bros - What to do?,"Fiancé and I Will be in Minneapolis for two nights this week (Tuesday and Wednesday) and are looking for some recommendations (bars, clubs, restaurants, etc.) to visit while we are there. Anything is appreciated!",gaybros
"Me Monday August 13, 2018","It's that time of week again! Introduce yourself!

**Name:**

**Age:**

**Location:**

**One interesting thing that happened this week:**

**Photos:**

**Social Links:**
",gaybros
"Came out to my family after hiding my relationship for nearly a year. They weren’t happy at first, but it looks like they came around!",,gaybros
Dear adverts: if you wanna impress the gays with your ad then dont just stick a rainbow on it,"I'm  not asking for the next coke ad to be a drag queen orgy, just rainbows dont effect my desire to drink your drink or eat your food. 





at least put a legit gay couple in them. Its really not that hard, just make one of the four generic parents/couples/cutesy teens you show be couply with a member of the same sex. 





You don't need to see them kiss just make it clear that dave and his husband randy are indeed enjoying the sweet taste of your specific beveridge/food. Hell even the bisexual bank ad and the lynx ad in 2014 did it okay!",gaybros
Former NHLer Georges Laraque entered and won a celebrity drag competition at Montreal Pride. He donated his winnings towards Montreal LGBTQ rights organizations.,,gaybros
Hooking up with a straight guy.. (Is it worth it?),"So pretty much, I've been talking to this guy who claims to be ""straight"" but willing to try something new and mess around. He's cool, cute, and big... Which is a plus++ 

But his straightness is really unapealing since from what it sounds it will be all physical. No kissing or human emotions.. :/ 

Idk what do you guys think. Is it worth it? ",gaybros
"Sziget, saunas, and suprisingly deep conversations (SFWish with caution)","So I've been at sziget festival for a few days amd with all that going on i decided to take my ""buffer day"" between the flight home and the festival to relax a little. I thought I'd kill two birds with one stone and go to a gay sauna, calm me down, fix me up, and relieve me of my sexual fustration having shared a room for a week with straight aussie strangers and no privacy.






Really nice place (magnum) mainly older people but that saunas for you ... and then i met a med student/young doctor?. He was hungarian with eastern europe style short hair and a loose smile. We did our thing and he was talented since he knows about nerves and that mojo (this isnt /r/dirtystoriesgonewild so i'll leave out the details, l I'll say is he's good with his tongue). 








We get pillow talking and he tells me all his hospital stories and how awesone his job can be and how terrible his job can be - giving people bad news is a bitch. It dawns on me halfway through the conversation that this is the least vapid conversation I've had in WEEKS.
 From a stranger. In a sex sauna. 







Maybe its the post week-long-edge-edjaculation knocking my brain out of horny mode. This has obviously messed with me since i cannot be that lacking in social depth that sex sauna strangers are the answer. Plus i want to be like ""i met someone cool"" but i cant just be like ""yo i met a rad hungarian and rode him in a porn booth"", i doubt my folks would approve of me in a dark room full of sexed up weirdos and/or being one of them.







Even better he saw my back and gave me a full medical massage with pointers like ""do you wear uncofortable shoes, you've got knots here maybe you should switch go better shoes"" and ""have you been stressed or tired recently?"" Etc. That was rad and I'm convinced i just met a gay angel (gayngel?)",gaybros
It happened! (Update to my Date post),"https://www.reddit.com/r/gaybros/comments/8yf9sn/trying_to_plan_out_what_to_do_for_the_first_date/

^Previous post

Three words: Oh my goodness!

So, I was just working on my finals today, thinking that this Sunday was going to be extremely boring and lame. But then the person that I was so crazy about ended up texting me. He actually came back on his trip and told me that he was available today. As soon as I saw the chance, I dropped everything that I was doing and got a ride to where he lived. 

I was just so excited, and worried at the same time! I was planning to have all of this happen in September, but, here it is, happening right then and there. Not only that, I knew what we were going to do once we saw each other... 

My anxiety shot through the roof. I was wondering if I was going to do something wrong while we had sex, and have him get upset. I never did have sex before, so it was like the concept of me doing it for the first time was nerve-racking. 

Once I actually met though, all my fears and all my worries were washed away. I have seen him on facebook but in real life? He was the most handsome person I have ever met. Long flowing hair, a cute smile, wide eyes....he was so amazing. When we saw each other, it was just about us. 

We went back to his room, and we just started talking and joking. Told each other our stories, and I learned his viewpoints on people and life. He was so truthful and straightforward, and I appreciated that of him. Then, after a while, we just started playing around. Was it sex? Was it not sex? I don't know the nuances of such....but it was pretty fun and....weird. 

Weird as in, when we were just playing with each other, I just couldn't...do it. I couldn't cum as easily as I could have before. He was able to do it, but, by the time I actually let go, an hour has passed. Plus, I was a bit pushy. Kept telling him to suck my nipples repeatedly...I should really stop being so demanding. It was actually really embarrassing, but he was nice and didn't quit on me. But, while weird, it was also kind of nice really. Like how we got through it together, you know? 

Then me, alongside his other friend,  went on to eat at a nearby cafe. In all honesty, it did sort of feel weird with his friend. But I still managed to talk to both of them, so like it feels like I made two connects that day. 

Once we ate, we parted ways. Let me tell you, this boy is such a good hugger. I wanted to keep on hugging him and speaking to him but I knew I had to leave to do my finals. Plus, he had to help his friend with something. So we just hugged, and we parted ways. 

Just...that entire few hours was practically the best thing I have ever done in this semester. Not even that, the best thing I've done in like forever. I never really touched a man, let alone even get to that kind of intimacy. I never felt like how I'm feeling right now, and, really, I want to keep going. I want keep seeing this person. I want to know more about him. He's just so amazing, so kind, so absolutely handsome. 

Maybe I'll try to make him come over to where I live next time and treat him out. Maybe buy him food and entertain him! I want to do that after how he treated me today. 

This is just so weird, cause I don't know if I even love him. He's so awesome but like I never reached this level of intimacy with anyone. But I don't want to leave him, and I want to keep trying to see if anything happens. I don't know, my mind and feelings are all over the place. it feels good but bad at the same time...maybe I am in love...

",gaybros
I can relate,,gaybros
Other movies like Milk that are about gay history/gay rights?,,gaybros
What's with these pity party posts?,"Fuck Bros, y'all make it seem like there is nothing to look forward to life but self pity. Get off the internet (inuding ""dating apps"") and live an actual life perhaps? Go on a hike, paint some pictures, do some research on a topic that interests you. FUCK. there's more to life than pitying yourself everyday.... Rant over....",gaybros
Car Ad from 1938 I stumbled across - cant see this tagline being used today...,,gaybros
Circuit Parties,"Hey guys.

I was hoping for an array of input regarding opinions about circuit parties and circuit boys.  I am asking because I was in a 6 year relationship that ended in very unfortunate means.  Now that we are both single and 1500 miles apart, my ex has turned into a circuit boy (not surprised given his life experience).  I on the other hand, have little interest in these things.  While I can see the fun in them (travel, meeting new people in new places) I can also see some destructiveness as well (drugs, more drugs, and ""meaningless"" sex).  I often would compare myself to my ex, and our personal past experiences that could steer or detract from such interests.  For me, I was raised by a supporting and loving family, that didn't really care that I was gay.  With home-grown roots and life-long friends in a college town, I had a charmed upbringing with very little struggle.  So there really wasn't much of a void in my life when it came to things like acceptance.  He, on the other hand, constantly moved around the country until about high school, coming from a religious family that to this day, still do not truly accept him.  Do you think themes such as these attribute to the urge to be a part of circuits?  I usually think I'm being too Freudian but then again I also think these types of things ARE the reason why some guys attend these events almost religiously.

What do you think?",gaybros
"Latino Millennials least likely to identify as heterosexual, survey finds",,gaybros
"A month of growth, pain, sadness and hope since my parents forcing me to come out and rejecting me","Long story ahead 

I have been a bit quiet since the spring and their are many reasons for it. But this past month has been among the most difficult I have been through. 

I sit here and think back to a month ago. And I startle at how much has happened since then.

Background 

First of all. In June I had my first sexual experience with a guy. A one night tryst. It cemented my sexuality. And really made me feel great. I didn't go alll the way as I want to save that for someone I love. What made it complicated was it happened to be a coworker in the closet. A few people found out but nothing really came of it. Which made me happy as my workplace is a job I truly enjoy. 

However after coming home from a workplace event really late... I found my mother waiting up for me. She told me to get in my pajamas and get my phone and car keys. I gave her my phone but not my car keys. My brother blocked me in (he didn't know anything other than I was in trouble). She then started off with ""when are you going to look me in the eye and stop lying to me?"" ... I was so utterly confused. She then mentioned she knew what happened in June. Somehow she was able to read my text messages. Then it started. She said That I will call in to work tomorrow to not show up. That she would call hr and inform them my coworker ""forced himself"" upon me(something I pushed back on so severely it never happened). She took my phone away from me. And essentially fed me 2 hours worth of homophobic statistics. Brainwashing me with terrible statistics. She told me she would never accept me for this. I was tired after two hours of this. I cried myself to sleep. I have only a few other days gone to bed just wanting to not wake up the next day. 

I did. And the next few days. I found myself reading a lot. Reflecting a lot. I cried a lot. Pi got my phone back a week later to about 120 snapchat notifications wondering what happened to me. Heres the thing.... I'm shocked my parents have stayed the course since then pretending nothings happened for the most part when I just want to scream at them for how they couldn't accept me. The mental anguish I've gone through because of that.  But then again.... I still love my parents. Yet they don't accept a significant part of me. I was the perfect son. I reveled in that status. I had all the trust and freedom in the world. I hadn't drank. Done drugs. Had done everything right. Yet it still wasn't enough. It wasn't fucking enough. I still have freedom but have lost a lot of trust. 

I got myself back on my feet. The job my mom wanted me to quit due to the ""culture their supporting my lifestyle""? Well I just got promoted to a supervisor in training. My finances are sorted out and I can go to a college 3 hours away. Close and far away enough at the same time. I'll finally have a safe space to live as I want to. 

I have spent my free time reading.... and planning. Reading stories of love I yearn to have comforts me. And planning for an exciting future. 

And plus. While I wasn't able to come out on my own terms. It feels fucking great I'm not technically living a secret double life anymore. 

My weight which had plateaued due to the stress I've been under has started going down again. I hope to be in full weight loss mode by college and getting in shape. 

I'm. Moving on..... and have been through yet another crisis that has reinforced my belief in myself to persevere. 

Yet. I heard ariana grande's song... no tears left to cry. I'm big on alternative music but that song struck me. She talks of moving on. Living and loving. But. In my case.... I still have tears left to cry. And have felt a bit numb since that day of July 12th. 

But I'm living and loving....

Thank you all for reading....",gaybros
Keeping the (sex life) spark alive after years,"Hi all,

I don’t know if this is the right sub for this, but here I go! I’ve been dating my current boyfriend for almost 3 years now, we’ve had to go through a lot of hardship during the beginning of our relationship because we lived really far away from each other for some time and he was also dealing with some personal/mental health issues. We’ve overcome so much and we just recently started moving together! Everything is fantastic, I love him dearly and so does he, but I feel our sex life has started to stall and it’s felt very monotonous for the past couple of months. 

When we first started dating we were all over each other. I remember I used to love giving head, I would drop to my knees all the time and go crazy on him. Now it’s like “eh, ok let’s do it” (or at least that’s how I feel). 

We‘ve always had great sexual chemistry, but now I’m kind of bored to be honest. Before we were a lot into reply play, some mild BDSM, things like that. But now it’s always the same stuff, and bottoming takes SO MUCH prep that a lot of the times we just don’t do it. When we do it it’s amazing though, but most of the time we just have oral sex, or something of the like. 

I still love him and I see myself living with him for a long time, but I’m afraid that this will put a strain on our relationship. We have casually talked about brining someone over for a threesome but I honestly feel that’s a can of worms and we probably should only do it if the sex is already great. I don’t want to open the relationship either, I like having a stable partner, I like not having to worry too much about STDs, etc. 

Bros with long relationships. Have you been through this? Do you have any advice?

Thanks! 

Edit: I should probably mention I’m 27 and he’s 23

Edit 2: thank you all for your advice and suggestions! ",gaybros
Is there a grieving Process involved with accepting your sexuality?,"This may be an odd question, especially since I've been out in public for 4 years now, and out to my parents for 2, but I've been reflecting on my traumas related to coming out, which led to me being currently stuck in the circumstances I'm in now. As such, for the past few years, I've been stuck ruminating about the past and wishing it were different, and was told the other day that I have to ""let it go and say goodbye to who I was because I am not, nor will ever be that person ever again"" and it's hit me pretty hard. 


I spent many years mashing it down, in turn, hurting myself. In fact, a huge obstacle in coming to terms with it was actually conceptualizing being with a man and not a woman. But now that I think about it, I don't think I ever truly mourned not being heteronormative and fitting in with the status quo.


I hope this makes sense. Has anyone else gone through something similar? Would appreciate some advice, thanks!",gaybros
Shiro from Netflix’s series Votron is gay!,,gaybros
Have a very gay Christmas,"Hey guys!

I'm looking for suggestions on places to spend Christmas as a solo, gay traveller?

I do the same stuff every year, so this time I want to get away but I'm not sure where is best.

I'll be flying from the UK (either Manchester or London) and I'm open to all suggestions! Tell me about your best Christmas getaways :)",gaybros
"After a year of dating, my guy dumped me. I’m taking comfort from virtual hugs and fake love in Stardew Valley.",,gaybros
I wish this happened to me when I was in school. Full Homo,,gaybros
"Gay Pride Parade 2018 in Prague, Czech Republic",,gaybros
I just remembered this embarrassing story,"I was a park ranger at a State Park and my co workers and I all had a group chat app to update eachother on shit, like when the bosses were coming or if a family party was offering food. I was the only gay at work and i accidentally texted 12 straight dudes how I ""missed the spice girls so much"" instead of my friend. I immediately texted the group again confessing that this was probably the most embarrassing mistext of my life. Needless to say they poked some harmless fun at me about that one.",gaybros
Red Dress Run NOLA 2018,,gaybros
What can a lonely gay do on a saturday night??,"The title says it all. Ive been pretty lonely lately, i'm 21 and lived in my hometown my whole life. My friends are either busy with work or not necessarily comfortable with going out least of all places a noisy gay bar. I want to socialize with an accepting crowd and have a bit of fun, its summer after all i fucking loveeee the summer season. Part of me wants to just go alone to the city nearby and try a club or bar. I feel though this could be unsafe and even a bit lame? Ive been doing a pretty darn good job of being less socially awkward but it definitely rises up and can get to me. Anyone else have this issue and have experience solving it? ",gaybros
My friend shoot his shot last night with a cute waiter....,,gaybros
This video made me tear up. Just wow...,,gaybros
I still struggle a lot with being myself,"when it comes to being gay; not necessarily liking boys, but liking boys and gay af pop music, not liking sports, being a mercy main............. you know
it's really hard to navigate the world of being gay with stereotypes
i honestly envy and have so much respect for feminine gays who are just unapologetically their selves. I don't think I'll ever be like that, but I'm definitely not a ~masc bro~ and fit somewhere in the middle. 
i'm turning 23 in a few weeks and I feel like ever since I was like 10 or 11 I learned to basically hide my entire personality for the fear of any part of it being seen as ""gay"" and it feels impossible to grow out of it",gaybros
Took the plunge finally...lots of confusing questions,"So I finally met a guy from online and did the deed. It was my first but I wasn't looking for something special so after a couple weeks of chatting up guys to find a trustworthy one I knew i could enjoy it with, I was set.

I made some excuse that i was staying at a friends to game this new release he has and will sleep over. On the way, I jittery and excited at the same time. Got paranoid for a bit and thought people could tell what I was going to do lol, especially while waiting for him to come out and pick me up at a busy street.

I'd already met him once before. He looked shockingly different and wasn't as manly as he portrayed himself, but after talking for a bit I was passed it soon. When he finally got me I was actually finding more things I liked about his looks haha, sounds mean but it's not.

After watching the movie at his place for about 20 minutes, we started fooling around. Soon we had our clothes off and were barely watching it as explored each other. I've gotta say touching someone's dick was not like I expected. It feels much more rubbery and not as warm as I expected. Like cold chewy meat that's been out for too long. I'm sure it was just first disappointments but it was a massive let down and it was hard getting into it. It was awkward as I expected and lots of shifting to get a better angle. He didn't like kissing strangers which also disappointed me a bunch and we didn't do anal, so it was just hands stuff and exploring each other and humping each other.


Well that's where my questions begin because when we were finished I wasn't happy with it and I didn't really enjoy it during it. Even though i knew first times aren't thay enjoyable it was still quite uneventful and felt almost like a chore. Like I was this wife who wanted to get it outta the way so I could sleep early for the busy day tomorrow.


I even was telling myself I wouldn't do it again because it was such a bust. Even worse the guy broke our weeks long flirting after this and it hurt badly. Eventually I was over it but...is this normal? I was even doubting I was even gay or bi even because how uninteresting it was. I didn't even cum but he didn't notice because it was dark and he was really enjoying cumming.


I'm so confused right now. Help!",gaybros
Found my future wedding song...,"https://youtu.be/RREjHDiGvMI

Every time I listen to this I cry in tears of joy at the thought of finally being happy in life and falling in love...",gaybros
"The boy and I finally got our first apartment, we are now busy fixing it up",,gaybros
Not sure if this is real but I had to repost 😂,,gaybros
"“It gets better,” but for Asian Americans, coming out can also get complicated",,gaybros
Had my first kiss today,"Nothing more to be said, was just really great. I don't feel any different (wasn't expecting to), but figured I had to share. What were your first kisses?",gaybros
"Might be a long shot, but did any bros here attend / currently go to Pacific Union College in California?","I’ll be transferring next month and I was just curious to see how the scene is like, I know one of my friends who went said it was liberal, but since it’s a Christian college liberal doesn’t really mean that much. Thank you! ",gaybros
what is the most geekiest thing on your bucket list?, for me it is to ride on The Shinkansen  (Japanese bullet train)   if all goes to plan I will  tick this off my list next May,gaybros
"Saturday Songs August 11, 2018","What are you listening to? Share your music recommendations here. 

Spotify, Apple Music, Google Play links are encouraged!
",gaybros
Random thoughts on dating,"I find trying to get about 80percent of guys online dont know how to converse....starting to realize irl too, many guys under 30 have zero social skills....think the texting smart phone age has done it..sad actually...comparing back couple decades.. you just see guys who have no ability to make eye contact etc",gaybros
Shout out to our straight best friends,Our bros may not always understand us or what we're talking about but they love us and that means the world ❤️,gaybros
Any bros here like kayaking or paddleboarding? Gear? favorite places to go?,,gaybros
"good first date, crashed and burned unexpectedly","What's up bros. A few days ago I met a guy on one of the apps. We chatted for a bit and had great conversation. We agreed to go on a date the next night, and had dinner at his place.   

The food was good, we had a nice conservation, and then things mutually progressed to fooling around (no sex). When we finished up, we sat on the couch and chatted for another 15-20 mins before I excused myself to go home- long day, work the next morning, etc. We kissed goodnight, and things still seemed perfectly fine after a nice evening.    

On my way home, he sent me a text that I ignored because I was still driving, and I immediately fell asleep when I walked in the door. He sent another message that woke me up, nothing that seemed as though anything was wrong, I replied and we said goodnight.  

Today I had a long day at work including an all-day meeting, got home, started to relax, and he sent me a long, and pretty angry text about how he felt as though I was ignoring him, wasn't interested in him, that I only cared about hooking up with him, and basically lied to him and led him on. I was caught very off-guard by all of this, because I thought things had gone really well. I was honestly kind of hurt by some of the stuff he was saying. We traded angry texts that were basically different interpretations of what happened from the time I left until he contacted me again, and that was pretty much the end of it.      

I'm over this whole thing and no longer interested, but also curious if anyone has some thoughts on what happened.  

Personally I don't think I did anything wrong. It was about 17 hours from our last message to the time he texted me, and that doesn't seem unreasonable. I'm sure this whole thing sounds silly AF to you guys, and may even come off like I'm seeking for validation about being ""right"", but I've only been out for about a year, and I'm still pretty new to actual dating/relationships beyond random hook-ups. You don't grow as a person by just assuming you're always right about everything, and I'm entirely open to the possibility I fucked up by not talking to him sooner. FWIW, I was planning on talking to him eventually tonight after I was home from work.  ",gaybros
I just my first experience with homophobia...,"Sorry for formatting, I'm on mobile. I work in a pretty big call center and I take calls from around the country (I live in the U.S.). I work mainly in Customer Service, and this is the task I was assigned to today. I had just gotten clocked in and this was my literal first call of the day. A guy picked up and he immediately starts yelling about how our website is difficult to use. Our website does kind of suck but it's not the worst design and it's still usable. I offered to take the payment without a fee over the phone and he seemed ok with that. The customer wanted to pay with his credit card but we don't accept them. When I told him, he got pissed and insisted that we do about credit cards and that he used one last month (I checked, he used a checking account and we physically take credit cards. Like if we try to enter a credit card, it will decline it instantly. I've worked here for 2ish years and we've never accepted them).  I offered to take a payment with the checking account and this is where the guy lost his shit. He starts screaming at me about how he insists that we take his credit card and that he's not paying unless we take it. He then starts yelling a string of obscenities. I interrupt his literal yelling to tell him if he doesn't stop, then I'm going to hang up. The guy said ""Do it. Hang on up me you stupid fucking faggot. I'm not paying my fucking bill."" 
  
I love my job but assholes like this make it unbearable sometimes. Sorry to rant, I just wanted to tell someone about it.",gaybros
Can I tone my torso with just a pull up bar and no other gym equipment?,"I posted about this in r/loseit earlier and was told I should ""lift"" but someone else mentioned pull-ups. Are pull-ups of some variety enough to tone my torso?

I have a teeny pouch on the base of my tum area that I want to rid myself of, and if it's not just loose skin and I can *do that*, I want to do that. I don't want to be 0% body fat super muscle man, I just want to take my shirt off and not have this little flop sitting there.

It's so small and smushable that it might just be skin though. :\

[Be nice.](https://imgur.com/a/iZYeDRt) I lost 40 pounds and I weigh a hundred pounds less than when I was in high school and this is the first people have seen me shirtless in like 13 years and the first time I've been this skinny so I look weird and be nice. :c 

I look so much more ""normal"" when I just hold my hand against it and make it disappear...",gaybros
Doesn’t matter if you’re gay or straight,Some guy is going to think you want them just because you’re nice to them. ,gaybros
Hi folks! Any Baltimoreans?,"Hey everyone. New here to Baltimore after living in DC the past 10 years.

Anyone game to exploring the city or catching a movie, etc? ",gaybros
Aaand it's official.,,gaybros
"fyi, theres r/gaybrosgonemild for selfies",you dont need validation from us anyway! ,gaybros
"Bros, is it weird to feel especially attached to someone after coming out to them?","Hey bros, I came out to a friend of mine about two weeks ago. She was really awesome about it and I was able to say things to her about being gay that I've never said out loud before. All in all it couldn't have gone better. She's the first and only person I've ever come out to.

Since coming out to her though I've felt closer to her and more fond of her even though our relationship hasn't changed. Is this normal when coming out to people? I'm not worried about it or anything like that; it's not like growing closer to a friend is a bad thing. I'm just curious if any other bros had similar experiences when coming out to people.",gaybros
Market Days Chicago 2018,Hoping all the visitors to Chicago this weekend for Market Days have an amazing meat and great :) Steel your livers for the thirst wave!,gaybros
What is the best sex position? And what are the benefits of it?,,gaybros
I'm confused,"So, I'm a straight dude. On occasion, I've gotten curious, but never anything that I acted on. I've been trying to date girls via Tinder, and today was awful for me with several rejections and lies and grisly occurrences. On a whim, I slid the slider that makes your profile viewable to men. Whereas I almost never had someone like me first either women, I've gotten 4 likes and a super like in the last half hour, plus the dudes ain't fronting or asking you to pay them for the privilege of their time. They seem a lot cooler than the vast majority of the girls on Tinder, and frankly a lot more interested in me, too. Idk, I don't think I'm gay, but this situation has got me super mixed up.",gaybros
preparation is the key to success (x-post /r/funny),,gaybros
I just got back from successful dick surgery AMA,,gaybros
This isn't new but i just found It and wanted to share,,gaybros
"[Altered title] Abby Huntsman, a pro-same-sex marriage conservative, will be joining The View next season. Interestingly enough, The View will now have two somewhat pro-LGBTQ conservatives (the other is Meghan McCain). Thoughts?",,gaybros
"How do you feel about people referring to your bf/husband as your ""partner""?","I encounter this regularly. A co-worker will refer to straight couples as ""her boyfriend"" or ""your wife"", but will always address my bf as ""your partner"".
Honestly, I'm not one to be typically offended, but this really rubs me the wrong way. 

She claims to be super liberal but can't bring herself to use the accurate word. It screams internal homophobia to me. You call my female co-workers partner a ""boyfriend"". Why not mine? What's the problem? Stop being so afraid. It feels like she's too uncomfortable saying a gay phrase like ""his boyfriend"".  

Am I overthinking this or do others feel similar?",gaybros
What’s it like to be in love?,I’m curious to hear your experiences. It’d be awesome to live vicariously through a couple of love stories for a minute. I’ve never been in a loving relationship where the love was requited so I was just wondering what’s it like?,gaybros
"Bros, how are you? Honestly. How’s your day, your week, your month?","Some of you may seen my post earlier. But I’m good, stress free to an extent. ",gaybros
Anyone here start and run a business?,"Any type of business; restaurant, auto detailing, seven figure revenue software company.

What kind of business? How did you start it and why did you choose your niche? What is your background (education, prior work experience, etc.)? 

Curious to hear your stories!",gaybros
Cut or uncut?,Tale as old as time,gaybros
Had a quick shower cry this morning,"It was a bad choice to take my ex on a family vacation last year. Rough breakup earlier this summer and I had to move cities/time zones back home. Good move overall and I'm back with friends and seeing my family, but this vacation is rough. His memory is everywhere. I put so much effort and time into him, and took him to all my favorite spots and hideaways here, and now everywhere I like going is tainted with his memory. I can't escape it. Even my bedroom has memories of him- I found some socks and underwear and his toothbrush in a drawer from last year that I guess we forgot. Theres a picture he took of us hanging on the wall that I had to take down. The key to the house I made for him with a fob with our lucky numbers on it. Just fucking sucks that on my favorite trip of the year he is everywhere and I want to go home. I don't know what I'm expecting from this post- probably nothing will come of it. But I feel like I had to write it down and get it out to admit to myself that this is hard, and seeing it in words actually helps. So thanks for reading bros, and hope your summers are bangin ",gaybros
"Politics Phriday August 10, 2018","**PLEASE NOTE:** This thread's comments will be largely unmoderated. Please participate with the knowledge that offensive and uneducated opinions may be expressed. Please report all comments that break Reddit-wide rules or Terms of Service using the report button. 

A weekly post to talk about anything political going on in the world. 

Please note that Trump-centric conversation IS allowed in this thread but will be removed on other days of the week. 
",gaybros
"To Creatine, or not to Creatine?"," That is the question. 

I've started  going to the gym regularly for the past 4 weeks (covered by my work! Woohoo!). About 4 times a week. My question is,  is it worth it to use creatine?

I've researched some and found out that it can accelerate baldness if you're genetically predisposed to it. It's about half &amp; half in my family.  Father's side is full of bald guys,  mother's have none. My brother started balding at ~22, while I never did (currently 32). 

Maybe I should just stick to working out to be healthy, instead of gaining  uber muscle?

What do you guys think?

Thanks for the input!

Edit: Man,  you guys really gave me a lot to think about on both the pro and con side.  You guys rock! 👍🏽",gaybros
A straight bro just offered to be my wingman at a club and I feel really touched.,"He said gay clubs make him feel a little uncomfortable but he would be happy to come with me and direct guys my way. It was honestly so sweet and unexpected. Considering I put off coming out to this guy because I was worried how he would react, I made the right decision. 

Feeling pretty happy right now so thought I would share! 😇 

",gaybros
"If your partner cheated on you, how would you react?",,gaybros
This entire /r/LegalAdvice thread was fucking amazing. True catharsis.,,gaybros
I went to my new doctor today,"To start off, I'm mostly comfortable with my sexuality, however as I'm sure most of you can understand, it's just a bit uncomfortable to talk about it with someone you don't know, no matter the situation. That feeling of constantly coming out never really goes away.

Now, I've got a bit of a phobia for doctors (thanks childhood obesity and aggressive pediatricians) so I hadn't gone to one in about 4 years (since I was 18). I went with the intention of starting up on Vyvanse again, but I was also kind of interested in starting on PReP, but I figured it would be impossible since some of my friends have told me they have to pay $300/month with insurance.

Honestly, it was like nothing I've ever experienced before at a doctor's office before, he was just very calm, professional, friendly and completely welcoming. After a few questions about the previous time I was on Vyvanse and how it helped, he started to confirm all the information I'd submitted in (submitted on a tablet in the waiting room, not on paper, I thought that was awesome lol).

I don't think I fit the whole ""flamboyant gay"" stereotype, I have to be pretty god damn drunk for that. Basically, I don't think anything about me screams gay in any way. I'd basically maintained full eye contact the entire time he was confirming my information. When he asked if I was sexually active and I said yes, he then asked if my sexual partners were male or female, I said male, and he confirmed if it was just males, I said yes, and he asked what kind of protection I was using and I said condoms.

The entire time he asked those specific questions, I did not see a single note of hesitation or any reaction whatsoever. **I was just another human being. I did not feel judged or objectified in any manner whatsoever.** It was literally the only time that has EVER happened to me when ""coming out"" before. It honestly felt pretty great.

Anyway, he asked if I'd ever contracted any STD's and I said no, and then I asked him about PReP, and he seemed very eager to help me get set up with it. He explained what the process would be like and told me we could get it started the next time I came in for my physical. I asked him if it would pop up on any sort of family medical bills or whatnot (I can't have my parents seeing it), he went out of his way to figure out whether it would or not. Basically, he said at worst they might see Truvada pop up somewhere if they were specifically looking for it, but with HIPAA I could make sure that didn't happen.

And then I asked him how much it would likely cost me... **motherfucker said they'd cover almost all of it.** I'm honestly pretty ecstatic about it... I mean I've come to the conclusion that hoeing around doesn't do much for me but I might as well be extra extra safe if I'm gonna do it right? ¯\\(ツ)/¯

oh yeah I also got the vyvanse a few hours later so that's pretty dope too, hope this semester goes a lot better than the previous ones",gaybros
Datings guys with the same name as you,"What do we think, bromos? Obviously it's not a *uniquely* gay occurrence (breeders named Alex, Chris, etc) but how do you respond when you meet or match with someone who has your name?

Personally I think it's kind of cute, but I have friends who are super weirded out by it. ",gaybros
"Ever since I've been introduced to the concept, I can't stop looking at people's VPL",Especially right now in the summer when guys wearing sweatpants and stuff. I just can't help compulsively searching for VPL or bulge. Not just the ones that I'm attracted to. Is that an OCD? How do I put an end to it?,gaybros
Exclusive: Florida Wants To Help Bullied Kids — Unless They’re Gay,,gaybros
What are the most popular sports for you and the Gaybros in your area?,Here in the DMV (D.C. - MD - VA) rugby seems to dominate with kickball coming in at a close second. If only more bros were into racquetball though! ,gaybros
Sydney Gaybros - We did a thing!,"No picture cuz we all left and forgot. But we officially have a regular meetup once every 3 or 4 weeks!!

Thanks to everyone who came out and shared in the laughs and stories about interpretive dance, air quotes, the definition of an Aussie BBQ and everything else we talked about (NSFW).

So happy to have found a great group of guys to drink and laugh with.

Until next time bros!

",gaybros
This fabulous fucking fighter jet,,gaybros
"Thirsty Thursday August 09, 2018","What are you drinking, bros? Share your latest finds or homebrew creations.
",gaybros
Gay UPenn Student murdered in Hate Crime (CW),,gaybros
This hit home in my past and I’m not ok,,gaybros
Welp that’s a new one,,gaybros
How’s the scene in San Diego?,I got orders to San Diego and I’ve been hearing nothing but good things ,gaybros
"Do you use a slang when you tell people you're gay, and if so, what is it?","Coming out is hard.  It never really gets as easy as people think, but over time the nervousness does subside some.  That said, it's always nice to develop a slang to help ease that information into conversations with straight (or straight-seeming) people in order to lighten the mood.",gaybros
Stories like this give me some hope in humanity 😇,,gaybros
"Research finds that the young are more aware of mental health, yet less resilient. Millennials generally don't stigmatize mental illness, but they also have more of it, overall, and are less skilled at making the human connections needed to support it.",,gaybros
Romantic Meeting Fantasies,"I have a bad habit of going to places and thinking I will find my significant other. I’m a book nerd, so sometimes I’ll go to the library and envision myself finding the love of my life in some cheesy Hallmark card way.  Maybe it’s because I’ve never had a boyfriend. I’m 26 so the age anxiety is slowing creeping in. 

Anyone else have this crazy habit? 
",gaybros
Need advice,"I want to explore my sexuality and try doing oral with a guy. I need advice because i dont know how to find a person to try this with as im kind of attracted to men older than me (28+), as im only 19. Ive tried using grindr but some of the people on that give me such a creepy vibe and it feels unsafe. Help me out?",gaybros
Searching for a good gay dating app/site,"Hey guys, 
Any of you know of gay-specific dating apps/sites that AREN'T primary used for hook ups? I'm looking for a relationship, not a random hookup. 
Thanks!!",gaybros
Totally focusing on the jump here. [NSFW possibly],,gaybros
Doctor found a growth in my testicle today,"They took some blood and urine then I had to get an ultrasound. Now I go to the urologist tomorrow to see if it’s a tumor or cancerous, I guess. I can’t express how scared I am. 😞",gaybros
"Workout Wednesday August 08, 2018","Share your fitness goals, regimen, and brag about your progress or latest accomplishments! 
",gaybros
Biden launches LBGTQ family acceptance campaign,,gaybros
"Piece I wrote on r/LGBTeens regarding ""Islamophobia""",,gaybros
"Hey Bros, I just made something and I decided to post it on RedBubble. If you guys could stop by and check it out I would really appreciate it. Any critique is greatly appreciated!",,gaybros
"For those who feel this way, this is a good read",https://hornet.com/stories/conversational-hacks/,gaybros
Found this on Facebook,,gaybros
"Cops lead sting in adult boutique, arrest and out 10+ men.",,gaybros
Is there anything left for me?,"Hey there everyone, I’m 21, college engineering senior, depressed, not really living life. I’ve tried to get help for 2 years, hasn’t worked at all. I’ve attempted at my life twice, I’m worried nothing is going to work and I’m going to eventually fail. I’ve contemplated putting myself in a mental hospital again for months. Maybe even trying electroconvulsive therapy. Anything. I can’t live like this anymore, all alone with no friend or boyfriend. I’m more than just my degree and my life isn’t complete.",gaybros
"When Gene Simmons said Adam Lambert should ""shut up about being gay""","Bit of a time capsule on more homophobic times. Happened almost ten years ago. 

But anyone remember when Gene Simmons loved Adam Lambert on American Idol, but when Lambert came out as gay Simmons completely changed his tuned, and said Lambert wasn't fit for rock he was better for ""broadway"".

That shit would not fly today! At least I don't think.

Simmons also said [“you’re forcing people to deal with issues they may not be interested in. Life is unfair, and the masses don’t all live in LA. They live in Wisconsin and Nebraska, and you’re on crack if you think the same rules apply there”](https://www.accessonline.com/articles/gene-simmons-on-adam-lambert-coming-out-hes-killed-his-career-73249/)

He also said Lambert's career was over because he came out as gay.  

Simmons was team Lambert and loved his voice and style but after Lambert came out Simmons distanced himself and spewed all this ""dog whistle"" homophobia.

I remember thinking how fucking homophobic it was but times were less politically correct and Simmons pretty much got away with all of it. 

What do you think of that?

Would it fly today?

Have times changed?

Do people similarly try to resist progress today?

etc...",gaybros
Surprising my boyfriend for our 1 Year Anniversary 😂,,gaybros
Life?,"Asking for advice :) 

I'm currently in school right now, I'm in my final year so next year in june I hopefully will  have graduated school successfully. I'm 17 and I'm lost and a mess. I'm asking for advice from you guys who have more life experience than me. 

So, I'm not sure but I'm very curious about dating and I really want to be independent and have my own apartment and my own personal life. I'm in the closet and I still live with my mom obviously and in no way I could ever imagine coming out to her because it's something I still kind of feel ashamed of and soo uncomfortable about and maybe I will never tell her also because she said some very homophobic stuff in the past when I was like 9 or 8 she said no one in my family would except me if I would be gay (which I honestly don't really care bc I'm not very close to all of my family members). So I'm probably never going to tell her. She's VERY caring but there are some things just SOME things that really really really pisses me off about her that make me want to live alone and be independent, since she's working all day and I'm at home alone almost every day since my childhood I kind of know how to take care of myself but only kind of. If I'm not around my family members or my mom I feel like I can fully be myself so in order to live a life in freedom, I think I need to be on my own, which I'm going to be anyway sooner or later but in this case it's sooner. 

But I really struggle with finding something I could do professionally. As I said earlier, I'm in my final year so this the time I should apply somewhere but I just don't know. In germany you go to school till 10th grade (which I am now since yesterday) so after that you have multiple choices either you continue going to school (11th, 12th, 13th grade) which is hard as fuck but you are then granted access to study everything you want but I don't think university is something for me, for sure the idea of it is very very exciting to me, but in reality I think it's very hard and you have to study a lot. Or you can do an apprenticeship which sounds meh to me but most of them take like 3 years to finish but I don't want to waste my time about something I don't really wanna do. my plan was to just work full time somewhere and figure out on my free time what I want to do with my life because I feel like only if I'm not around any of my family members and my mom I can FULLY be myself. My mom wants me to do something in the IT field but only because I know how to use an iPad and my phone etc. properly and she does not, and I'm not interested in that field at all. I love music. I listen to it a lot! I love listening to it and making sounds on my iPad or playing songs on my iPad.  For a long time until now I was like yeah you're gonna be a musician or something and gonna have huge success already in your 20s and be more than financially secure and by the time I get to 30 things will sort itself out. It's all because I listen to a lot of artists and I know a lot of artists story's how they got discovered and I was like yeah that's what going to happen to me too. but when I really think about it it's all about luck, I can't even sing nor can I play an instrument. It's not that I wanna be famous or something it's the music that always gets me and the power it has. I really had soo many high and unrealistic goals that are impossible to achieve. I guess I have a completely wrong perception of Life. I'm so insecure about that. I sometimes think about just getting a shitty 9 to 5 and get a partner just so that your life is not completely depressing. 
I live near a big city and when I'm there I always observe the adults around me and something just fascinates me about adults lately i don't know why. Sounds very weird, but it really does. 

This was very hard to put into words since it gets me stressed out about it everyday, but are too afraid to talk about with anyone, so I appreciate every comment.

What were some of your experiences? ",gaybros
Mood 😂😂,,gaybros
Herpes,Could I have caught herpes from mutual masturbation. No oral and there wasn’t a lot of back and forth.,gaybros
Florida recommendations?,"Hey guys--

I'm heading down to Florida Labor Day weekend.  I don't generally get out into fun, accepting cities very often  (I had a blast in Miami and Key West about 4 years ago), so I'm really looking forward to it.

I have to be in Tallahassee that Monday.  But that leaves Saturday night and Sunday for fun.  I'm either going to stay in Jacksonville, Orlando, or Tallahassee.  Any thoughts/recommendations?

I'm 32, single, and kinda introverted when it comes to stuff like this. . .but willing to go all out!",gaybros
EMTs?,"Something I've noticed. . .I'm in a rural college town.  Through Grindr I've met up with or chatted with at least 3 guys on the volunteer rescue squad.  Another gay friend is on a different rescue squad.  I'd say that at least half of the EMTs I know are gay dudes.

Might just be a coincidence rather than a correlation, but it was an interesting observation I made.  Thoughts?",gaybros
Las Vegas Trip this week,"Anyone live or also visiting Las Vegas this week. I am going to be there for a conference but plan to go out at night. If anyone could show me around or give advice on where to go and do, that would be great!",gaybros
"Showerthought: Gay guys are the opposite of straight people, if we make it to the third hookup then it's time for a date.",,gaybros
"Table Tuesday August 07, 2018","Bros, what is on your table this week? 

Share your latest culinary creations and food porn! Stories of failed attempts are also welcome.
",gaybros
Guys I need help- I’m actually being fucking “love simon”ed right now and I don’t know what to do,Recent months I’ve been more open about who I am online and somebody I considered a friend screenshotted something I said and is now black mailing me and I don’t know what to do please help... this could literally fuck my whole life up help,gaybros
Our new cat seems to be warming up to my husband.,,gaybros
Anybody feel better about how they look from the side than from the front?,"From the side I am a cute little otter. I have a little teeny tum bump just above my pubic area, I look slim otherwise, and I am just adorable.

From the front my hips are hella wide, my stomach looks way more saggy than it actually is, if I just took my pants off my loose skin is way more evident because it has folds and creases on itself lmao, and the hair on my stomach combined with the lighting (at least in my bathroom) makes my stomach look a weird shape and my ribs seem to poke out way farther than they should.

I should note I lost a lot of weight early this year and look different than I ever have, so I have noooo clue if I look totally normal and am just not used to it or what.

Maybe if I ever meet a guy (lol) I'll just always be sideways near him....",gaybros
Any other cross stitchers?,,gaybros
I feel worthless,I got a letter today from my orthodontist saying happy birthday and as i was reading it i realized that none of my actual friends said happy birthday to me i always say happy birthday and make a birthday post for my friends on Snapchat along with a bunch of other people that do the same well today was my birthday no happy birthday no post nothing i want to pretend like i don’t care but i can’t help but feel worthless ,gaybros
When did you meet your 1st boyfriend? What's the best method?,"Hey bros,

Something similar to this probably gets posted often, but, when did you guys get your first boyfriend or start seriously dating people? How did you meet (apps, bars, events, through friends)? What really helped you out in finding a good partner?

Background: I'm a 24 year old guy. I've never had a real date or a boyfriend. Some think that that's crazy to them, to others they think it's totally normal to have never dated at my age as a gay man. I dig my alone time a lot but occasionally get the urge to want to go out with a guy to a nice dinner.

I'm not much of a bar person so I don't really go out. But, I check on the apps every few months and chat with some guys and rarely ever get anyone to want to hang out. Usually because people aren't on there looking for actual connections (I live in a mid-sized city), usually just sexual intentions.

I'd love to see if other guys have a similar issues. Or if there is something you would recommend try out or try to do differently just to even mingle or go on some real dates with guys.

Best of luck to you all

\-Niphro",gaybros
How many of you boys went to the Vans Warped Tour over the years? The tour was a staple of my teenage years and I met so many queer people there. An end of an era.,,gaybros
Why Opinion Changed So Fast on Gay Marriage,,gaybros
I was told to cross post this here. I hope you bros enjoy some nerdiness with your gay.,,gaybros
Went boating with the boyfriend yesterday.,,gaybros
About to finish my coming out process to everyone that matters to me.,"TL;DR: Tomorrow my coming process ends to everyone that matters to me.  I'll be out to my friends, parents, brother, and sister-in-law.  I'll be ~58 pounds down from when I started this coming out process and I'll be heading back to college in the fall openly gay.

Just finished texting my brother to meet up with him in the parking lot of my work before I start work tomorrow (He lives on his own with his wife + he's like 36 while I'm 20).  I texted him saying I need to tell him something 1 on 1, our parents don't really want him or his wife to know, etc.  He asked if it was about our parents or me and I told him me.  Then he suggested meeting up before I start work tomorrow and that's what's going to happen.  I plan to meet him half an hour before I start work tomorrow and tell him I'm gay.  After I tell him, he will eventually tell his wife, because I think that's something he'll be able to tell her better than I can, then I'll be out to all the family that matters to me.  My parents, brother, and sister-in-law.

All of my extended family can wait until the day I am engaged to find out that I'm gay.  Especially since quite a few of them are pretty religious, so my parents are going to probably get hate from them when that happens and that's something my parents did bring up when I came out to them.  I would also be the first gay person in my family's history, which honestly I doubt I was the first.  The first openly gay, yeah, but some one probably was in the closest in history but couldn't come out just because of how gay people were viewed back then.  Hopefully the first married gay person in the family!

For those who are curious about my coming out process, here's how it has went so far.  I've known I was gay since 17, thought I was asexual before then, but learned I was into guys.  I do have kind of a low pool of guys I'm interested in, I'll admit, but I am into guys and not into girls at all.  Never dated someone in my life, or even as much as kiss someone.  However, even though I was gay, I had no interest in hookups or relationships, so I had no reason to come out.  This lasted until February this year, when I had almost sort of a ""sexual awakening"" and realized that I really do want to be in a relationship with someone.  Then, I knew I had to start coming out.  This was also the time where I started my weight loss process.

I came out to my friends who I play video games with online shortly before I told my parents in March, a month after my ""sexual awakening"".  They didn't care that I was, especially since one of them is openly gay.  If anything, they were surprised, especially since I've known one of them since we were both like 9-10 years old playing Halo 3 on Xbox Live (Christ Halo 3 is over 10 years old).  

Then, shortly later, about 2 weeks later I told my parents both 1 on 1 on the porch of our house.  They weren't thrilled to say the least, especially since my Mom has said a homophobic thing once or twice in the past.  But they say they will still love me, did the typical in shock questions of ""How do you know?"" ""You still need to date a girl to know."" ""You're hormones are out of control, you're too young to know for sure (I'm 20 btw, if I was 13-14, I would agree, but I didn't mention that) ""You're aware of what's on the news, right?"", ""You might not like doing that stuff with a guy."" things like that.  They told me to stay away from dating apps (I will be using dating apps, but I'm going to be smart about where I meet people and know to stay safe + use condoms).  Ever since then, they haven't brought it up once and they stopped teasing me with questions like ""Who are you texting?"" ""What's her name?"".  Didn't even change it to male pronouns, I know, but even if they did change it to male pronouns, I still wouldn't answer them.  If anything, them not using male pronouns tells me they aren't fully comfortable with me being gay yet, which is fine.  As long as they are mentally prepared for the eventual day I introduce them to a future boyfriend, I don't care.

Overall though, my dad is fine with it, my mom says she's fine with it but I can tell by the look on her face that she has a lot she needs to think about.  But I know in the end she wants her kids to be happy, so I'm sure she'll change those thoughts that she had to grow up with.  My parents are both 59, so they grew up in a time period where being gay was VERY bad (We live in the US for reference).

My parents don't want me to tell my brother (or sister-in-law), because of the chance that things change and I am attracted to girls.  Also they're probably scared of their reactions, but in the end, it's my choice to tell them, not theirs.  I don't want to argue with them if I told them that I wanted to tell them, so I decided I would text my brother and do it sort of behind their backs.

I'll tell him tomorrow, then I'll tell him that he can tell his wife when he thinks it's appropriate, mainly because that's something he would be able to tell her far better then I can.  She's also pretty religious, so I don't know what her views on gays are while he should know by now.  She is a teacher, and a really nice one too.  She's always in an upbeat mood too so it could go either way for how she reacts to knowing that her brother-in-law is gay.

But basically, tomorrow ends this process, being out to my family and also being ~58 lb down from what I was back in March (5'11, used to be 269lb and now at 212.7 lb and plan to keep going).  I'll be returning to college in the fall being openly gay.  Not wearing gay shirts and what not, but I will be wearing an LGBT bracelet + pendent.  Stuff that isn't noticeable unless you're really checking me out.

I know I didn't struggle with being gay as much as most other gay people, since I didn't realize I was gay until pretty late.  But I hope this sort of motivates someone out there to start coming out seeing how my process worked out.

Thanks for reading this stupid essay on my coming out process.  I made this way longer then it should have been.

Edit: It's over.  I came out to him.  He was cool with it, said it wasn't going to change his view on me.  He said he was going to tell his wife as soon as he got home.  I don't know what her reaction is, nor will I ever, but she probably has the same reaction I imagine.  He did mention his religion (he just got baptized last year so he can be a part of his wife's religion), but he said that I live how I want.  He's not gonna let his religious beliefs affect his relationship with me.  He thanked me for telling him, etc.  He even jokingly asked if I was seeing someone, which I am not currently (although I didn't mention that I do plan to start dating in the next few months).  No emotional moments from either of us, as expected.",gaybros
"We were only together for 8 months,","And it was pretty fuckin awesome, for the most part. 
I'm moving out because this next semester is going to be my hardest yet, and the anxiety of cheating/hooking up won't fade from my memory. I can't deal with that stress again, not this semester. 

Your 10 years older than me, my first relationship, and I loved it. I learned a lot from you. 

I wish I didnt leave for a different school in a year. Maybe then we would have worked on our relationship. I foresaw a future with you, but I don't think you could see one with me. That's okay, that's life. 

I'm sitting here on your bed, petting the cat that we adopted from my mom, trying not to tear up.",gaybros
Sweden's Supreme Commander sings an Elvis hit at EuroPride,,gaybros
"Dear gaybros who adopted a puppy, what did the cute videos fail to mention about dog ownership","So I come from a family where we never had any pets due to my father and brother being allergic to dogs/cats. Adopting a cute lil' pupper has kinda been a dream of mine for a couple of years now and I know that my boyfriend of 3,5 years wouldn't mind one either. He comes from a family with two dogs, knows all the work involved in owning one and so is a bit less enthusiastic about the idea for that reason (although he goes absolutely crazy when seeing a cute puppy or any small animal). We've discussed the matter over the years and it has started to feel (at least to me) more about a matter of 'when' than 'if'. The main reason we haven't progressed anywhere is because we're both still students and previously couldn't really afford living with one. Thing is I'm supposed to graduate next year and I've already started working this summer in a position that fits my degree(s), so money is no longer that much of an issue (after the initial cost of getting a puppy).

So, my question to you is the one in the title. I'd like to learn a bit more about what you guys have experienced before really committing to the matter. Every little bit of information is useful: is it worth it (I sure hope so), how much trouble is it on a daily basis, what was it like living with a puppy vs. now that the dog has grown, how did you get it to stop peeing on the floor and how long did it take (!), would you do it again in a similar situation, what things to look for in a breed (choosing a healthy breed would already be a top priority for me) etc.? 

I do understand that adopting a dog would require work and attention every day moving forward and it would absolutely break my heart to commit to this if we can't actually make it work. So don't spare anything!",gaybros
"Yea his hat says top, but with an ass and moves like that I see it as a request",,gaybros
For when you wanna carry your ho days into the Retirement Home,,gaybros
Any Boston bros?,"Hey all, I'm currently on an assignment in Worcester and was wondering for cool things to do on the area/cool people to meet up with. 

I typically like art museums and dancing, board games, video games, movies and concerts.",gaybros
Any KC bros?,Just moved to the area and not really good at making new friends. Someone to hang out with or just go to the bars and show me around would be great!,gaybros
Guessing if there are any Brazilian bros in this sub...,Hey bros... any Brazilian here? I'm fresh out of the closet and wanna meet people. Just a problem: I'm not a grindr type and don't like bars either. Any chance of meeting people out of these places? ,gaybros
From the science Reddit,,gaybros
Well... does anyone want to tell him??? :P,,gaybros
At a loss to how I’m supposed to feel...,"So was laying here sleepless and the name of the only guy(let’s call him John Doe) I’ve fell in love with crossed my mind and I checked up on him on Facebook. Keep in mind he was a manipulative asshole who led me on for several months and totally used me emotionally and financially but for a myriad of reasons was pitiable and I still feel bad for how his life ended up, and I’ve kept an eye on his social media and have been happy that he has seemed to get his life straightened out and went from serial dating a different guy every week to dating the same boy for over a year. 

Anyways. Checked his Facebook and saw where his current boyfriend tagged his page in a couple posts explaining that “John” had gotten himself arrested for running after being charged for multiple felonies(no clue what he did) and was likely going to be serving 5 plus years in jail. 

So yeah. I was having issues sleeping and thought checking on “John” would settle my mind but apparently not. Now I’m remembering all the shit I put up with because he was charismatic and dangerous and all the times He scared me out of my mind for one reason or another.... and I’m glad I made it through being friends with him in mostly one piece. But I still can’t help but be sad about how messed up his life is and was and how I tried so hard to show him the good things life could bring even though we were broke and scraping coins together for ramen and his cigarettes.  

It just sucks that he’s the only person I’ve ever felt a fire in my belly for and I was totally used and those feelings were unreciprocated. And since then every person who has been interested in me hasn’t made me feel like that and I just feel broken. And I refuse to go through the motions and break their heart like he broke mine. 

Anyways. I just needed to type all this out and get it off my chest. Ignore, comment, whatever. I’m gonna try to sleep and hope he comes out of this better than he was before he went in. ",gaybros
"50 all time artists, gay or straight, that every gay/ bi man should listen to (part 2) in no particular order","11. Billie Holiday- “Strange fruit”
12. Ru Paul- “Cover girl”
13. Kylie Minogue- “In your 👀 “
14. David Bowie- “Space Oddity”
15. Dolly Parton- “Baby I’m burning”
16. Rufus Wainwright- “April fools”
17. The Beatles- “Lucy in the sky with 💎”
18. Kate Busch- “The man with the child in his 👀”
19. Goldfrapp- “Melancholy sky”
20. Annie Lennox- “No more “I ❤️ you’s””",gaybros
Homophobic parent BTFO,,gaybros
"Me Monday August 06, 2018","It's that time of week again! Introduce yourself!

**Name:**

**Age:**

**Location:**

**One interesting thing that happened this week:**

**Photos:**

**Social Links:**
",gaybros
Why is it so easy for some guys to get a boyfriend and here I’am 25 years old and never had one before. Like wtf am I doing wrong?!,,gaybros
Looking for a playlist for the gym...you’re welcome! 🙌🏾💁🏾‍♂️🍑😂,,gaybros
Coming out to ext. family - over text/email or in person?,"I’m already out to my immediate fam and my dad’s side of the family, but not my mom’s side of the family. One uncle/aunt are fairly conservative but would definitely support me and one uncle/aunt are super liberal and have legit defended the LGBTQ community staunchly in the past. I’m out to one of my cousins and she was chill about it, but I have yet to come out to my other cousin and his wife (they’d be fine with it too). Not out to my grandma, but she’ll be last as she’ll have some issues with me being gay and I want everyone to be able to support me and her when I come out to her. 

So my city’s pride parade is next weekend and I’m going. Both of my aunts, my cousin, and his wife follow me on Instagram. I’ll probably get tagged in some photos at Pride and I’ll probably post some stuff to my story while I’m there, so I’d like to let them know what’s up before I do because I know that it would create less confusion. The problem is that they live a bit far away from me, so meeting up in person would be fairly inconvenient and tbh very awkward. The whole “I want to talk to you about something” thing is NOT my strong suit. Is it rude or inconsiderate to come out to them over text or in an email? It would make things much easier for me, but I don’t want anyone to be hurt that I didn’t tell them in person. I’ve talked to my parents and sister about it and gotten mixed responses. 

Gaybros - help a young gay out!",gaybros
HIV risk,"So I haven't had sex in like 5 years. Had a test like 2 years ago and all was perfect, no STI's. I did have a hookup a few days ago out of thirstiness. Unprotected. Then he ghosted me but I looked him up and found out through Facebook he worked at an HIV foundation. I know HIV risk for a bottom is still like 7% - if you were me would you be pissed? He said he was using protection but I didn't verify that... and he said he pulled out. Of course I didn't get off... so all in all I'm not too worried, want to get tested in a few weeks (giving gestation period). I don't think I should be worried - just got ghosted by someone I was hanging out with and lesson learned. Back to the mindset of we gotta go on like 20 dates and hang out as many times before I put out.",gaybros
Today's D&amp;D game,Looking forward to today's D&amp;D session with my bros.  We started playing summer of 1986.  32 years and going strong.  I guess we'll be playing in the old folks home in years to come.  Do something you love gaybros.,gaybros
Modern Gay Rock Song Suggestions?,"Thought it was time for an updated list for everyone to check and enjoy. 

So Bros what are your favourite gay themed Rock songs/artists?",gaybros
Coming out to more friends? (Asking for advice),"I’m out to my family and a handful of my friends. I don’t know wether I should just rip off the bandage or keep waiting. I’m currently going into my junior year of high school and don’t know what to do. Like, I really want to come out and be myself, but I am terrified of reactions and people treating me differently. ",gaybros
"I’m 26, alone and closeted."," Sometimes I really feels alone, and have a thought that I might die alone and “straight”. Nobody knows that I’m gay, but some might have guessed, but I managed to escaped. I was so scare to accept what would happens next in my life if I did come out, and I’m not ready yet (I kept telling myself that every year 🤦‍♂️). At this age, I started to feels I’m halfway approaching 50 and yet I’m not living my life. I’m from Asia country, where most of it, homosexuals is illegal. However, it’s not strictly enforced, where you could see some gay guys are very open about it, especially in the city.

Everybody around me doesn’t speak much about it. It’s very hard to meet a gay guys especially in my area. Plus, I’m quite shy. Often I try to go to gay bars, but thinking that I’m going alone and feeling uncomfortable, I shut the door. I don’t know where to begin. Tried using dating apps like Grindr, but almost (if not all) the guys are seeking only sex, which is not my thing. I'm more to trying to find someone that shares my view, not solely established based on sex. I try to be what I actually am, but my environment doesn’t allow me to at the moment.

I have some close friends and thought to come out to them, but I don’t have the courage. They sometime jokes about me being gay, but they don’t affirmatively sure as I’m very good in “pretending to be straight”. Lately I have some conflict that happened in my life where I was physically assaulted while I was unconscious (thankfully it’s not something that serious than a rape), and that have become a really big issue for me. What happened have spread into my friends circle (another group of friends, not my very close friends) as they realized that there was a problem between us (we were friend), the guys that assaulted me have since gone from my life afterall (thanks god). This conflict have a great impact on me as my friends thought that me a “straight” guy was assaulted by a gay guy. This further makes me retract myself from coming out.

My life is so messy right now. What would you do if you were me? I try to put all past behind me, and start fresh. But I’m seriously lacking in the courage to take the first step, going to the bar for instance.

For a closing, I quoting a quote from Summerstorm movie, which inspired me a lot:

&gt;If you hide all your life, you’ll loose yourself eventually

:)",gaybros
A Message from a Full-Time Voter Registration Volunteer,"I'm a mid 40s gay guy and I was able to retire at a young age, and now register young voters, as an unpaid volunteer, pretty much full time.  I'm trying to reach out to young gay people with a message because I'm so shocked at the number of young gay men (mostly men) who basically tell me to fuck off and haha they don't vote and haha they're anarchists and haha it doesn't matter.  

Ten years ago the idea of being able to get married was laughable.  No one cared if you were fired for being gay and yes it happened and still happens all the time.  When I was in law school gay sex was a felony in all but a handful of states.  And in other countries not that different from us, even in Europe (like Russia) gay people have almost no protections at all and are even tortured and killed and the police/govt don't care. If you think it can't happen anywhere, even here, you need to check your history books and look at he protections that have been eroded just in the last 18 months, and where people like Mike Pence want to go.  

There is currently a movement  of religious ""freedom"" which means laws don't apply when someone claims God told them it was OK to do crazy shit to gays.  Just wait until you want to buy a house and the seller refuses to sell to you because you're gay and hahaha remember that time you didn't vote because haha it doesn't matter.  

Many gay people before us literally died fighting for basic rights that we can never take for granted.  In some contexts, it may already be too late because the Supreme Court is now packed with nuts, 4 of whom are now appointed by Presidents who were elected with a minority of the popular vote because hahaha voting is for losers. 

In my state you don't even have to leave your house to vote.  Tonight I was at an event with a lot of gaybros and I truly fear for my own future as well as all of yours when so many young gay men think it's a joke to exercise their vote.  20% of under 25 voters vote and 90% of 65+ people vote.  Imagine if it were the reverse.  FFS - educate yourself on what is happening with social policy right now with respect to gay rights and fucking vote in November.   Don't laugh off the one thing that is the bedrock of democracy, especially when it takes 2 minutes to register and 2 minutes to vote.  Thanks",gaybros
So... we did this thing :),,gaybros
You’re just one day closer to finding him.,"It’s pride weekend in my city and I’m sick with a cold and feeling kind of lonely and stuck (by choice) at home.  Haha ..laughing this off as I always do. 

I wrote some encouraging words on a fellow redditor’s post about loneliness earlier, that gave me a bit of strength, but holy crap it’s been tough for me as well. Why are we all so damn picky and why is our community such a shit show these days? I can’t handle online dating app interactions any more due to the lack of respect we show for each other online. How did I/we get into this mess?

The thing that helps me is what a good friends told me last year that really resonated: “With each day that goes by, you’re just one day closer to finding him.”
..now I’m sounding like a 16 year old virgin again haha.. someone shake me!",gaybros
Does anyone have LGBT-owned clothing brands that they’d recommend?,,gaybros
My estranged father is dying from cancer. He doesn't have much more time. I'm debating whether to come out to him or not before he goes.,"My father was basically an absentee father for most of my life even though we lived under the same roof. He slept in his own room (separate from my mother), would leave for work around 5AM, come home around 8PM, eat his dinner in front of the TV by himself, and drink until he passed out. This was his routine his whole life. I have almost no positive memories of him. He's almost never played ball with me, never taken me to the movies, go on vacations, or do any typical parent stuff. I say almost because my mom used to force him to do those things when I was a child (he never wanted to do them on his own accord) and he would always pout or whine to my mother about doing it the whole time, so she gave up trying. 

He's been battling cancer for the past 2 years now, and I've been his primary caregiver this whole time. He hasn't been entirely grateful, and I don't think it's really helped our relationship much at all. He basically acts like it's my duty as a son to care for him. This week, the doctor gave us the news that he's no longer responding to any medication or chemo, he's pretty much out of options, and that we should start preparing for the end. I started to wonder if there were things I needed to say to him before he goes, and I was thinking if I should tell him I'm gay. I honestly don't know if I care or feel like I need to tell him, and I don't know if I'll regret it if I don't. I'm not out to anyone in my family, but I have a strong feeling they suspect it already since there's been some obvious clues. 

If he wasn't dying, and I was in a serious relationship and came out to my dad and he rejected me. I don't think it would bother me at all or at least I wouldn't feel like I would need his approval. 

However, I still fear the worst case scenario would be that I tell him, we both get upset, and he dies and that would be the last memory I have with him. 

Any advice would be appreciated.  ",gaybros
I have a question for the community,"Why is the use of hard drugs like Crystal Meth so common? And what exactly is the pleasure in doing it, also, how does this make you feel?",gaybros
"It's official: Male dancer earns spot on New Orleans Saints dance team, a first for squad",,gaybros
My straight friend propositioned me for a blowjob,"Pretty much what it says lol. Last night my boyfriend and I were gaming, and I got a text from one of my straight guy friends whom I buy weed from. He's in his 40s, has two kids, and going through a divorce. He said he was gonna need a favour from me in the next few days, and then said he was kinda drunk. Whatever, I played oblivious (which really isn't that hard for me to play lol) and after a bit of back and forth, he asked if I'd give him a bj. Not in lieu of payment or anything, just honestly asking. He knows I've been dating the same guy for over a year and that we have a really great relationship, I just answered straight up and said that if I was single, absolutely. But my boyfriend and I are very committed and we don't have an open relationship, so sorry but no. He didn't seem offended, just a little bummed but laughed it off. And that was that.

This isn't the first time I've had a straight guy friend hit me up for sexual favours, and my bf and I had a bit of a laugh about it. Guess I still got it lol.",gaybros
"Absolutely awful read, yet one we should all know",,gaybros
Any good subreddit or other social media platform for gay bodybuilding?,"And of course on all social platforms like grindr, scruff etc., and also here on the bodybuilding subs but I really would appreciate something focused on bodybuilding not being sexual.

There any would like to point out how well coming the guys and girls are at /r/bodybuilding and /r/steroids. But very hetero nonetheless in general discussions ",gaybros
Not fully out woes,"TLDR: Out only to a couple of friends. Felt shitty when I have to hide my sexuality from the rest of the group. Want to come out on Instagram and fuck all what happens afterwards.  


I went to local pride yesterday. Watching all the people there made me feel happy. Good music playing along the street. I invited my bestfriend to come and celebrate too because more is always better, right. He's homophobic - most probably due to his religion. He expresses it couple of time already when the topic comes out in our conversation and each time I'll just shrug it off.

Never said that it is pride event. Went there got some drinks. When we're just about to go somewhere else to meet other friends, he asked me if I know that the event is for gays. I just said I don't know and don't care as long the music is good. Shitty lie. Felt shitty myself when I said it.

Our group consist of a bunch of guys and a girl. Came out to the girl while I was drunk and she's okay with it. While we were just chilling, at some point one of them started talking about girls. Then came my turn. They asked if I got a girlfriend and I just said no and I don't need one.  
I really want to just say that I need a boyfriend instead but I couldn't bring myself to say it. Mainly because the homophobic friend is there. The others may be okay with me being gay but I couldn't afford to risk our friendship. Just started hanging out with them since 2 months before. Technically I didn't lie this time, I guess but the feeling when you have to hide something that is a part of yourself really made me felt down.

  
While writing this I feel like posting my picture at the pride event on Instagram with the caption ""Let's get one thing straight, I'm not."" Worst case, I'll lose all my friends, best case they'll just ignore it as if they never seen it and maybe talk behind my back sometimes. Should I?  
",gaybros
The Downside of PrEP: Syphilis Rates Are Up,,gaybros
A YouTuber Recreated Antoni Porowski's Thirst Traps Because Reasons,,gaybros
We need More Gay Music Industry Icons.,"Do you know what I would like?

Gay musical artists and Icons who are actually Gay.

No more Hetero women or men being touted as Gay Icons or sex symbols - but actual Gay artists who are Gay. 

That sounds crazy in how simple it is, but think about it - a lot of people from my community are blocked from ascending to 'legendary' artist status because they are told it will not sell. Meanwhile Hetero men and women are given opportunity to rise partly based on LGBT investment and fans, because they are sold to us as 'liking us' or 'supporting us' or 'being attractive to us' or having 'the glamour and showmanship Gay people like'...but to actually BE one of us is still apparently too far for the most part.

George Michael - and I guess Sam Smith is gaining traction in that direction - is the only massive Gay artist who really reached the highest echelons and status to date, with promotion and PR efforts behind him - and that's  largely because he ascended by utterly downplaying or deflecting his sexuality until he was too big to lose a fan base after revealing it.

I actually dream of a time when we have a roster of Gay artists big enough to duet with each other - and perform at the lead award ceremonies together and cover issues and themes in relation to the community experience. I want Gay Icons of different ethnicities and heritage - I want them in different body types and genres. Like can we get a f*cking BREAK?

I fully support MNEK, Troye Sivan, Olly Alexander and Sam Smith for this reason (even though I don't like the latter's music his success is hugely important). Also they fully fucking celebrate their Gayness and reference our culture in their work.",gaybros
